 Colombian drug traffickers are increasingly getting international assistance to broaden and protect their multibillion dollar businesses, according to two men who have had extensive dealings with the cartels.  The men, one a convicted drug smuggler who is assisting the U.S. Customs Service in undercover operations and the other a former member of the paramilitary forces that guard cocaine laboratories in the jungles of southern Colombia, are being protected by the U.S. government.  They testified before the Senate Permanent Investigations subcommittee from behind a protective screen so they couldn't be visually identified.  David Wheeler, the former drug dealer, said he believes the Colombian drug lords have between $30 billion and $100 billion available to buy protection from foreign governments.  Mr. Wheeler said that some of the money has been used to pay off Mexican defense officials, who allow cocaine to be "warehoused" in northern Mexico.  Flown in from Colombia in large transport planes, the cocaine is stored and then shipped, when needed, into Southern California in large tractor-trailer trucks, explained Mr. Wheeler, who said the cocaine is welded inside special storage areas inside the trucks.  The chaos caused by the recent crackdown by authorities in Colombia has tripled the wholesale price of cocaine in Los Angeles, Mr. Wheeler said.  But he added that the effect will only be temporary because the resources of the leaders of the Colombian cartel are so great that they can move their operations outside of Colombia.  "They don't need Colombia for anything," he said.  The second witness, Diego Viafara Salinas, said that the recent rash of bombings in Colombia was made possible by instructions given last year by a retired British Army colonel, whom he identified only as "David."  In a six-month course that resembled "boot camp," the colonel and a team of 10 other British mercenaries taught classes of 50 to 80 Colombians how to use a variety of explosives and how to build and remotely trigger car bombs, said Mr. Viafara.  A second team of five mercenaries from Israel gave instructions on conducting commando raids and intelligence operations, he added.  Mr. Viafara said the mercenaries were paid directly by Rodriguez Gacha, one of the leaders of the Medellin cocaine cartel.  But he added that he wasn't sure whether they knew that the people they were training were used by the cartel for assassinations and for protecting the hidden jungle laboratories.  Mr. Viafara, who acted as a doctor for the cartel in remote jungle locations, said that the force was armed with "thousands" of assault rifles and machine guns sent from Panama.  Any use of drugs by a member of the paramilitary force, he said, was punishable by death.  The mayors of nearby villages and a resident Colombian Army unit he identified as the Barbula Battalion were paid monthly to "look the other way," explained Mr. Viafara.  The army unit often cooperated with the drug dealers' security forces, he said, lending them weapons, including a mortar that was used for instructions by the visiting mercenary trainers.  Paid informers in Bogota also gave the dealers police documents and advance warning of drug raids, he said.  Mr. Viafara said he witnessed many killings and torture conducted by the dealers' hired guns, and he told Sens.  Sam Nunn (D., Ga.) and William Roth (R., Del.) that the reach and resources of the Colombian killers go far beyond Colombia.  "Perhaps in this country there are already individuals who would like to harm some of you in the Senate," he said.  The House Ways and Means Committee is likely to approve a reduction in the tax rate on capital gains as early as today, Chairman Dan Rostenkowski acknowledged.  The vote will mark a major defeat for the Illinois Democrat as well as for House Speaker Thomas Foley (D., Wash.).  Reps.  Rostenkowski and Foley have been struggling for weeks to devise a compromise plan to supplant a proposal by Rep. Ed Jenkins (D., Ga.) that would cut the capital-gains tax rate to 19.6%.  But yesterday Rep. Rostenkowski acknowledged that the effort had failed, and that Rep. Jenkins's plan would probably win in his panel.  The committee vote won't be the last word on the heated issue, however.  Democratic leaders intend to wage a serious campaign to derail any rate cut.  Also, in the Senate, Finance Committee Chairman Lloyd Bentsen (D., Texas) appears to hold a slight edge with his own plan to block a reduction in the capital-gains tax this year.  He said yesterday that he had received a "teriffic" response to his idea to expand deductible individual retirement accounts instead of cutting the capital-gains tax.  Still, approval of the Jenkins plan by the Ways and Means Committee would give a significant boost to the capital-gains tax-reduction effort, which is being pushed by President Bush.  If the full House also votes to reduce the tax, it would be difficult to beat back the proposal in the Senate.  The Jenkins plan would cut the top tax rate on capital gains to 19.6% for 2 1/2 years.  Afterward, the rate would rise to 28%, and the gain attributable to inflation wouldn't be taxed.  Currently, capital gains are taxed at the ordinary income rate, which can be as high as 33%.  Mr. Jenkins's plan, which is endorsed by the president, would allow individuals to exclude from taxation 30% of their gain from the sale or exchange of a variety of assets held for more than a year, including stocks, real estate and timber.  Rep. Rostenkowski and other House Democratic leaders have vigorously opposed the Jenkins plan.  They argue that it was a long-term revenue loser that disproportionately benefited the nation's wealthiest individuals.  In its stead, they proposed a plan that, for the most part, exempted from taxation that part of the capital gain that is attributable to inflation.  They argued that such a plan was less beneficial to rich people and less costly as well.  But attempts by Rep. Rostenkowski to fashion a middle ground fell flat yesterday as his latest proposal was accepted by the Jenkins forces, but was roundly rejected by the majority of Democrats on his committee.  Mr. Jenkins's plan is backed by six Democrats, including himself, and all 13 Ways and Means Republicans, representing a one-vote majority of the 36-member committee.  Though Mr. Rostenkowski earlier this year floated the idea of a temporary capital-gains rate reduction, he has opted now to side with the majority of Democrats on his committee and the rest of the Democratic leadership to oppose the Jenkins plan.  "I think I'll prevail on capital gains," Rep. Jenkins said yesterday.  But many of his fellow Democrats said he would do so at the expense of deeply dividing his party.  Committee Democrats who oppose the Jenkins plan intend to try to scuttle it by proposing an amendment that would offset the benefit to the wealthy by imposing a new tax rate of 33% on upper-income individuals.  The proposal is meant to rid the tax code of an anomaly under which the marginal rate -- that is, the tax on the last dollar of one's income -- is 33% for many middle and upper-middle income families but 28% for very wealthy individuals.  One version of such a plan, proposed by Rep. Byron Dorgan (D., N.D), would also confine the tax benefits of a capital-gains rate reduction to middle and upper-middle income individuals.  But proponents of the 33% rate plan said they didn't expect to prevail, given the solidarity of the Jenkins forces and the strong opposition of President Bush to higher tax rates.  "At this point we don't have the votes," said Rep. Sander Levin (D., Mich.).  Another option to beat the Jenkins plan that was considered but set aside yesterday was to approve a bare-bones tax bill that did little more than raise the $5.3 billion in taxes called for in congressional deficit-reduction plans.  Committee Democrats who favored that plan were unable to garner a majority to avoid the capital-gains vote.  The Jenkins plan would raise revenue for the government in the short run, according to official congressional estimates, as the sudden change in tax incentives increased the turnover of assets.  The Jenkins plan would use that money to finance the extension of a variety of popular and soon-to-expire tax breaks, including the credits for low-income housing and research and development expenditures.  Part of the package also is likely to be a plan, advanced in a bill by Rep. Dorgan, to extend the 25% deduction for health insurance bought by self-employed individuals.  First Executive Corp. said it reduced the conversion price for its Series G preferred stock to $20.50 from $21.42.  First Executive is a life insurance holding company.  The words "reconciliation" and "unity" jump out from the omnipresent campaign posters heralding November's independence election.  But in Namibia today there is mainly division and bitterness and fear.  Namibians had hoped that the United Nations-monitored process weaning the country from South African control would mean an end to two decades of civil war.  But Tuesday night's assassination of one of the leaders of the South West African People's Organization, the main liberation movement, is a clear sign that the shooting isn't over.  Gunned down outside his home was Anton Lubowski, a 37-year-old attorney and the highest-ranking white person in Swapo, who was involved in his party's efforts to reconcile the country's myriad nationalities.  Instead of joy and anticipation over the independence process, there is now a dread of what might come next.  "We're sitting on a volcano," says a prominent white businessman in Windhoek.  "We just don't know what will happen."  This unsettling prospect surrounds today's expected return of Swapo President Sam Nujoma after 30 years of exile in Angola, from where he directed the movement's guerrilla operations.  Spray-painted on a brick wall in the center of Windhoek's business district is this warning: "We are waiting for murderer Nujoma."  Such threats, along with Mr. Lubowski's assassination and other acts of intimidation against political leaders and supporters of all parties, have cast doubt on whether there can be free and fair elections, which the U.N. presence is designed to ensure.  Yesterday, officials overseeing the independence process were putting on brave faces.  "We cannot and shall not allow a situation of anarchy to develop," said Louis Pienaar, the South African-appointed administrator general of Namibia.  Added U.N. Special Representative Martti Ahtisaari: "I wish to assure Namibians that their desire for a peaceful transition to independence, too long delayed, cannot, and will not, be frustrated by the increasingly desperate acts of a few extremists."  In anonymous telephone calls to a Windhoek newspaper, a man said the White Wolves, shadowy white supremacists who also operate in South Africa, killed Mr. Lubowski.  Earlier in the week, Namibian police arrested three white men -- two South Africans and a German -- in connection with the bombing of a U.N. post north of Windhoek that left one Namibian security guard dead.  In a statement, Swapo said Mr. Lubowski was murdered by "enemies of Namibia's liberation struggle in order to cause panic and insecurity."  Namibia, under South African rule, has always been a volatile mixture of white conservatives who applied South Africa's policy of racial segregation and black nationalists dedicated to overturning that system.  But that mix has been made even more potent in recent months by the electioneering of a plethora of political parties and by the return of about 41,000 refugees, most of them Swapo exiles.  Included in this group are many members of Swapo's People's Liberation Army as well as about 200 former Swapo supporters who were arrested by Swapo as alleged South African spies.  Thus, instead of healing old wounds, the independence process is throwing salt on them.  "Swapo wants us to forgive and forget for the sake of reconciliation.  But how can we?" asks Oiva Angula, who left the country in 1978 as a dedicated Swapo member only to be arrested by his organization in 1984 on suspicion of being a spy, a charge he stridently denies.  He spent more than four years in Swapo jails in Angola, mostly in underground pits covered by logs and sheet metal.  After his release and return to Namibia in June, he and other ex-Swapo detainees formed a party, the Patriotic Unity Movement, one of a dozen parties that all aim to deprive Swapo of the two-thirds vote it needs in the election in order to write the new constitution by itself.  Despite the word "unity" in the party name, the ex-detainees say it is impossible for them to fully reconcile with Swapo.  "Black people are saying that we can't forget what the whites have done to us over the years," says Mr. Angula.  "But at the same time they expect us to forget what our fellow colleagues have done to us just because they are black.  Inhumanity remains inhumanity, no matter what color."  He adds, bitterly: "Those responsible for our imprisonment should not go unpunished."  The divisions in the country aren't confined to rhetoric.  The grandly named Commission for the Prevention and Combating of Intimidation and Election Malpractices, an independent monitoring body, has received 114 complaints of intimidation between May 22 and this week.  Of those, 62 have come in the past month.  The complaints, which come from across the country, involve alleged intimidation of voters, in the form of both verbal threats and physical assaults, by members of competing parties.  In addition, Swapo has accused members of Namibia's counterinsurgency unit, known as Koevoet, of continuing anti-Swapo activities despite the rules of independence that they are to be neutral and confined to base.  Various organizations, especially the Council of Churches of Namibia, have been trying to foster a common purpose among the various parties and bring an end to the intimidation.  But a meeting earlier this week broke up when leaders of the other parties accused the church council of being biased in favor of Swapo.  Some of Swapo's leaders are indeed affiliated with the council.  "Right now, talk of reconciliation is falling on deaf ears," says Father Bernhard Nordkamp of the Council of Churches.  "And if we can't have reconciliation, what good is having a nation?"  Prospects for a semblance of election unity brightened Tuesday when a number of the bigger parties signed a code of conduct based on the principle that all political parties should be able to campaign for votes, free of interference and intimidation from other parties or individuals.  Several hours later, Mr. Lubowski was dead.  Comprehensive Care Corp. and First Hospital Corp. said shareholders of both companies approved a merger.  Under the agreement, holders of Comprehensive Care's 10.1 million common shares will receive for each of their shares $3 in cash, $2.75 of senior subordinated notes and 0.78 of a common share in the new company.  The interest rate on the debt will be 10% for the first three years, increasing to 15 1/2% thereafter.  Comprehensive Care develops, markets, and operates chemical dependency and psychiatric programs, primarily under the CareUnit name.  First Hospital, a closely held concern based in Norfolk, Va., owns and operates 10 psychiatric facilities and three substance-abuse facilities.  An Alberta court upheld an accord under which C-I-L Inc. must sell its 50% stake in Tricil Ltd., a waste-management concern, to Trimac Ltd., for a previously proposed 91 million Canadian dollars (US$76.6 million).  The decision by the Court of Queen's Bench of Alberta, which is subject to a possible appeal, follows a lengthy legal dispute over ownership of Tricil between C-I-L, a Toronto chemical producer, and Trimac, a trucking and contract-drilling concern.  The ruling could pave the way for the ultimate acquisition of Trimac by Laidlaw Transportation Ltd., which sought to acquire Tricil in a transaction with the companies in 1986.  The legal dispute stems from that proposed transaction.  Pending a possible appeal, Laidlaw said it would still seek to acquire Tricil from Trimac for about C$200 million, as set out under terms of the amended 1986 accord.  The purchase price includes related interest costs, said an official with Laidlaw, a Burlington, Ontario, school-bus operator and waste-management concern.  A spokesman for C-I-L said it hasn't yet decided whether to appeal the ruling.  General Mills Inc., which concedes that the health-claims controversy over its new Benefit cereal has hurt sales, is revising the product's advertising pitch.  Two-minute television spots, known as "advertorials" because of their informational approach, were scheduled to begin running last night in major Midwestern markets where the cereal is sold.  The advertorial format allows a company to convey much more information than it can in a typical 30-second commercial.  General Mills positioned the spots around evening news shows.  As part of its marketing makeover for Benefit, General Mills this week ran full-page newspaper advertisements and it held a news conference in New York on Tuesday to back up Benefit's cholesterol-lowering claim.  Moreover, to gain attention and credibility, the company hired former tennis pro Arthur Ashe to appear in the television spots.  Mr. Ashe, the victim of a heart attack in 1979 that halted his career, says his cholesterol level at the time was an ominous 264. {Mr.  Ashe previously did ads for Bufferin, which cited studies indicating that aspirin can help prevent second heart attacks.}  Benefit derives its name and health claim from the large amount of soluble fiber it contains.  The new print ads note that the soluble fiber in Benefit is eight times that of oat bran, which it contains.  But it also has beet fiber, rice and psyllium husks.  It is the psyllium that has brought Benefit under fire from rival cereal makers and has raised questions at the Food and Drug Administration about health claims on foods.  "We're concerned that there's been a lot of unfavorable publicity," General Mills vice chairman Arthur Schulze said, adding that it has hurt sales of the new cereal.  Before introducing Benefit last April, General Mills paid for a 14-week dietary experiment, done at the University of Minnesota, with 38 men thought to have high cholesterol levels in their blood.  When put on a low-fat diet, those who ate bowls of Benefit every day for six weeks experienced greater declines in their cholesterol counts than did those who ate corn flakes {a mainstay at General Mills' chief rival, Kellogg Co.}  According to General Mills, the test found that the low-fat diet alone lowered every subject's cholesterol about 3%, but that those who also ate Benefit achieved an additional 6% decline while the corn flakes eaters had none.  The Minnesota study is believed to be the only one showing a direct link between psyllium consumption and reduced cholesterol.  Numerous others have correlated high fiber with lower cholesterol.  Boxes of Benefit advertise it as "the high soluble fiber cereal shown to reduce cholesterol when part of a low-fat diet."  But the words "reduce cholesterol" are in much larger type that the rest of the message.  Each box also contains warnings about possible allergic reaction to psyllium, and recommends that children don't eat as much of the cereal as adults.  Psyllium is the primary bulk ingredient in such laxatives as Procter & Gamble Co.'s Metamucil. {Procter & Gamble has protested General Mills' claim for Benefit since it has been unable to win FDA approval for a similar cholesterol-reducing claim for Metamucil, which is regulated as a drug.}  The FDA is expected to notify General Mills within a few days that it wants more information about the claims.  Mr. Schulze said the company decided not wait for the letter before changing its emphasis to "a more educational campaign.  "In no way have we backed off on our claims," he said.  "The product is in the public interest."  Late last month Kellogg introduced a psyllium-fortified cereal called Heartwise, and attacked General Mills without name, suggesting that the industry adopt standards for appropriate health claims for foods.  Then last week Quaker Oats Co. issued its own proposed set of standards.  Quaker, which is big on oat-bran products, also went out of its way to say it "will not add psyllium to a cereal product until either the FDA definitively deals with the subject or a credible base of scientific research says it is proper to do so."  Alluding to the competitors' outcrys, Mr. Schulze said General Mills believes "it's the responsibility of the FDA to establish policies on this matter."  Central Realty Investors Inc. said it submitted a new offer to buy Major Realty Corp. for about $105 million in cash and stock, topping a $100 million proposal from a unit of Stoneridge Resources Inc.  Under the new offer, Major Realty holders would receive $7 in cash and $7.50 of convertible preferred stock for each common share held.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Major Realty closed up 25 cents to $13.25.  Central Realty has given Major Realty until Tuesday to respond.  Both Major Realty and Stoneridge Resources couldn't be reached to comment.  In June, Central Realty, a real-estate investment trust, offered to buy Major Realty, a real-estate developer also based in Orlando, Fla., for $13.50 a share, or about $98.5 million.  But Major Realty said it would proceed with a plan to merge with a unit of Stoneridge, a holding company in Bloomfield Hills, Mich.  The plan gives Major Realty holders the option to receive $13.50 in cash for each common share held, or to hold on to their stock.  U.S. automobile sales lost some of their recent steam in early September, staying about flat with a year ago after a torrid August during which sales jumped 13.1%.  U.S. auto dealers sold 212,334 cars and light trucks in the first 10 days of September, compared with 244,173 vehicles the year earlier.  This year's period included only seven selling days compared with eight last year and sales eased 0.6%.  Experts had been expecting softer sales in the wake of the August buying spree, which was fueled by hefty rebates and other "incentives" as well as fear of steep price boosts on the soon-to-debut 1990 models.  But some analysts and dealers were surprised by the extent of the sales decline from August; they attributed it to shortages of some popular models and to continuing caution among some consumers.  Sales of North American-made cars alone -- excluding trucks and vans -- dropped 2.8% in early September, to 132,004 from 155,131 a year ago.  That yielded a seasonally adjusted annual selling rate of 6.7 million cars, according to a Commerce Department formula.  That's down sharply from an annual sales pace of eight million cars achieved in the final 10 days of August.  Last year in early September, the car sales rate hit an annual pace of 7.3 million units.  "It looks like the fall collapse of auto sales is beginning early," said Dave Healy, an auto analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. in New York.  He noted that Ford Motor Co., which began September with the lowest inventories of any Big Three U.S. auto maker, also posted the biggest sales decline in early September.  Ford's problem now is a shortage of such popular models as the basic Taurus sedan, Mr. Healy said, but soon the problem will be sticker shock on 1990 cars.  Ford, whose domestic car sales dropped 6.6%, had a 57-day supply of cars at the end of August, slightly below the 60-to 65-day supply considered ideal.  Analysts said the auto maker's sales were stymied by the arrival at dealerships of more expensive 1990-model cars that don't carry the heavy incentives found on 1989 models -- at least not yet.  "You've got to really want to be the first kid on the block (with a new-model car) to buy a 1990 Escort," said Ford analyst Joel Pitcoff.  The 1989 Escort carries a rebate of $1,000, while the 1990 model hasn't any rebate.  Meanwhile, Ford's archrival, General Motors Corp., posted a 1.7% gain in domestic car sales.  GM's performance was buoyed by availability, and a move the company made in late August that put incentives on its bread-and-butter Chevrolet Lumina sedan, analysts said.  Domestic car sales at Chrysler Corp. increased 6.7%.  But the No. 3 auto maker's truck sales dropped 8.3%.  Already Chrysler has begun offering incentives to dealers on some of its Jeep models.  Nissan Motor Corp. logged a big 79% decline in sales of its U.S.-made cars, and an accompanying 72% drop in sales of trucks made at its Tennessee plant.  A company spokesman attributed most of the decline to the termination of dealer incentives that had ranged to $1,575 on its cars, and to $2,075 on its U.S.-made trucks.  Honda Motor Co.'s sales of U.S.-made cars dropped 36%.  The company said it switched to producing 1990-model Civic subcompacts, but hasn't started selling them yet.  ---  @ RETAIL U.S. CAR AND LIGHT TRUCK SALES-a  @ 1989 1988 x-%  @ Sep 1-10 Sep 1-10 Chg.  @ GM total vehicles ...... 108,460 113,144 + 9.6  @ Domestic car ......... 66,445 74,640 + 1.7  @ Imported car ......... 2,834 4,309 -24.8  @ Total car .......... 69,279 78,949 + 0.3  @ Domestic truck ....... 39,052 34,195 +30.5  @ Imported truck ....... 129 0 d  @ Total truck ........ 39,181 34,195 +30.9  @ FORD total vehicles .... 63,625 79,574 - 8.6  @ Domestic car ......... 37,044 45,318 - 6.6  @ Imported car ......... 1,557 2,204 -19.3  @ Total car .......... 38,601 47,522 - 7.2  @ Domestic truck ....... 25,024 32,052 -10.8  @ CHRYSLER total veh .... 36,744 43,630 - 3.8  @ Domestic car ......... 19,007 20,357 + 6.7  @ Imported car ......... 1,670 2,853 -33.1  @ Total car .......... 20,677 23,210 + 1.8  @ Domestic truck ....... 15,365 19,155 - 8.3  @ Imported truck ....... 702 1,265 -36.6  @ Total truck ........ 16,067 20,420 -10.1  @ NISSAN total vehicles .. 1,590 7,476 -75.7  @ Domestic car ......... 701 3,836 -79.1  @ Domestic truck ....... 889 3,640 -72.1  @ HONDA domestic car ..... 5,412 9,660 -36.0  @ TOYOTA domestic car .... 1,917 814 +169.1  @ MAZDA domestic car ..... 509 506 +15.0  @ MITSUBISHI-c ........... 969 0  @ Total cars-b ........... 138,065 164,497 - 4.1  @ Domestic-b ........... 132,004 155,131 - 2.8  @ Imported ............. 6,061 9,366 -26.0  @ Total trucks ........... 81,161 90,307 + 2.7  @ Domestic ............. 80,330 89,042 + 3.1  @ Imported ............. 831 1,265 -24.9  @ Total domestic veh-b ... 212,334 244,173 - 0.6  @ Total vehicles-b ....... 219,226 254,804 - 1.7  a-Totals include only vehicle sales reported in the period.  b-Includes Volkswagen domestic production to July 1988.  c-Domestic car.  d-Percentage change is greater than 999%.  x-There were 7 selling days in the most recent period and 8 a year earlier.  Percentage differences based on daily sales rate rather than sales volume.  Nasdaq over-the-counter shares rose steadily on a wave of optimism about technology stocks, and then retreated sharply when investors turned nervous about junk bonds and the economy.  By the close, the Nasdaq Composite Index was off 0.03 at 471.83.  At one point the Nasdaq Composite Index had jumped 0.6%.  But then, traders said, OTC investors became cautious along with their counterparts on the New York Stock Exchange amid fears about the stability of the junk bond market.  Their jitters were fueled by troubles at the OTC market's own Campeau Corp. and by uncertainty about what a host of economic statistics due out tomorrow will disclose.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average slipped 1% and the Big Board Composite Index fell 0.8%.  "A lot of guys came in long in the morning because of the way the market acted (on Tuesday)," said Lance Zipper, head of OTC trading at Kidder, Peabody & Co.  "You could smell a rally in the air.  There was a lot of upbeat talk about high-tech stocks."  But once prices began soaring, Mr. Zipper said, the optimism turned to nervousness and investors decided to take profits and await the economic reports before making more commitments.  Mr. Zipper said the news from debt-ridden Campeau didn't help, either.  Before trading in the Toronto-based conglomerate's shares was halted, the stock had slid 23%, or 3 1/4 to 10 7/8.  The halt came after Campeau's Federated Department Stores unit said recently arranged financing commitments won't be in place by tomorrow to repurchase $401.3 million in notes held by three of its lenders.  Federated Department Stores, which Campeau acquired in a highly leveraged transaction, said that since the financing commitments necessary to repurchase the 13 3/4% notes won't be obtained by the deadline, the lenders holding the notes -- three investment banking firms -- will have the right to retain the 6.96% of Federated's common stock held in escrow.  Terms of the agreement say that beginning Friday, the lenders will have the right to either make the Federated stock available to buyers of the notes, or retain the stock for their own accounts.  However, a Federated spokeswoman said discussions are in progress regarding the financing commitments that Federated would need to buy back the notes from the bankers.  Earlier in the day, Campeau, facing pressure to meet debt-payment deadlines, said it reached an agreement in principle under which Olympia & York Developments, a major holder, will lend it $250 million.  Campeau said the loan is convertible and secured and as much as $150 million of the loan will be provided to its Federated unit, and as much as $100 million is slated for its Allied Stores subsidiary, to meet their "liquidity needs."  Campeau said certain lenders still must approve the agreement with Olympia & York, however.  Campeau said the board also authorized, as part of a financial restructuring, its plan to sell its Bloomingdale's department store chain.  Another retailing issue, One Price Clothing, slid 2 1/2 to 14 3/4.  Because of soft sales, the operator of apparel stores said it expects earnings for the third quarter to be "significantly" below analysts' estimates of 15 to 17 cents a share.  The company earned 11 cents a share in the third quarter a year ago.  Nordstrom fell 3/4 to 39 1/4, Charming Shoppes improved 1/8 to 16 1/4 and Dress Barn gained 1/4 to 17.  The semiconductor industry's leading indicator slipped again in August, reflecting sagging chip prices and continuing seasonal doldrums.  But Nasdaq's biggest semiconductor stock, Intel, gained 1/8 to 31 1/8; Integrated Device Technology was unchanged at 10 1/4.  The measure of orders to shipments, known as the book-to-bill ratio, declined slightly to 0.94 from 0.95 in July.  A ratio of 0.94 means that for every $100 of products shipped, semiconductor makers received $94 in new orders.  Among other technology stocks, MCI Communications climbed 1 3/8 to 42 1/2 on 5.6 million shares after Salomon Brothers analyst Lap Lee reiterated his "buy" recommendation on the telecommunications issue, Dow Jones Professional Investor Report said.  Microsoft rose 2 to 62 1/4 on 1.3 million shares.  Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette added the stock to its recommended list, according to the Professional Investor Report.  The news service said analyst Scott M. Smith upgraded his investment rating to "buy" from "moderately attractive."  Mr. Smith told PIR that the brokerage firm is "very comfortable with the company's short- and long-term prospects" and is "especially encouraged that their business held up well over the summer."  Apple Computer eased 1 to 45.  The company's new portable Macintosh computer, to be unveiled next week, already is getting mixed reviews from those familiar with the machine.  In takeover-related developments, Jefferson Smurfit jumped 3 1/2 to 41 1/8 on two million shares after a holding company formed by Morgan Stanley & Co. and Jefferson Smurfit said it entered into a definitive agreement to acquire all outstanding shares of the paper and packaging products maker for $41.75 each.  Qintex Entertainment tumbled 25%, or 2, to 6 after MGM/UA Communications said it received a new acquisition offer from a New York Stock Exchange-listed company it wouldn't identify.  Qintex previously agreed to pay MGM/UA holders $20 a share to merge the two companies.  Holders would also be allowed to participate in a rights offering in the newly formed company.  That agreement is scheduled for completion by the end of the month.  MGM/UA said it is referring the new offer -- to acquire all of the outstanding common shares for $23.16 each and to pay $18 a share for its preferred stock -- to its board to determine whether the proposal would be more beneficial to MGM/UA's stockholders than the merger with Qintex.  MGM/UA also said its agreement with Qintex allows it to cancel the proposed merger if it decides to enter a more financially advantageous transaction upon payment of an $18.2 million termination fee to Qintex.  Junk bond prices plunged in reaction to Campeau Corp.'s growing cash crunch.  Worst hit were the high-yield, high-risk bonds of two big Campeau units, Allied Stores Corp. and Federated Department Stores Inc. Yesterday, some of the Allied securities plummeted as many as 10 points, or $100 for each $1,000 face amount, and their yield climbed to an astonishing 30%.  Since the bonds were issued, their prices have declined as many as 45 points.  The junk issues of other retailers fell sharply, and many investors flocked to the safety of short-term Treasury bills.  Trading in junk bonds slowed as investors retreated to the sidelines.  And rumors flashed through Wall Street about supposed big losses on the trading desks of some brokerage firms.  In a moment of panic, traders thought that even market makers, such as Merrill Lynch & Co., had pulled out of the junk market entirely.  "Any bond tainted with a credit question has been hit by the market," said Kingman Penniman, senior vice president with McCarthy, Crisanti & Maffei Inc.  "The market is trying to identify the time bombs," Mr. Penniman said.  Campeau, the big Canadian real-estate concern, has struggled to refinance some loans.  Yesterday, public filings by Campeau disclosed it has run into a more serious cash shortage than had been believed.  In particular, Campeau said its Allied unit could miss two interest payments due tomorrow on its bonds.  Among Wall Street securities firms, the biggest casualty of the Campeau debacle is CS First Boston Group's First Boston Corp., according to people familiar with the situation.  First Boston, which was the underwriter of more than $1 billion of securities issued by Campeau companies, owns hundreds of millions of dollars of these securities, traders familiar with the firm's position said.  First Boston declined to comment.  As rumors whirled through the market, Merrill Lynch, also rumored to have sustained losses on securities issued by Campeau or its units, issued public denials.  "We have no junk-bond loss.  Our junk-bond desk is profitable," said a Merrill spokesman.  In the broader junk market, Campeau's troubles broadsided bonds issued by other retailers.  Traders said Macy's junk issues declined in price by one to two points.  Ann Taylor bonds also fell.  James Spirrison, a senior vice president at Rodman & Renshaw in Chicago, said the fallout from Campeau "has spread itself over marginal-type junk issues.  Most everything I've seen is down.  It isn't pretty."  "It's the worst market I've seen since the crash," said a high-yield trader in New York said.  "There is a huge calendar {of expected new issues} that is putting a negative tone on it," he said.  One fear, the trader added, is that high-yield mutual funds will be hit by customer redemptions and will be forced to sell some of their holdings.  Even bonds of quality issuers, such as RJR Nabisco Inc., were off, although generally not by as much as distressed issues.  "It's an extension of a pattern of trading we've seen over the last several months," said Robert M. Spurck, director of high-yield research at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  "There has been a real flight to quality" junk, he said.  Some investors flocked yesterday to Treasury bills, considered the safest and most liquid investment.  While prices of long-term Treasury bonds fell about 3/8 point, prices of short-term bills rose, and yields fell.  For example, yields on three-month Treasury bills dropped to 7.50% from 7.59% late Tuesday.  Shearson's Mr. Spurck said some good junk credits may be a tad overpriced due to investor nervousness.  "You have a number of credits that are trading too low.  Paper that shouldn't trade down does -- it's guilt by association.  We're buyers in that market," he said.  Junk bond traders spent much of the afternoon chasing rumors that competitors' desks, including First Boston, had stopped putting up bids for junk bonds.  Raymond Minella, co-head of Merrill's merchant-banking department, which includes its high-yield junk bond division, said near the close of trading that, on balance, Merrill had a bigger selling, than buying, position in Campeau issues.  "Our merchant banking group, including our junk bond group, has been quite profitable this year," Mr. Minella said.  People familiar with Merrill's operations said its merchant-banking group has earned well over $150 million this year.  The rumors about Merrill seemed to gain strength from the apparent misinterpretation of the resignation of a Merrill junk bond trader two weeks ago.  A Merrill spokesman confirmed the resignation, but said it was unrelated to any rumors about Campeau-related losses.  The trader had exceeded internal Merrill trading limits on Resorts International Inc. bonds totaling slightly less than $10 million, said people familiar with the situation.  Holders of Allied and Federated bonds are closely watching continuing negotiations by Campeau to secure loans and sell assets to meet debt payments.  Some of the Federated issues have covenants that allow investors to redeem them at full face value if control of the company is changed -- a possibility, now.  But Robert Lupo, Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. managing director, said he doubts that Campeau's banks would allow this so-called poison put to take effect.  That's because banks have a stake in Federated's senior debt, which they would try to protect ahead of any redemption by junk bond holders.  "The fate of the subordinated debt holders is in the hands of the senior debt holders -- the banks and Campeau," said Mr. Lupo.  Municipals  Market participants are awaiting the pricing of the bonds for the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey.  At 11 a.m. EDT Thursday, there will be bidding for $100 million of consolidated bonds, 65th Series, and $100 million of consolidated bonds 66th series.  Treasury Securities  Long-term Treasury bonds fell on rumors of a coordinated rate hike by the Bank of Japan and West Germany's Bundesbank, but short-term maturities gained, resulting in a steeper yield curve.  The 30-year Treasury bond fell about 3/8 of a point, or $3.75 for each $1,000 face amount.  Short- and intermediate-term Treasury notes rose about 1/8 of a point.  Yields on some Treasury bills declined by as much as .08 of one percent.  Traders said a chart-related sell-off in T-bond futures amplified the broader unloading of long-term Treasury bonds.  Demand for the short-term securities was related to a rush to "safe" investments after Citicorp chairman John Reed announced he doesn't expect Brazil and Venezuela to make interest payments on their debt before the end of this quarter.  Additionally, dealers expect large re-investment in short- and medium-term Treasurys when a large yen bond issue matures next week.  Also, traders said the big sell-off in the junk-bond market caused a rush to short-term Treasurys.  Corporate Issues  Elsewhere in the corporate market, issues closed 1/8 to 1/4 point lower, or $1.25 to $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  General Electric Capital Corp. kicked off a heavy session of new-issue activity with a $250 million offering of 20-year notes.  A group led by Kidder Peabody & Co. won the securities that are priced to yield 8.386%.  The winning bid was for an 8.30% coupon, which resulted in net interest cost to the company of 8.411%.  The issue, offered by the General Electric Co. unit, is noncallable and is puttable back to the company in nine years.  Syndicate officials said the issue saw good investor demand and was sold out in a matter of hours.  So far this year, GE Capital has issued about $3.3 billion in debt, excluding commercial paper, said a company official.  Meanwhile, Bank of New England Corp. increased its offering of 10-year subordinated notes to $250 million from an orginally planned $200 million.  The noncallable subordinated notes were priced to yield 9.886%, which represents a yield spread of 1.75% points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated Baa-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-B-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Morgan Stanley & Co.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Aided by demand associated with a spate of new derivative mortgage offerings and concerns about the quality of corporate bonds, mortgage securities continued to fare better than comparable-maturity Treasury issues.  Active Government National Mortgage Association and Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. issues fell 4/32 to 6/32 but held up better than intermediate Treasurys, which were off as much as 1/4 point.  There were three real estate mortgage investment conduit issues totaling $1.1 billion announced yesterday.  This represents a pickup from the slack volume during the past two weeks.  Ginnie Mae 9% securities for September delivery ended at 97 19/32, down 5/32; and Freddie Mac 9% securities ended at 96 21/32, off 6/32.  Foreign Bonds  French Treasurys ended sharply lower as a number of negative factors unleashed widespread selling, knocking prices down in their biggest loss since mid-August.  Dealers noted a wave of switching out of the French market and into the West German market as the spread between the two markets' 10-year bonds approached 1.50%, considered by many a significant resistance point.  By the end of the day, the spread had widened to 1.63%.  One analyst, noting expectations that West Germany's Bundesbank will have to raise interest rates later this year to cool booming economic growth, said: "It finally dawned on the markets that European interest rates are going higher this fall."  In addition, she suggested that the liberalization on Oct. 1 of regulations on French mutual funds is probably "prompting a lot of reshuffling by those funds ahead of that date."  Coupled with a general unease before the release of a number of significant U.S. indicators later this week, all those elements came together Wednesday, she said, and a lot of stock moved.  Among French Treasurys, or Obligations Assimilables du Tresor, the 8 1/8% issues of 1999 ended down 0.52 from late Tuesday in Paris at 97.06 to yield 8.57%, while, at the long end, the 8.5% issues of 2019 fell 0.82 at 97.16 to yield 8.76%.  On the MATIF futures exchange in Paris, the December bond-futures contract closed at 108.46, down 0.26 from late Tuesday.  Elsewhere:  -- Deutsche mark bond prices slipped slightly, but trading in both the cash government bond and Euro sectors was thin and primarily limited to professionals.  "No one wants to take on more paper," said one Frankfurt Deutsche mark bond trader.  "Customers left the market a long time ago," the trader said.  Bonn's 6 3/4% bonds due June 1999 ended down 0.10 point at 98.70 to yield 6.94%.  The 6 3/4% notes of 1994 dropped 0.075 point to 98.675 to yield 7.08%.  In London, the December Bund future closed at 93.71, down 0.07 point from Tuesday's finish.  The December three-month Euro-DM interest rate contract dropped 0.07 point to 92.55.  -- Among Eurobonds, the benchmark World Bank 6 3/4% of 1999 were quoted at 97.30 bid to yield 7.14%.  -- British Gilts finished lower.  Among the benchmarks, the treasury 11 3/4% 2003/2007 fell about 3/32 to 113 19/32 to yield 9.88%, while the treasury 11 3/4% of 1991 ended 2/32 lower at 99 13/32 to yield 12.17%.  -- In Japan, repurchases of positions sold "short" earlier, continued to bolster the government-bond market.  The benchmark bond ended on brokers' screens at its high price of 95.83, up 0.20.  In a short sale, borrowed securities are sold with the intent of buying them back later at a cheaper price.  ---  Roger Lowenstein, Matthew Winkler and William Power contributed to this article.  Security Pacific Corp., as part of its effort to restructure its global securities business, said it is engaged in discussions to increase its stake in its Australian-based affiliate.  The Los Angeles-based bank-holding company said it would buy additional shares in the company, McIntosh Securities Ltd., pending final agreement and regulatory clearance in Australia and the U.S. Security Pacific and its subsidiaries currently control 41.2% of McIntosh.  Interdale Pty Ltd., trustee for the McIntosh employees' unit trust, currently holds 34.5%.  Security Pacific and Interdale would buy the shares they don't already own in public transactions, giving Security Pacific a 49% stake and Interdale a 51% stake.  As part of the restructuring, McIntosh would become a member of a group with two other Security Pacific affiliates Burns Fry Ltd. in Canada and Hoare Govett in London, Security Pacific said.  The company said it will form a similar ownership structure with Hoare Govett to increase management ownership of the company during the next several years.  The three companies will fall under the auspices of a new holding company, Security Pacific Ltd.  HUNGARY INTENDS to rewrite accords limiting migration of East bloc residents.  Saying Warsaw Pact agreements limiting movement in Eastern Europe are out of step with human-rights commitments, Budapest's deputy foreign minister said Hungary will revise certain policies.  He also said the government will continue to dismantle border barriers but doesn't intend to be a springboard to the West.  More than 12,000 East German refugees crossed through Hungary en route to West Germany this week after Budapest's decision to allow their departure.  Authorities said more than 200 East Germans were occupying West Germany's embassies in Poland and Czechoslovakia in hopes of resettlement.  ---  More than 20,000 South Africans joined Anglican Archbishop Tutu and Cape Town's white mayor in a march to protest police brutality during recent rallies.  The government ordered police to allow the demonstration, considered the biggest anti-government march ever permitted in the country.  ---  Leftist Salvadoran rebels offered to end their 10-year-old civil war and reorganize as a political party in exchange for judicial, political and military changes by the government.  The proposal came at peace talks in Mexico City between the guerrillas and President Cristiani's rightist regime, which didn't immediately respond to the bid.  ---  Colombian drug traffickers are receiving international assistance to broaden and protect their multibillion dollar businesses, according to two men who have had dealings with the cartels.  Separately, some House Democrats broke with their Senate counterparts and endorsed Bush's $7.9 billion antidrug plan.  ---  Los Angeles's city attorney filed a civil lawsuit against Mayor Bradley for allegedly improper reporting of securities holdings, but didn't bring criminal charges.  The move capped a five-month inquiry.  The U.S., meanwhile, is investigating the mayor's financial ties with former Drexel junk bond chief Milken.  ---  New York City Democrats pledged unity after Tuesday's mayoral primary victory by Manhattan Borough President Dinkins, who could become the first black mayor of the nation's largest city.  Dinkins faces a challenge by ex-U.S.  Attorney Giuliani, who is running on both the GOP and Liberal Party lines.  ---  The Senate failed to override Bush's veto of a congressional resolution imposing restrictions on the joint development with Japan of an advanced jet fighter.  The 66-34 vote will allow the administration to oversee U.S. participation in the FSX program without statutorily binding curbs.  ---  The House rejected a Senate effort led by Helms to prohibit federal funding of art deemed obscene or blasphemous.  Critics of the motion, which was defeated 264-153, argued that the restrictions would amount to censorship and jeopardize the future of the National Endowment for the Arts.  ---  The U.S. and Soviet Union are nearing a landmark agreement to disclose their stockpiles of chemical weapons and permit inspection of production facilities, Bush aides said.  The pact is expected to be announced at a meeting this month between Baker and Shevardnadze.  Bush will meet next week with the Soviet foreign minister.  ---  Scientists in Boston have found new evidence for genes that control the human immune response, determining whether individuals can fend off particular viruses, develop allergies or contract diseases such as rheumatoid arthritis.  The finding opens a new avenue in research on varying abilities to fight infections.  ---  Methane gas exploded in a coal mine in western Kentucky, killing at least 10 miners and injuring two, state police in Wheatcroft said.  Federal officials said the blast was the nation's worst coal-mine accident since 27 workers were killed in 1984 in Utah.  ---  Poland's new government pledged to introduce Western-style economic changes to steer the country toward a market economy after 45 years of Communist centralization.  But Communist trade unions warned the Solidarity-led regime, on its first full day in power, that they would resist unemployment and privatization of state enterprises.  ---  Western relief workers fled a refugee camp on the Thai-Cambodian border as fighting intensified between Cambodian factions.  The clashes followed the failure of last month's peace talks in Paris and came less than two weeks before Vietnam's planned troop withdrawal from Cambodia.  ---  The U.S. and Nicaragua held a high-level meeting over this past weekend, the first such contact in almost five years.  An assistant secretary of state joined a four-member congressional delegation for the discussions in Managua with President Ortega.  --- Afghan guerrillas launched an offensive near the strategic Salang Highway north of Kabul in an attempt to cut Soviet supply routes to Afghanistan's forces.  In the capital, about 25 rockets exploded around the airport, killing a soldier and setting a Soviet supply plane ablaze, witnesses said.  ---  Israeli leaders discussed a proposal by Egypt's President Mubarak aimed at breaking an impasse over Mideast peace efforts.  But Premier Shamir's top aide dismissed the plan, which calls on Israel to trade land for peace, and rejected suggestions for Israeli-Palestinian peace talks in Cairo.  ---  Syrian and Christian forces battled in and around Beirut, killing at least three people and wounding 17, police said.  The fighting occurred as Arab mediators met in an attempt to revive a stalled peace effort in Lebanon's 14-year-old civil war.  Kleinwort Benson Group PLC, a British merchant bank, said its interim pretax profit fell 14% in the six months ended June 30.  The London bank said it was pressured by losses at subsidiaries that have since been sold.  The bank said pretax profit fell to #30.1 million ($46.6 million) compared with #35 million in the year-earlier period.  Pretax profit from continuing operations rose slightly to #38.1 million from #36.8 million.  The bank said its corporate-finance division gave a strong performance, its U.K. equities division returned to profitability, and its investment-management division, which includes private banking, show a "significant improvement in profitability."  Kleinwort, however, also reported "lower results" in its banking, treasury and debt-securities businesses.  The bank didn't give a breakdown.  CAMPEAU DISCLOSED a severe cash crunch, sparking jitters in financial markets.  The Toronto-based retail and real estate company said Olympia & York may gain control under a complex agreement in which $250 million would be injected into Campeau.  Sources said Olympia & York is likely to break up Campeau and sell additional assets besides its Bloomingdale's retail chain.  Junk-bond prices plunged in reaction to Campeau's woes, helping trigger a sell-off in stocks.  The Dow Jones industrials slid 27.74, to 2679.52.  Bonds and the dollar also declined.  ---  A cut in capital-gains taxes is likely to be approved by the Ways and Means panel as early as today, marking a major defeat for Chairman Rostenkowski.  But Democratic leaders plan to fight any rate reduction.  ---  MGM/UA received a $1.4 billion takeover bid from Rupert Murdoch's News Corp.  The surprise move comes as Qintex tries to complete a $600 million purchase of MGM/UA's United Artists studio and other assets.  ---  UAL suitor Marvin Davis isn't expected to raise his $6.19 billion bid before the carrier's board meets today to consider a $6.75 billion bid from a United Air pilot-management group.  ---  U.S. auto sales softened in early September following a 13.1% jump in August.  Analysts, surprised by the extent of the weakness, cited shortages of some popular models and continued caution among consumers.  ---  Mexico and creditor banks agreed on details of a four-year debt package, triggering a bridge loan of as much as $2 billion to the country.  ---  Digital Equipment offered a voluntary severance program to 700 manufacturing employees in Massachusetts as part of a broad restructuring.  ---  An Alabama company with letters of credit from Italy's BNL is seeking a U.S. export license to ship to Iraq a machine that U.S. officials say could be used in making nuclear weapons.  ---  MCorp was hit with an $847 million claim by the FDIC, which said the company improperly siphoned money from its banks before they failed.  ---  Bond Corp. of Australia sold its 20.4% stake in Lonrho, resulting in a loss of about $77.4 million and ending entrepreneur Alan Bond's hostile pursuit of the British conglomerate.  ---  NWA's new owners were asked by Transportation officials to provide more financial data today about the recent $3.65 billion buy-out.  ---  Citicorp lost a top merger adviser, Gordon Wolf, who resigned criticizing the bank's organizational changes and reluctance to advise hostile bidders.  ---  The Fed doubled the cap on banks' underwriting of certain private and municipal securities, further eroding barriers to investment banking.  ---  A New York Fed ex-director was sentenced to a year in jail for leaking information about the discount rate to a government-securities trader.  ---  A fourth NTT share offering was canceled by Japan, which conceded the ambitious privatization program for the company had gone awry.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 175,330,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2679.52, off 27.74; transportation 1469.24, off 7.82; utilities 214.10, off 1.82.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3317.72, off 12.31.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.90, up 0.13; spot index 128.64, up 0.16.  Dollar: 146.33 yen, off 0.62; 1.9705 marks, off 0.0158.  American Cyanamid Co., Wayne, N.J., said it filed suit against Vitarine Pharmaceuticals Inc.  The chemicals and biotechnology company charges that Vitarine, based in Springfield Gardens, N.Y., submitted false applications for approval of generic equivalents that competed with Cyanamid brand-name drugs.  The complaint, filed in federal court in Newark, N.J., seeks unspecified damages and an injunction that would prevent Vitarine from making false applications to the Food and Drug Administration for any drug that would compete with a product manufactured or distributed by American Cyanamid.  Among the drugs made by Vitarine was the generic equivalent of Maxzide, a widely used hypertension drug.  A Cyanamid unit, Lederle Laboratories, is the exclusive distributor for Maxzide.  Roger W. Jordan, president and chief executive of Vitarine, said he wasn't aware of the suit and couldn't comment.  An FDA inspection and company investigation earlier this year turned up irregularities in Vitarine's drug applications.  The company voluntarily stopped distributing some products, including its version of Maxzide, and recalled two other products.  Three weeks ago the FDA said it intends to revoke approvals for 25 of the company's products that it had already pulled from the market.  Wheat futures prices plunged in the face of widespread uncertainty about the Soviet Union's grain purchase plans, analysts said.  Adding to the slide was confusion among traders as to the U.S. government's plans for total wheat acreage to be planted beginning this fall, analysts added.  Last night, however, the Agriculture Department said the acreage of harvested wheat will be allowed to increase to 69.6 million acres from an estimated 67.5 million acres.  Wheat planting estimates had ranged as high as 90 million acres for next year.  Once wheat futures prices started to fall, "they dragged down corn and soybean prices with them," said Katharina Zimmer, a futures analyst with Merrill Lynch & Co. in New York.  Oleg Klimov, head of Exportkhleb, the grain buying agent for the Soviet Union, was quoted by Reuters news service early yesterday as having told a weekly newspaper in the Soviet Union that his country had essentially completed purchases of grain from foreign countries this year.  "But he didn't say whether he was referring to fiscal year ending Sept. 30 or to the calendar year," complained Conrad Leslie, head of Leslie Analytical Organization Inc., Chicago, expressing the frustration felt by many analysts trying to gauge the market impact of Mr. Klimov's remarks.  The report went on to quote Mr. Klimov as saying that the U.S.S.R.'s grain imports next year were likely to be less than this year's as a result of a previously announced plan to pay Soviet farmers in foreign currency for a portion of their crop.  Wheat futures for delivery in July of next year fell 12.75 cents a bushel to close at $3.47 a bushel on the Chicago Board of Trade.  The selling in the wheat futures pit at the Board of Trade quickly spilled over into the corn and soybean pits, overwhelming the meager strength in these contracts that existed early yesterday, analysts said.  Selling by speculators and local pit traders gambling that at least a temporary rout was in the making became a self-fulfilling prophecy.  Their selling depressed prices and triggered further sell orders from managed funds and others who had entered orders earlier to sell at predetermined prices.  Corn futures for December delivery closed down 5.5 cents at $2.295 a bushel and soybean futures for November delivery dropped 10.5 cents a bushel to close at $5.75 a bushel.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Petroleum futures rallied on rumors and technical factors with several gasoline and crude contracts reaching life-of-contract highs.  Gasoline set the pace, although heating oil also was firm in trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  Unleaded gasoline for October delivery rose 0.86 cent a gallon to settle at 57.75 cents a gallon.  "We're seeing a lot of strength on the product side," said one energy futures trader.  This helped push up crude oil futures, with the first six contract months all reaching life-of-contract highs.  West Texas Intermediate crude for October delivery briefly broke through the technically important level of $20 a barrel before easing back.  It settled at $19.86 a barrel, up 16 cents for the day.  Rumors of more refinery fires, which turned out to be false, contributed to the rise in futures prices, but analysts cited an underlying bullish tone to the market.  The American Petroleum Institute's report on U.S. oil statistics, which was released late Tuesday after trading had closed and showed an increase in inventories in the latest week, failed to have the moderately bearish impact on prices that had been expected.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices were narrowly mixed despite a stronger dollar for most of the day.  December delivery gold advanced 20 cents an ounce to $365.00.  December silver was off 0.5 cent an ounce at $5.1720.  October platinum declined 30 cents an ounce to $474.90.  One analyst said the performance by precious metals was poor in light of the weakness of the dollar and strength of crude oil, which is considered an inflation gauge.  Traders appear to be concerned that any advances in gold prices will be met by producers selling, which is inhibiting demand, particularly in the cash bullion market, he said.  The view has merit, he said, because the Soviet Union and South Africa, both major producers, are desperate for foreign exchange and selling gold is a good way to obtain it.  Another analyst, Sharon Ziemian, vice president of Citibank in New York, observed that, if there is any hanging back by buyers, it is because they can't clearly see which way the economy is going at the moment.  Several reports, such as the one on the merchandise trade deficit, are to be released this week, and they will give traders a better idea if the economy will continue to sustain the high dollar, she said.  "A strong economic picture would indicate potential inflationary pressure, which should create support for precious metals," Ms. Ziemian said.  COTTON: Futures prices rose sharply on the prospect of tighter world supplies and adverse growing weather in Texas.  The October delivery advanced its daily permissible limit of two cents a pound to 73.77 cents.  Other contracts were 1.13 cents to 1.76 cents higher, with those that will expire soonest advancing the most.  An Agriculture Department report, released after the close of trading Tuesday, raised expected output from the U.S. 1989-90 crop by almost 500,000 bales -- to 12.3 million bales -- from last month's estimate.  However, this increase was offset by an expected reduction in stocks on Aug. 1, the beginning of the current crop year, by about 400,000 bales from the previous report.  World-wide stocks on July 31, 1990, are expected to decline about one million bales from the July estimate to 25.2 million bales.  U.S. stocks on July 31, 1990, are projected to remain about unchanged at 3.9 million bales, the report said.  The expectation of higher U.S. production was based on good growing weather, one analyst noted.  Since then, weather in parts of Texas, a major growing area, has been rainy and cold, which has delayed the development of the crop.  There has even been damage from hail in one small area, he said.  If the delays continue, the cotton could be susceptible to frost damage, he said.  WAYS AND MEANS CHIEF Rostenkowski reversed himself and said he supports repealing a tax law that compels companies to give comparable fringe benefits to top executives and rank-and-file workers.  The switch improves the chances that the law, part of the 1986 tax-overhaul bill, will be repealed later this year.  Senate Finance Chairman Bentsen moved to block efforts to reduce the capital gains tax, saying he preferred expanding the deduction for IRAs.  ---  Sears has hit a major snag in talks to sell the Sears Tower in Chicago to Olympia & York for about $1 billion.  The impasse, involving property taxes, isn't expected to end, so Sears will have to find a new buyer for the world's tallest building.  ---  A United Air group plans to present a financing plan for its $300-a-share, $6.75 billion, bid to UAL's board tommorrow in hopes of gaining approval over rival suitor Marvin Davis.  UAL shares surged $4.625, to $281, amid signs the group is close to wrapping up financing from banks.  ---  Campeau reached an agreement in principle under which Olympia & York will loan the Canadian retail and real estate company $250 million.  ---  The U.S. current account gap widened in the second quarter despite improving merchandise trade.  There was a rare deficit in services trade, which one economist blamed on the cost of U.S. foreign debt.  Bush officials will try to help U.S. exporters by seeking talks with trading partners to limit their use of export-related foreign assistance.  ---  Lomas Financial's president and cheif mortgage officer sold most of their holdings in the firm less than a month before it defaulted on $145 million of debt, SEC filings show.  ---  Datapoint Chairman Asher Edelman said he bought 30% of the company's stock over two days, apparently to prevent a shareholder from ousting him from the board. ---  The fight over PS New Hampshire heated up.  One suitor increaded its bid to $2 billion, while the utility's management reached an accord with creditors and investors that would keep the company independent.  ---  Laser printers are about to become a lot cheaper.  Hewlett-Packard plans to unveil a laser model next week that soon will be sold for under $1,000, or 33% less than previous models.  Apple Computer will introduce its long-awaited portable computer next Wednesday, but those familiar with the model give it mixed reviews.  ---  Occidental Petroleum said an appeals court reversed all but $8 million of a $412 million judgment against the energy company in a breach-of-contract dispute with a Coastal unit.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 142,140,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2707.26, up 2.85; transportation 1477.06, up 7.47; utilities 215.92, up 0.31.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3330.03, off 6.10.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.77, off 0.48; spot index 128.48, off 0.67.  Dollar: 146.95, up 0.25; 1.9863 marks, off 0.0003.  Phoenix Technologies Ltd. said it expects to report significantly lower sales and a "substantial loss" for the current fourth quarter, as well as a loss for the fiscal year ending Sept. 30.  The expected deficit would be the company's second consecutive quarterly loss.  Phoenix, whose sales are generally seen as a leading indicator of the personal computer market, had been growing rapidly.  Its stock price, which has been depressed since July, fell sharply yesterday to close at $4.625, down 75 cents, in national over-the-counter trading.  Phoenix's core product is critical to many personal computer makers.  Its basic input-output system is used by hundreds of manufacturers to make their machines compatible with the IBM PC.  Phoenix said demand for its core product line "remains strong" and that the company's sales for the full year would exceed last year's.  But it also disclosed a reorganization meant to "establish a strong basis for controlled growth" in the new fiscal year.  As part of the plan, it has cut its work force by 95 people, or about 25% of the total, since May.  In an interview, David F. Parkinson, chief financial officer, said Phoenix will book a restructuring charge for the current quarter.  He said the company has tightened its revenue-recognition policies and will drop its effort to provide basic software to manufacturers of computers that are based on the Sparc microprocessor line from Sun Microsystems Inc.  "We had believed that standards were emerging in the workstation business, but in fact there is still considerable uncertainty as to which products will prevail," he said.  Lance E. Hansche, executive vice president, stepped down as president and chief executive officer last month.  The company said that Theodore R. Joseph, a Phoenix director and former president of Softbridge Microsystems Corp., would serve as interim president and chief executive during the search for a successor.  In the third quarter ended June 30, Phoenix reported a net loss of $998,000, compared with a profit of $2.1 million, or 24 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose to $15.9 million from $12 million.  Joel Rocha Garza, who holds an 8.46% stake in Smith Laboratories Inc., said he will oppose a proposed merger between Smith Laboratories and International Power Machines Corp.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Mr. Rocha Garza, a Mexican private investor, said he and his company, Clarendon Group Ltd., plan to vote against the proposed merger and will solicit proxies from other shareholders to vote against the proposal.  Mr. Rocha Garza said he also intends to purchase additional shares, but noted that the acquisition of more than a 10% stake would "cause serious adverse consequences" since Smith Laboratories, a San Diego drug manufacturer, adopted a shareholders rights anti-takeover plan in January.  For that reason, Mr. Rocha Garza said he plans to file a lawsuit seeking to invalidate the plan.  Timothy Wollaeger, Smith International's president, said he hadn't seen the filing and had no comment.  Mr. Rocha Garza said he retained D.F. King, a proxy solicitation firm, to provide services relating to soliciting proxies in opposition to the merger.  As of Sept. 8, Mr. Rocha Garza and Clarendon owned 1,119,100 shares of Smith Laboratories common, the filing said.  The stake includes 130,000 shares purchased by Clarendon between Aug. 15 and Sept. 7 for $2.30 to $2.425 a share.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Smith Laboratories closed at $2.375, unchanged.  International Power Machines is a Garland, Texas, maker of uninterruptible power systems.  Cross & Trecker Corp. said it received an extension of a bond-default deadline, which will enable it to complete new credit agreements that are part of a corporate restructuring.  The machine-tool manufacturer said it received the extension of a Sept. 8 default deadline on $2 million of industrial-revenue bonds.  Cross & Trecker said the possibility of default arose because of a net-worth covenant in an agreement that guarantees the bonds.  The company's net worth fell below the specified level, but Cross & Trecker said the trustee bank for the bonds extended the deadline in light of Cross & Trecker's restructuring program.  Under the restructuring, Cross & Trecker plans to offer three units for sale, negotiate a new long-term credit agreement for $40 million to $50 million and offer about $50 million in convertible exchangeable stock, for which Cross & Trecker intends to file a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Cross & Trecker said the new credit agreement's terms eliminate the possibility of default on the industrial-revenue bonds.  Dow Chemical Co. and United Technologies Corp. said they signed a letter of understanding to form a joint venture that will make and sell aerospace, defense and automotive parts made of composite materials.  The companies said the venture -- called Dow-United Technologies Composite Products -- will combine Dow's advanced composites-fabrication technology with the composite-parts development and manufacturing operations of United Technologies' Sikorsky Aircraft division.  Specific terms of the letter of understanding weren't disclosed.  But according to the agreement, Dow will provide growth capital, research, polymer and fabrication technology and certain property rights, such as patent licenses, to the venture.  United Technology will contribute Sikorsky's existing composite-parts production facilities in Alabama, engineering and research operations in Connecticut and some parts contracts.  The companies said they expect the joint venture's sales to reach $75 million in its first year and $600 million by the late 1990s.  They said they project the global market for composite parts will grow 15% annually to $2 billion by 1993.  "As a major producer of advanced composite parts, Sikorsky recognized several years ago that there was enormous new market potential for this segment of our business," said Eugene Buckley, president of Sikorsky Aircraft.  "After careful analysis of the projected growth in this market we concluded that the effort merited the focus of a new company, and that a joint venture with a major leader in composite products, like Dow, was the way to go," he said.  Dow and United Technologies said they expect to sign final definitive agreements by December, allowing the joint venture to begin operations soon afterward.  The new company will be based in Connecticut with Thomas Scarpati, Sikorsky's vice president/composite products, as president and chief executive officer.  The joint venture will employ about 500 people at first, Dow and United Technologies said.  Legrand S.A., the French electronics group, said its consolidated net income after payments to minority interests rose 4.3% to 313 million francs ($46.7 million) for the first half of 1989 from 300 million francs a year earlier.  Legrand said the gain was based on a 15% revenue increase to 3.293 billion francs ($490.9 million) from 2.855 billion for the year-earlier period.  The company said that after adjustment for changes in group structure the revenue gain would have been about 12%.  Legrand acquired a 45% stake in the Italian electrical-equipment concern Bassani Ticino S.p.A. in June.  Joseph Ettore, 50 years old, was named president, chief operating officer and a director of this discount retailer, effective Sept. 30.  Mr. Ettore, formerly senior vice president, general merchandise manager of Jamesway Corp., succeeds Harry Kohn Jr., 61, who resigned Sept. 1 for health reasons.  When Merrill Lynch & Co. sales representatives phoned Alan J. Schlesinger about stock deals, he hung up on them.  Then he sent two letters asking them to desist.  When the solicitations continued, the Boston lawyer tried another tack: He took Merrill to court.  Now a Boston judge has ordered Merrill brokers to leave Mr. Schlesinger alone.  The unusual ruling hasn't solved the problem entirely, however.  Mr. Schlesinger says that two months after he prevailed in court, a Merrill broker called with a sales pitch.  The broker said he hadn't heard about the ban.  Mr. Schlesinger went back to court last month and got a contempt order against the brokerage firm.  Merrill also paid him $300 in attorney's fees, which Mr. Schlesinger donated to charity.  He says he hadn't intended to seek publicity about the matter, but changed his mind when New York-based Merrill declined to drop efforts to appeal the court's order.  The ruling was issued in June but not made public until this week.  Mr. Schlesinger says he doesn't want any money.  He just wants to be left alone.  "I have a right not to have them call me," he says.  Securities industry officials say the ruling appears to be the first of its kind ordering a company to stop making live calls to potential customers.  A Merrill spokesman says Mr. Schlesinger is making a fuss about nothing.  "He only got three or four calls from us over the years," he says.  The company had issued a memo to its Boston office about not calling Mr. Schlesinger, "but it is virtually impossible to control the calls of 11,000 brokers," the spokesman says.  Some industry observers say Mr. Schlesinger's victory could convince other consumers to sue telemarketers.  "A lot of us are annoyed with what goes on.  The phone rings and it's difficult not to answer it," says Ed Burnett, president of a consulting firm that compiles lists for direct mailers.  While many companies offer consumers a way to stop direct mailings, it's still virtually impossible to keep a phone number away from telemarketers.  Mr. Burnett says, "You may die but your telephone number is still around."  But some people aren't convinced that filing a lawsuit is the correct solution.  "This is like using an elephant gun to go after an ant.  Why didn't he use the Nancy Reagan defense and just say no?" says William J. Fitzpatrick, general counsel of the Securities Industry Association, a trade group for brokerage houses.  Mr. Schlesinger says he finds the phone calls disruptive during business hours and that as part of his business he returns all phone calls.  Besides, he adds, the Merrill brokers often didn't identify themselves when leaving messages.  Since the contempt order was issued last month Mr. Schlesinger says he hasn't received any calls from Merrill.  But his problems aren't over.  "I got three calls from other brokerage houses just last week," he says.  A. Peilin Huang was named senior vice president of New York Life World-Wide, a recently created unit, with responsibility for exploring growth opportunities in the Pacific Basin.  She will be based in Taiwan.  Ms. Huang had been general manager of a New York Life office in San Francisco.  Thomas J. Gavin, formerly vice president, taxes, of Chicago Pacific Corp., was named to the vacant post of vice president, taxes, of this business graphics equipment concern.  Blue Arrow PLC said a U.S. investment firm, Southeastern Asset Management Inc., has accumulated a 7.16% stake in the big British employment-services concern.  The friendly stake by Memphis-based Southeastern pushes U.S. investors' holdings in Blue Arrow beyond 60% of the shares outstanding, Blue Arrow Chairman Mitchell Fromstein said.  That's up from only 9% in January.  The U.S. investor stampede stems partly from expectations that the world's biggest employment agency, which acquired U.S.-based Manpower Inc. in 1987, may eventually reincorporate itself in the U.S.  Southeastern is rapidly becoming a big investor in London.  Last week it said it holds a 9.4% stake in Britain's Saatchi & Saatchi PLC, the world's largest advertising agency.  Porsche AG's earnings, after tumbling the last two years, are rebounding and will be better than most people expect, Chairman Heinz Branitzki said.  "You will be very surprised with what we have done on the profit side," Mr. Branitzki said in an interview at the International Auto Exhibition in Frankfurt.  "The profit figure is impressively higher than last year."  When asked if the earnings trend continued rising at a similar pace to the first half, when pretax profit climbed 19%, Mr. Branitzki said the rise in earnings accelerated in the second half.  But he declined to provide details on full-year earnings.  In the first half ended July 31, Porsche's pretax earnings rose to 38 million marks ($19.1 million) from 32 million marks a year earlier, despite a 16% sales decline.  Hurt by the October 1987 stock market crash and the steep drop in the dollar, Porsche, which is heavily dependent on U.S sales, cut output at the start of last year and put workers on short shifts.  MAN AG said it agreed to acquire 80% of the ailing truck operations of Steyr Daimler-Puch AG.  The amount wasn't disclosed.  The West German engineering concern said its commercial-vehicle unit, MAN Nutzfahrzeuge AG, will take a majority stake in a joint venture consisting of Steyr's entire truck branch and some of MAN's assembly activities, which will be transferred to Austria.  Steyr will hold 20% in the new subsidiary, while MAN will have management control.  The announcement of the transaction came after DAF N.V., an Anglo/Dutch auto maker, said it dropped its offer to take over Steyr's truck lines after MAN made a higher counteroffer.  Steyr is majority-owned by Creditanstalt-Bankverein, Austria's largest bank.  After running up massive losses in recent years, the truck sector is likely to return to profit this year, Steyr said.  Arthur Kaufman was named senior vice president of marketing and exchange relations at this metals market.  He takes responsibility for new products and succeeds Gina Greer, who resigned in July.  Mr. Kaufman had been senior vice president and national sales manager of Thomson McKinnon Securities Inc.  This maker of digital musical instruments announced the resignation of its president, John S. Donnelly, citing "management differences" with chairman and chief executive Raymond C. Kurzweil.  Mr. Donnelly's duties will be carried out by current management, the company said.  Mr. Donnelly couldn't be reached for comment.  If a client wants to plead guilty in a criminal case, is it appropriate for his lawyer to try to talk him out of it?  The question was put to the test in the government's case against Salim B. "Sandy" Lewis, who pleaded guilty recently to three felony counts relating to the manipulation of Fireman's Fund Corp. stock.  Mr. Lewis was indicted by a federal grand jury last November on 22 counts of stock manipulation, conspiracy and related securities-law violations.  He was charged with manipulating Fireman's Fund stock in May 1986 to help American Express Co. sell part of its stake at a more advantageous price.  But individuals familiar with Mr. Lewis's case say that, against his lawyers' advice, the former Wall Street takeover speculator wanted to enter a guilty plea much earlier than he did.  Even before he was indicted, they say, Mr. Lewis expressed concern that he couldn't win his case in a climate in which the public was increasingly suspicious about Wall Street's inner workings.  They add that Mr. Lewis's desire to plead guilty didn't necessarily mean he believed he had committed any crime.  But Mr. Lewis's lawyers are understood to have told him that pleading guilty wasn't in his best interests and that he had a shot at being acquitted.  The attorneys also told him if he wished to plea bargain rather than defend himself, he ought to hire other lawyers.  People who have spoken to Mr. Lewis recently say he is now second-guessing his attorneys and wondering whether he shouldn't have followed his intuition from the start.  If he had, they say, he believes he might have received a better deal from prosecutors than the one he received last week, on the eve of his scheduled trial.  Mr. Lewis declined to comment for this article.  Stanley S. Arkin, one of Mr. Lewis's attorneys, says that having his client plead guilty to three felony counts was "personally and professionally an immensely difficult decision to make."  Mr. Arkin says that after repeatedly reviewing the evidence, "it came to a point where all the lawyers involved agreed that despite the fact that this was a case unworthy of being prosecuted, it was one that was best resolved by way of {a plea agreement}."  Responds Manhattan U.S. Attorney Benito Romano, "It would be unethical and wrong for us to bring a case unworthy of being prosecuted, and that isn't done in this office."  Other defense attorneys say that the situation in which Mr. Lewis and his attorneys found themselves is an unusual one.  More often, an attorney must counsel his client to plead guilty when the client wants to fight it out before a jury.  But many attorneys say that lawyers must leave such decisions in the hands of their clients -- and not try to pressure them one way or the other.  "I don't believe you should ever talk a client into or out of anything if he's intelligent," says Alan Dershowitz, a defense lawyer and criminal-law professor at Harvard Law School.  "Lawyers will sometimes talk a client out of pleading guilty because they want a bigger fee or want their names in the paper."  But others disagree.  "It's perfectly appropriate for a lawyer to tell a client, 'You're not in the frame of mind to make this decision that isn't in your interest,'" says Gerard E. Lynch, a professor at Columbia University's law school.  Mr. Lynch says that if a client disagrees, it is also appropriate for his lawyer to ask him to retain other counsel.  Aubrey Harwell Jr., a Nashville defense attorney, recalls a fraud case in which he represented a client who wished to plead guilty -- not because he believed he was guilty but "because of the agony he and his family were experiencing by being prosecuted."  Mr. Harwell urged his client to go to trial, and the client was later acquitted on all counts.  But Mr. Lewis's case didn't have such a happy ending.  People who have dealt with Mr. Lewis professionally say he is a volatile and temperamental man.  He often got angry with his lawyers over the past two years and frequently issued ultimatums and threats, individuals familiar with the situation say.  These individuals say Mr. Lewis's lawyers often dismissed those threats, figuring that Mr. Lewis didn't believe he was guilty and was just seeking a sort of martyrdom by offering to plead guilty to any crimes the prosecution chose.  Moreover, early discussions with prosecutors are said to have yielded settlement offers unacceptable to Mr. Lewis and his lawyers.  A plea bargain was said to be contingent on Mr. Lewis's cooperation in any possible investigation of American Express and its chairman, James D. Robinson III.  It remains unclear whether any role in the manipulation was played by anyone at American Express, which cooperated in the investigation of Mr. Lewis.  Neither the company nor its chairman has been accused of any wrongdoing.  Mr. Romano, the U.S. attorney, declined to comment.  While Mr. Arkin and other attorneys for Mr. Lewis are understood to have counseled Mr. Lewis until recently that he had a good chance of winning at trial, information they uncovered in recent months about the likely testimony of prosecution witnesses altered their view of the case.  A mock trial the defense lawyers staged in recent weeks, in which the verdict by a sample jury went overwhelmingly against Mr. Lewis, finally convinced them all it was time to throw in the towel.  Kingfisher PLC, a U.K. retailer, said its pretax profit for the latest six months rose 58% to #111.4 million ($171.7 million) largely on the back of #47 million in one-time gains claimed from refinancing and group reorganization.  Pretax profit for the half year to July 29, which was up from #70.3 million a year earlier, also was helped by modest gains at the company's home-improvements stores and real estate unit.  Profit after tax, or net profit attributable to shareholders, rose 62% to #91.6 million, or 20.9 pence (32 cents) a share, from #56.7 million, or 13.2 pence.  There were no extraordinary items.  Kingfisher's #47 million in exceptional items compares with #18 million a year earlier.  Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady last night kicked off a drive to alter the tax code to encourage Americans to save more and corporations to borrow less.  But the overriding imperative of reducing the federal deficit will severely limit the scope of any proposals that emerge from an interagency task force headed by Treasury Undersecretary Robert Glauber.  The deficit "stands in the way of doing anything dramatic," a senior Treasury official acknowledged.  Nevertheless, he said the Treasury hopes some modest proposals will be incorporated in President Bush's State of the Union address and budget in January.  In what aides say was the first of a series of speeches on the competitiveness of the U.S., the Treasury secretary last night told executives of companies listed on the American Stock Exchange that the U.S. must lower the cost of business capital "to ensure our economic leadership in the world economy and to preserve our standard of living."  Preoccupied by the deficit, the savings-and-loan crisis and his Third World debt plan, Mr. Brady until now has been unable to concentrate on his primary mission: to get business and investors to focus more on long-term competitiveness and less on short-term profit.  In a speech short on specifics, Mr. Brady emphasized his interest in reducing the tax incentives for corporate borrowing.  Under current law, corporations can deduct interest payments but can't deduct dividend payments.  This encourages them to borrow instead of raising money by selling stock.  Mr. Brady decried "double taxation of dividends," referring to the fact that corporations pay dividends out of after-tax profits and then shareholders must pay taxes on the payouts when they receive them.  This long has been a target of some businesses, economists and Republican politicians.  Because of the federal deficit -- and the president's pledge not to raise taxes -- the administration at most will propose a small step toward reducing the tax on dividends next year that might be followed by bigger steps in later years, a senior Treasury official said.  He estimated that allowing companies to deduct dividends entirely -- or offering a form of tax credit to individuals who receive them -- would cost the federal government about $30 billion or $40 billion a year.  In his speech, Mr. Brady rejected congressional proposals to discourage corporate borrowing by restricting tax deductions for interest -- even though he raised the notion in testimony before the House Banking Committee in January.  This route would increase the cost of capital, he said last night.  The Treasury-led team is considering a variety of options, all aimed at improving the investment environment in the U.S, the senior official said.  To boost savings, it's studying ways to revive individual retirement accounts.  To encourage executives to take the long-run view and act in shareholders' best interests, it's considering new tax incentives for businesses to reward executives with stock instead of cash bonuses.  The official acknowledged business complaints about the frequency of government changes in the tax law, but he dismissed them.  "Stability is a nice thing," he said.  "But it's always true that systems we have in place have biases in them.  There's no reason we shouldn't work on them."  He added that the Treasury isn't inclined to reinstate the investment tax credit or make such drastic changes as imposing a consumption tax.  Paramount Communications Inc. posted a 21% drop in fiscal third-quarter profit after taking a charge for the costs of its failed bid for Time Inc., but said earnings from continuing operations rose 17.3% due to strong entertainment and publishing results.  Paramount said it spent $80.5 million on legal and banking fees and other costs associated with its $14 billion hostile offer for Time, which rejected Paramount to merge with Warner Communications Inc.  After taxes, the charge to earnings was $48.3 million, which reduced Paramount's earnings from continuing operations in the quarter ended July 31 to $18.5 million, or 15 cents a share, from $66.8 million, or 56 cents a share.  Earnings from continuing operations in the year-earlier quarter were $55.2 million, or 46 cents a share.  Paramount previously agreed to sell its Associates financial services subsidiary to a unit of Ford Motor Co. and is treating the unit as a discontinued operation.  Earnings from Associates of $77.8 million brought final net earnings for the third quarter to $96.3 million, or 80 cents a share.  A year earlier, earnings from Associates of $65.3 million made final net earnings to $120.5 million, or $1 a share.  The results were in line with analysts' expectations, as was the amount Paramount spent on its bid for Time.  Analysts continue to speculate that Paramount, eager to expand its businesses, is looking to buy another media or entertainment concern -- but on a friendly basis this time.  Paramount is said to be considering a number of candidates but declined to comment, other than to reiterate past statements that it has plenty of options available to it.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Paramount closed at $55.50, up 12.5 cents.  Third-quarter revenue rose to $950.6 million from $795.1 million.  Paramount said a substantial increase in revenues from its Paramount motion picture, television and theater operations produced record third-quarter operating income.  Among the company's strong films in the U.S. were "Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade," "Pet Sematary" and "Major League."  In foreign markets, "The Accused" and "The Naked Gun" did well.  Television operations benefited from the success of "The Arsenio Hall Show" and "Star Trek: The Next Generation."  Madison Square Garden, as expected, experienced a loss due to the closing of the facility for renovations.  In publishing, higher results reflected strong gains in educational operations, which offset declines in consumer publishing because of increased marketing and production costs.  Professional information results were down because of higher product development costs and flat sales.  Lower yields at the U.S. Treasury auction of bills this week squeezed yields on certificates of deposit sold by broker-dealers, but didn't affect big bank consumer CD yields.  The average broker-dealer CD in the six-month maturity dropped in yield to 8.45% from 8.56% last week, according to Banxquote Money Markets, a New York information service.  Meanwhile, the average six-month savings-type CD directed at consumers, and usually requiring an investment of less than $55,000, dropped only 0.01 percentage point to 8%.  The disparate moves illustrate the effect that yields paid at the Treasury auction have on different types of CDs.  The certificates sold through major brokerage services surveyed by Banxquote directly reflect the prevailing yields on Treasury bills.  Treasurys are the benchmark for short-term interest rates.  Brokers shop across the nation searching for the most attractive yields -- and usually find them in small banks that are eager for deposits and therefore overly sensitive to interest rates.  "If the T-bill rates continue to drop, the savings CDs should fall too," said Norberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote.  Big banks are less dependent on the interest rate-sensitive investor and generally don't automatically match the weekly swings of Treasury bill yields.  On Monday, the average yield on a six-month bill was 8.06%, compared with 8.31% at the auction last week.  Jumbo CDs -- usually over $90,000 in denomination -- dropped only slightly following the auction.  The average six-month jumbo yield fell to 8.20% from 8.22%.  On average, big banks cut yields on one-year CDs to 7.98% from 8%, while all other maturities were left unchanged, according to Banxquote.  Spanning maturities, CD yields are bunched in an extraordinarily narrow range.  Traditionally, banks have offered long-term depositors an incentive to tie up money for extended periods with higher yields.  This week, however, yields range from 7.93% on a three-month investment to just 8% on the average five-year certificate.  Since early May, when yields started to drop off from their 1989 highs, three-month issues are off 0.68 percentage point, while five-year CDs have dropped 1.16 points.  The geographical range also remains close, with California banks offering six-month yields of 8.36%, unchanged, on the high end; on the low side, Florida banks were selling the issues with yields of 7.5%, also unchanged since last week.  A tiny Silicon Valley company is about to test the maxim that smaller is always better in the realm of computers.  Poqet Computer Corp. introduced yesterday a 1-pound computer that can fit easily into a jacket pocket.  The computer operates on regular batteries and uses the same DOS software that works on International Business Machines Co. personal computers.  "This particular product will define a new category of computers, the full-featured pocket," said Tim Bajarin, executive vice president for Creative Strategies Research International, a research and consulting concern in Santa Clara.  Besides pushing into a new market, Poqet benefits from the backing of Fujitsu Ltd., the Japanese electronics giant.  Fujitsu, Poqet's sole major investor with a 38% stake in the company, will market a Japanese-language version of the product next year.  Fujitsu also supplies parts for the Poqet computer.  Poqet's computer is 8.8 inches long, 4.3 inches wide and 0.9 inch deep.  But to make it that small, the company had to make concessions that could limit its usefulness, analysts say.  The computer, for instance, is relatively hard to type on; it uses a keyboard at least one-sixth smaller than conventional ones.  To make room for a standard 25 lines, the screen displays shrunken characters.  And while it runs popular word-processing and spread-sheet programs, these must be inserted into the computer on special memory cards.  "The real question about Poqet is whether users are willing to sacrifice screen and keyboard quality for portability," said Bill Lempesis, an analyst at Dataquest Inc., San Jose.  Poqet plans to begin shipping the computer in the fourth quarter.  It will sell for $1,995.  At that price, it will compete directly with slightly larger "notebook" computers that offer larger data storage and better keyboards.  "Customers will either love it or hate it," Mr. Lempesis said.  "I expect them to make up their minds pretty quickly."  The computer does break new ground in some areas.  While most portable computers require special batteries, Poqet's doesn't.  Moreover, the machine consumes a mere 50 miliwatts when in use, enabling two AA alkaline batteries to power it for 100 hours.  John P. Fairbanks, Poqet's vice president of engineering, said the company relied on, among other things, innovative circuit design and the credit-card memory device to reduce power consumption.  Poqet has filed 15 patent applications covering the machine, he said.  DOES SOCIAL SECURITY get its fair share of penalty collections?  It and the IRS agreed in 1988 on a plan to resolve discrepancies between their records that slashed credits of earnings to workers' accounts.  Now the inspector general of Health and Human Services questions whether Social Security gets all it should from IRS collections.  This issue stems from a 1950 law that vastly simplified accounting for Social Security-tax receipts and let the IRS keep interest and penalties collected on overdue Social Security taxes to deposit in the general government fund.  The general fund apparently was to get the penalties to offset collection costs, but the inspector general says this may deprive Social Security of huge sums.  His auditors tentatively estimate that penalty collections exceeded costs by $287 million in 1985, $319 million in 1986, and $844 million in 1987.  Their report concedes that data needed to confirm this aren't available and that they haven't factored in certain quirks of the accounting process.  Social Security plans to ask the IRS to try to come up with data that could be used to assess the need to update the accounting law.  HE COOKED UP A FIRE in their restaurant.  Must she split the tab with him?  Robert L. Madsen of Cushing, Wis., set fire to the Pit Stop Bar & Grill in 1982 without the knowledge of his wife and co-owner, Nancy A. Madsen.  When the insurer denied their claim, they sued it in a state court and lost.  But a jury absolved Mrs. Madsen of arson, so she appealed for half the claim.  The couple also deducted the casualty loss on their return.  The IRS denied that, so they turned to the Tax Court.  The Madsens conceded that he may not deduct his half of the loss, but contended that she -- as an innocent party -- may deduct hers, $22,513.  Judge Williams found, however, that Mrs. Madsen still has a reasonable prospect of recovery from the insurer under state law.  Thus, the judge denied her deduction, saying she must wait to see if she clearly can't collect the insurance money.  GROUNDLESS CLAIMS trip up the IRS in a Georgia bankruptcy case.  Like any creditor, the IRS must file proofs of its claims in bankruptcy court when a taxpayer takes refuge there.  Fife M. Whiteside, a Columbus, Ga., lawyer, says he got fed up with faulty IRS claims in the case of a client, Green S. Hamilton, who died after going into voluntary bankruptcy.  The IRS filed a claim specifying taxes due for five years; but when the lawyer objected that Hamilton had no liability for three of the years, the IRS offered no evidence to support the claims and dropped them.  Whiteside then took an unusual step: He asked the court to penalize the IRS by making it pay legal fees.  Now U.S. Bankruptcy Judge Laney in Albany has ordered the IRS to pay fees totaling $1,663 at $95 an hour.  Each original part of a proof of claim must be "well grounded in fact," he held, and the IRS failed in three of five parts.  It didn't comply simply by abandoning some claims in the face of an objection.  The Justice Department, on behalf of the IRS, has appealed the order.  INFLATED CLAIMS for auto-repair insurance put claims adjuster Robert Jackson Miller of Greenville, S.C., in prison for scheming with others to defraud his employer.  Yet the Tax Court agreed with Miller that the employer's calculation of its fraud loss was too high.  The court trimmed the total of Miller's untaxed fraudulent income to $31,500 from the $53,000 listed by the IRS in its deficiency notice.  PERSONAL USE of a company car is a taxable fringe benefit.  Recent IRS rules for valuing that use offer alternatives and ease some of an employer's administrative burdens, says Grant Thornton, CPAs.  Workers must be told by Oct. 31 which valuation method the employer will use for 1989.  THE SKELETON FORCE in IRS private ruling 8930012 was a prison guard we'll call Zeke.  In free time at home, he connected dry bones into skeletons for a training-aid firm.  He got no supervision and was paid on a piecework basis.  So, says the IRS, Zeke wasn't an employee subject to income- and unemployment-tax withholding.  DAMAGES WON for wrongful dismissal are all tax-free, appeals judges say.  Christine A. Byrne was fired by Grammer, Dempsey & Hudson Inc., a New Jersey steel company, because it felt she had incited inquiries into its pay disparities between sexes.  In 1981, it paid her $20,000 to settle a reinstatement suit brought by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission.  She treated the payment as tax-free, but the IRS claimed tax on it.  The Tax Court split the difference: It said half was exempt as personal-injury damages and half was taxable as compensation for lost pay.  Byrne, who gave up the job, appealed to the third-circuit appeals court.  That court now says the payment resolved a claim that the employer had violated an obligation created by fair-employment law, not by any express or implied employment contract.  Thus, the opinion by Judge Cowen holds, under both federal and state law, the payment to Byrne settled a personal-injury claim, not one for lost pay.  That makes the entire $20,000 that she received exempt from tax.  BRIEFS: Daniel Dockum heads IRS criminal-investigation forces in the Fort Lauderdale, Fla., district. . . .  The IRS plans a hearing Nov. 28 on its proposed definition of "activity" for the complex calculation of limits on passive-activity losses.  Canadian housing starts declined 6.3% in August, mainly as a result of reduced consumer and business confidence and weaker economic growth, Canada Mortgage and Housing Corp., a federal agency, said.  August housing starts were at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 195,000, down from a July rate of 208,000.  The agency said, "The August decline in starts is consistent with a projected continued slowdown in housing activity during the second half of the year."  Chambers Development Co. said it agreed to acquire Bay Disposal Inc. Terms weren't disclosed.  The addition of Bay Disposal, a Norfolk, Va., collector and hauler of solid waste, is expected to generate annual revenue of $13 million.  The acquisition, subject to Hart-Scott-Rodino antitrust examination, would be the first by the solid-waste concern in Virginia, although it is constructing a landfill near Richmond.  Chambers has annual sales of about $137 million.  Chemfix Technologies Inc. said it formed a long-term joint venture with Air & Water Technologies Corp. of Branchburg, N.J., to pursue municipal sludge contracts using a process that chemically fixes and solidifies waste materials.  Terms of the venture between the two environmental services concerns weren't disclosed.  Cooper Industries Inc. said it agreed to sell its Larkin low-pressure wellhead-manufacturing operation to the HB Co. unit of closely held Enserve Inc. of Houston.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Cooper Industries is a manufacturing concern.  Hitox Corp. of America said it expects to report lower sales and "sharply lower earnings" for the third quarter.  In the year-ago quarter, the manufacturer of pigments used in paints, industrial coatings and plastics had net income of $668,000, or 29 cents a share, on sales of $4.6 million.  Hitox said soft demand from customers reducing inventories and deferring new purchases in line with recession fears are responsible for the anticipated lower results.  Wholesale prices in West Germany declined 0.3% in August from July and were up 4.5% from a year earlier, the Federal Statistics Office said.  The fall followed a drop of 0.9% in July from June and resulted in the smallest year-on-year increase since December, when prices increased 3.5%.  Wholesale inflation accelerated sharply at the beginning of the year, reaching a peak of a 6.5% in April and May.  In June and July, the index posted year-on-year increases of 5.5% and 5%, respectively.  The August index registered 110.8 (1980 equals 100), down from 111.1 in July but up from 106 a year ago.  The dip in August was mostly caused by lower food prices, the figures show.  The free-market value of the zloty shot up against the dollar, a fleeting nod to the government Solidarity finally formed, three months after it trounced the Communists in Poland's national election.  It is a measure of the country's economic state that Wladyslaw Baka, the new head of the national bank, warned Parliament not to get "too excited" about the zloty's sudden strength.  At yesterday's free-market rate, a dollar cost 8,000 zlotys.  With inflation hitting 40% a month, many Poles expect to pay 20,000 zlotys by December.  For all his confidence in the free market, Poland's new prime minister, Tadeusz Mazowiecki, is staking the future of the East bloc's first non-Communist government on that not happening.  The political wisdom in Warsaw gives him not much time beyond December to slow inflation to a gallop.  But after three months devoted to politics, Solidarity's uneasy coalition with two minor parties still lacks a solid set of detailed economic plans.  In presenting his cabinet, Mr. Mazowiecki left little to doubt about his ministers' theoretical preferences.  Free-market liberals have won out over soft-hearted social democrats.  While keeping a watchful eye on social discontent, they are determined to invigorate the economy in ways the Communists never dared consider.  "A transition will begin," Mr. Mazowiecki said, "to a system that has proved itself to give the best chances for everyone to live well."  He didn't quite call it capitalism, but the word "socialism" never once crept into his speech either.  Hinting at things to come, he ran through proposals now familiar in Eastern Europe: creating a stock exchange, eliminating monopolies, selling state firms "to everyone."  But to begin with, he promised to find a way out of hyperinflation.  With production falling for the first time since 1982, Poland has to escape fast.  Mr. Mazowiecki's list of immediate steps was forceful but seemed for the moment to stop short of shock treatment.  He said he would cut the budget deeply, switch military factories to civilian production, make tax-dodging state firms pay up, and cut back on loans for investment.  And he said Solidarity was "working on a package of more decisive steps."  "It must be stressed that there are no examples in world history of an economy fighting such high inflation without painful effects.  It is very possible that it will result in a temporary fall in production and in the standard of living," he said.  The new government is under pressure to produce a more specific anti-inflation plan soon.  A plan that satisfies the International Monetary Fund would almost surely lead quickly to a pact to reschedule Poland's $39 billion debt.  That could give it over $5 billion in annual breathing space.  The fear is that austerity in an economy inherited from Stalin won't have the desired effect.  Some Solidarity deputies were captivated last month during a visit by Jeffrey Sachs, a Harvard professor known for his successes in Latin America.  Prof.  Sachs, they say, proposed a suspension of debt payments and an immediate end to Poland's huge state subsidies.  The budget deficit would suddenly disappear, and the zloty would be worth something.  This might well satisfy the IMF.  It may also push Poland's many bad companies into bankruptcy.  The question is whether the sclerotic remnants of a planned economy will respond positively, if at all, to such treatment.  More moderate voices in the East and West hope the IMF, considering the historic proportions of Solidarity's rise to power, will settle for much less.  "It's what we've always said wasn't possible.  It's happened.  We must make sure this works.  We can't walk away from it," a Western diplomat said.  Otherwise, Solidarity may never get to the larger task of reaming out Poland's underlying economic structures and building a real democracy.  Mr. Mazowiecki pledged to bring about the independence of judges and journalists, the apolitical accountability of the police and the army, and the freedom of trade unions.  Yet, in repositories of power such as the Foreign Ministry, where the new minister is neutral, the Communist Party still holds every other job of importance.  And the military and police are still controlled by Poland's powerful President Wojciech Jaruzelski.  Gen. Jaruzelski looked down impassively from the Parliament's balcony as Mr. Mazowiecki read his speech.  His expression didn't change when the Solidarity prime minister, feeling faint, had to interrupt his speech for 40 minutes.  "This is the result of several weeks of intensive work," Mr. Mazowiecki said when he returned after a rest.  "I have reached the same condition as the Polish economy.  But I have overcome it, and I hope the economy will do it as well."  American Indian groups and the Smithsonian Institution said they agreed on a policy to return more of the 19,000 Indian remains stored at the museum to tribal descendants.  Remains will be returned where historical and scientific evidence indicates that they belong to a specific tribe.  Previously, the Smithsonian usually repatriated remains only to direct descendants.  Since less than two dozen Smithsonian remains are identified by name, such repatriations have been rare.  Smithsonian officials said hundreds of the remains could be affected by the new policy.  The collection was gathered by archaeologists, private collectors and U.S. soldiers during the Indian Wars.  In recent years, American Indian groups have pressured museums to take such remains off display and return them.  The agreement will be added as an amendment to bills introduced in the House and Senate for the creation of an American Indian museum in Washington, D.C.  It won't affect an estimated 200,000 Indian remains held by state and private museums, but Indian leaders said they hoped other institutions would follow the Smithsonian's lead.  If you're concerned about America's industrial future, and you ought to be, then George Gilder's "Microcosm" (Simon & Schuster, 426 pages, $19.95) has an important message for you: You're probably worried for the wrong reasons and you're probably wrong about the remedies, too.  If you think America is losing its ability to compete, that other nations are conspiring to steal our technology and monopolize our markets, you ought to think again, especially if the focus of your worry is Japan.  America, Mr. Gilder argues, actually is ahead of Japan in some of the high-tech races most people think it's losing.  In computing, for instance, American companies actually hold 70% of the world-wide market, and their lead will increase, Mr. Gilder says, as software becomes more important.  In areas where we have fallen behind, say in some areas of semiconductor technology, we can blame our own misjudgment more than the government-led attacks from the Far East.  Rather than focusing on meaningless balance-of-trade statistics or trying to imitate Japan's bureaucratic planners, he argues, our government could do more to rebuild America's economic might by encouraging our spirit of enterprise.  It's a controversial thesis, and bound to be unpopular with advocates of national industrial policies.  But "Microcosm" -- which trails the formidable subtitle "The Quantum Revolution in Economics and Technology" -- should enlighten even those who reject its economic and political analysis.  Mr. Gilder explores the future of technology through one of its supreme creations, the microchip, the heart of the modern computer.  "More than any device," Mr. Gilder says, "the microchip epitomizes the overthrow of matter."  Vividly describing the achievements of such visionaries as Carver Mead, the now famous Cal Tech professor of computer science, and Federico Faggin, principal designer of the most important early microprocessors, Mr. Gilder guides the reader easily through some of the most complex developments in contemporary computer science, from parallel processing to artificial intelligence.  Consider the transistors now used in computers: They are smaller than the cells of the human brain, operate much more rapidly and will improve by a factor of at least a hundred before the limits of physics are reached.  So why don't we build computers that outthink us?  Because we don't know how.  Half a century of studying computers has taught us a lot about how the brain doesn't work, but very little about how it does.  So until recently, trying to design better computers by analyzing the brain has been about as fruitful as trying to design an airplane by analyzing feathers and flapping wings.  This may change, though Mr. Gilder doesn't make as much of some new developments as he might.  A number of labs, for instance, are finding the so-called biological models of computing increasingly useful in their work.  It was a study of animal functions that helped a research team led by Prof.  Mead to produce a chip called the "See-Hear," which converts light patterns into sound.  Some day, these chips may help the blind to get an idea of the room they are in by listening to pitches.  Such advances will improve the ways in which computers connect to the world around them by introducing new sensors into automated recognition systems, navigation systems and industrial automation.  All such inventions will affect the way we do business, defend ourselves or spend our free time.  We see this already: "By overcoming the constraints of material resources, the microchip has devalued most large accumulations of physical capital and made possible the launching of global economic enterprises by one entrepreneur at a workstation."  Not all the chapters seem as integrated as the integrated circuit industry of which Mr. Gilder writes so smoothly.  Some readers will be puzzled at the space he devotes to criticizing the Strategic Defense Initiative (he says it uses flawed technology -- a few immense computers instead of networks of many small computers).  Others surely will balk at his objections to any federal aid for high-definition television.  Mr. Gilder also is fond of overstatement.  Some examples: "Selling below cost is the crux of all enterprise."  "We bar immigrants from technical conferences devoted to the exploration of findings that only they can fully understand."  He also is wrong in thinking that the Cal Tech labs have succeeded in creating a microcircuit that mimics parts of the eye.  One day such a circuit could dramatically transform the semiconductor and computer industries by making it possible to build very complex computers on wafers of silicon about the size of a compact disk.  But this wafer-scale integration process remains elusive and was, in fact, responsible for one of the computer industry's largest financial disasters, the Trilogy Corp. debacle of the early '80s.  But such glitches fade amid the vivid stories Mr. Gilder tells of the oddballs who thrive in a field that favors those whose blood, as he writes, is rarely blue and whose money is rarely seasoned: "The United States did not enter the microcosm through the portals of the Ivy League, with Brooks Brothers suits, gentleman Cs, and warbling society wives. . . .  From immigrants and outcasts, street toughs and science wonks, nerds and boffins, the bearded and the beer-bellied, the tacky and uptight, and sometimes weird, the born again and born yesterday, with Adam's apples bobbing, psyches throbbing, and acne galore, the fraternity of the pizza breakfast, the Ferrari dream, the silicon truth, the midnight modem, and the seventy hour week . . . from the coarse fanaticism and desperation, ambition and hunger, genius and sweat of the outsider, the downtrodden, the banished and the bullied come most of the progress in the world and in Silicon Valley."  ---  Mr. Shaffer is founder of Technologic Partners and publisher of Technologic Computer Letter.  Cars sold in the Philippines by the country's automobile manufacturers reached 17,987 units for the first eight months of the year, more than double the 6,461 units a year ago.  The sales target of 35,000 units this year appears well within range given the first eight month's performance, and may even be slightly surpassed, said the Automotive Manufacturers Institute Inc., an organization of domestic-car producers.  Society for Savings Bancorp said it agreed to purchase all of the stock of Franklin Equity Leasing Co., a closely held concern.  Terms weren't disclosed, although Society, a Hartford holding company, said it would be a cash transaction.  The St. Louis concern, which leases cars and light trucks to consumers and small businesses, has assets of $65 million, Society said.  The acquisition is subject to regulatory approval and satisfaction of certain conditions.  A December closing is anticipated, Society said.  Pretax earnings by major Japanese corporations will increase 5.2% in the year ending March 31 because of strong domestic demand, Nomura Research Institute Ltd. predicted.  "Fiscal 1989 should be the third consecutive year of new peak profits on an industrywide basis and the second consecutive year of new peak profits excluding electric utilities and oil companies," the think tank said.  When electric power and oil companies are excluded, it said, pretax earnings will rise 13.6%.  Nomura's predictions are based on a survey of 362 companies listed on the first section of the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  The institute said the domestic economy is fundamentally strong, with sustained growth fueled by personal consumption and capital spending.  President Carlos Salinas de Gortari said workers at the government-owned Cananea copper mine, which was closed last month because of bankruptcy, will become co-owners under a reorganization plan.  Mr. Salinas made the remarks Monday to 3,000 delegates at a convention of Mexico's largest labor organization, the Mexican Workers Confederation.  Mr. Salinas emphasized that the open-pit mine, Mexico's largest, won't fall into the hands of foreign interests.  The government has been trying to sell the mine and some reports suggested that foreigners might buy it.  The confederation has proposed that the workers become co-owners of the new Cananea mining company.  However, Mr. Salinas didn't disclose details of the new arrangement or say when the mine would reopen.  The government, which owns 90% of the mine, declared it insolvent and ordered it closed Aug. 20, putting more than 3,000 employees out of work.  Cananea produces 3% of the world's copper and 45% of Mexico's copper output.  July machinery orders received by Japanese manufacturers rose 9.9% from a year ago to 1.968 trillion yen ($13.38 billion), the Economic Planning Agency said.  But after seasonal factors were taken into account, overall orders for July dropped 5.1% from June to 1.751 trillion yen.  The decline came on top of a 7.6% drop in the previous month.  Many Japanese companies, encouraged by better business expectations, are upgrading production and other equipment and placing more orders for machinery compared with a year ago.  Overseas orders have been on the rise as demand remains strong in other industrial countries that have been experiencing healthy economic expansion.  Officials of the nation's top anti-drug enforcement agencies say four Colombian cartels control cocaine traffic in the U.S. at the wholesale level and are moving toward global operations in supplying the drug and in laundering money.  The picture presented to the Senate Permanent Subcommittee on Investigations, which has launched its own investigation of the cartels, shows the Colombians have penetrated the U.S. drug scene in greater numbers and with more ambitious plans for cocaine production and control than had been previously realized.  In testimony before the subcommittee, David Westrate, assistant administrator of the Drug Enforcement Administration, said the Medellin cartel, the largest of the four Colombian cartels, now has "industrial"-sized jungle laboratories that refine coca paste into powdered cocaine.  A raid in southern Colombia last month, he said, found three-story buildings and elaborate equipment, including a 40-foot distillation tower capable of reprocessing hard-to-get chemicals used in cocaine manufacture.  "This is new," said Mr. Westrate, who estimated that there were enough chemicals at the laboratory to produce 125 metric tons of cocaine. (A metric ton contains 2,204 pounds).  Colombian drug lords, he said, are using heavy-lift helicopters to drop large generators into remote jungles to power such sophisticated laboratory operations.  They continue to import processing chemicals, such as acetone and ether, from the U.S., China, West Germany, Brazil and Mexico.  The resulting cocaine supplies are so large, according to Mr. Westrate, that the cartel is expanding into Europe and there is recent evidence that "they're showing interest in Japan."  DEA has records that show the Medellin cartel and the smaller Cali cartel have connections with 24,000 businesses and individuals, he added.  Another witness, William Baker, assistant director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, said FBI and DEA research shows there are more than 200 Colombian groups operating in the U.S. to control the importation and distribution of cocaine.  Most groups are affiliated with either the Cali or the Medellin cartel, or two smaller cartels known to police as the Bogota Cartel and the North Atlantic Coast Cartel.  The main Colombian distribution center in the U.S. is Miami, which has 128 groups, followed by New York with 52 and Los Angeles with 28.  The groups are tightly compartmentalized, with managers who don't know other groups' operations.  Lower-level Colombians called "Mopes," who know little more than their immediate supervisors, are flown into the U.S. to act as "stash house keepers" and "dollar couriers," said Mr. Baker.  Although the U.S. has made some headway in understanding and prosecuting some parts of the sprawling Colombian supply organizations, both Messrs.  Baker and Westrate said their agencies need more resources to cope with money laundering, sophisticated operations that funnel billions out of the U.S. into banks in such money havens as Switzerland and Panama.  Bruce Carnes, planning director of the Office of National Drug Control Policy, estimated that the Medellin cartel may have made as much as $75 billion to $110 billion selling cocaine in the U.S.  A lot of that money, he explains, remains in the U.S. in the form of bribes, salaries and other costs of doing business.  Fabio Castillo, a Colombian newspaper columnist who received death threats after writing a book about the cartels, told the subcommittee that in the future, the Cali cartel may become the most powerful cocaine organization because it has been working harder than the others to ingratiate itself with Colombian politicians and has distributed some of its money to the poor.  Sen. William V. Roth (R., Del.), the ranking minority member of the subcommittee, said its investigation showed that "there are tremendous gaps in our government's knowledge" about the cartels and how they operate.  "Although we have learned a great deal, we have just touched the tip of the iceberg."  Zenith National Insurance Corp. said its board authorized the buy-back of as many as one million shares, or about 4.9% of its common stock over time in the open market or in privately negotiated transactions.  The worker's compensation insurance company recently completed a similar buy-back over nine months at a total cost of $18.2 million.  Zenith's largest shareholder is Saul Steinberg's Philadelphia-based Reliance Insurance Co., which owns 30.6% of the 20.5 million shares outstanding.  The brokerage unit of Scott & Stringfellow Financial Inc. agreed to acquire substantially all assets of Investment Corp. of Virginia for about 200,000 Scott & Stringfellow shares.  The exact number of shares to be issued will be based on the relative book value of the two companies before the acquisition is completed.  Scott & Stringfellow, formed in 1893, operates 23 offices, in Virginia, West Virginia and North Carolina.  In the fiscal year ended June 30, it earned $1.1 million, or 60 cents a share.  Investment Corp. of Virginia, founded in 1927, provides brokerage and investment-banking services.  Wang Laboratories Inc. unveiled a new midrange minicomputer line, the VS 8000 series, to replace its VS 7000 line.  The new products, with a base price of $80,000 for the VS 8200 and $240,000 for the VS 8400, are available immediately.  Wang said it shipped 11 systems to early customers.  It said the new systems are as much as three times more powerful than the VS 7000 series.  The Tokyo Stock Exchange reportedly has eased its listing requirements for foreign stocks, effective Oct. 1, and is considering broadening exchange membership.  Under current regulations, the exchange requires that foreign stocks be listed on the exchange of the home country for two years or registered with the U.S. National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotations system and listed on an exchange outside the home country.  Kyodo News Service reported from Tokyo that the exchange has decided to remove the requirement that a Nasdaq stock be listed at an exchange outside the home country.  Furthermore, if a stock continues to be traded on the over-the-counter market for two years and information on the stock's quote is available instantaneously, it may be listed on the Tokyo exchange, officials reportedly said.  Tokyo Stock Exchange chief Minoru Nagaoka also told reporters that a special committee is studying the possibility of granting exchange membership to more foreign securities companies.  The committee will hold discussions on that proposal in November and December, he said.  Few who've been there would disagree that the grounds of Michael Murphy & Sons are an amusement park for adult sportsmen.  The pristine lake offers five-star fly-rodding for big, bulldogging bluegill and acrobatic large-mouth bass; the challenging sporting-clays course is an excellent place to try a custom shotgun.  Yet the real thrills lie within the native stone walls of the gun shop.  Safes filled with fine shotguns hold as much excitement and promise for a firearms connoisseur as does a box of shiny new crayons for a child.  While browsing through the Berettas, Ferlibs, Weatherbys, Arrietas and the like you will come across something that most would think out of place in a premier gun shop.  Along with the finest sporting arms in the world, Mr. Murphy sells air rifles, guns that use compressed air rather than burned powder to propel a projectile.  The thought of such guns often brings flashbacks of adolescence and plinking tin cans with inexpensive and often inaccurate weapons.  Yet air guns have been around for centuries, and were developed to be anything but toys.  "We know there have been air guns in existence for 400 years," said Robert Beeman, president of Beeman Precision Arms Inc. of Santa Rosa, Calif., and a noted airgun expert.  "By the late 1700s there were some very sophisticated military air guns.  For instance, there was a .51-caliber air gun that could fire 10 shots in as many seconds and be lethal to 200 yards.  Remember, this was a time when powder guns were still loaded down the barrel {which took up to a minute per shot}."  But air rifles designed for adults all but faded from the American shooting scene with the advent of cheaper and more reliable cartridge-loading guns.  The past decade, however, has seen the cycle start to reverse.  Ironically the current limitations on cartridge-firing firearms are partially responsible for the skyrocketing popularity of adult air guns.  The combination of tighter gun laws and an increasingly urban society is making it more and more difficult for many Americans to find a place to shoot firearms.  Busy schedules also are limiting how much time shooters can spend traveling to and from gun ranges.  According to Mr. Murphy, many have simply opted for a hassle-free alternative to their beloved sport.  "Even in an area with the strictest of gun laws it's easy for someone to use an air gun," said Mr. Murphy, whose shop sits a few miles north of this Wichita suburb.  "One of their real beauties is that you can shoot them in your backyard, home or office."  Using specially made but inexpensive metal traps, air-gun shooters can have target practice inside with minimal danger.  The guns' near-silence also will not offend shooters -- or their neighbors.  Another big attraction has been the continuing development of adult air rifles by such companies as Mr. Beeman's, RWS of Germany and others.  Comparing the Beemans in Mr. Murphy's shop to the tiny and cheaply made Red Ryders of our youth is, as one observer said, "like comparing a Mercedes to a moped."  Quality adult air rifles rival their large, cartridge-firing counterparts in size, feel, options -- and accuracy.  The trio of fine air rifles that Mr. Murphy laid upon a table were all crafted of thick, beautifully finished hardwood and quality steel.  They pointed and balanced as well as most hunting rifles, and each was topped with a specially designed telescopic sight.  Adult air guns also come in a variety of sizes and calibers, some of which can shoot a pellet at a velocity of more than 1,000 feet per second.  Though the lead pellets fired by an air rifle can cost as little as a penny a shot, the purchase prices of adult air rifles and conventional rifles are comparable.  Good air rifles can cost from a few hundred dollars to several thousand, depending on components and specialized accessories.  Messrs.  Beeman and Murphy said adult air guns are becoming increasingly attractive to varied segments of society.  "Many avid big game hunters have one in their office and home so they can practice shooting whenever they have a few free minutes," said Mr. Murphy.  "You also can use specially designed pellets for hunting small game or as a selective, clean and humane way {in comparison to poison} to control vermin like feral pigeons or rats.  "But the biggest potential might be for people who don't hunt very much or maybe not at all," Mr. Murphy added.  "They're simply a lot of fun to shoot."  After his shop closed for the day, Mr. Murphy took the three air rifles, a pellet trap, and an assortment of ammo and targets to his guest quarters.  The trap was placed at the end of a hall and a table topped with couch cushions for a gun rest was pulled up 30 feet away.  Mr. Murphy spent a few seconds demonstrating how to cock and load the rifles and then turned them over to a pair of neophytes.  Four consecutive shots fired by one of his guests opened a pea-sized hole where the speck of a bullseye used to be.  Another target was hung, followed by another, and another, and . . .  "It's kind of like eating peanuts, isn't it?" said Mr. Murphy.  "Once you start it's tough to stop."  The umpteenth sounds of lead smacking metal and a rifle being cocked served as a quick answer to his question.  ---  Mr. Pearce is a free-lance writer in Manhattan, Kan.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a General Motors Corp. unit, won a $98 million Army contract for anti-tank missiles.  Lockheed Corp. got a $63.5 million Air Force contract for four C-130 aircraft.  Ames Department Stores Inc. said it completed the previously announced sale of its G.C. Murphy Co. variety store operations to E-II Holdings Inc., a unit of Riklis Family Corp., for $77.6 million.  The discount retailer said the final selling price is subject to post-audit adjustment.  The company said the sale isn't expected to have a material impact on its earnings.  Ames said it will use the net after-tax proceeds of about $55 million to reduce long-term bank debt incurred when it bought the Zayre stores division last year.  The European Community lashed back at U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills yesterday, a day after she revived charges that the 12-nation bloc is building a protectionist "Fortress Europe."  An EC spokesman said Europeans could raise some complaints of their own about U.S. trade practices.  He cited U.S. trade law that allows Washington to take unilateral action against trade partners, the recent U.S. extension of so-called voluntary export restraints in steel, and the still-unsettled hormone-treated beef dispute.  He also defended EC rules on local content in manufacturing, which came under fire from Mrs. Hills during a speech in Paris on Monday.  "Our system of local content rules is practically identical to that of the U.S.," said Nico Wegter, a spokesman for Frans Andriessen, EC vice president for external affairs and trade relations.  "It is not a protectionist regime," he said.  "It is needed to prevent the circumvention of anti-dumping rules."  Mrs. Hills is to meet with Mr. Andriessen in Brussels Saturday.  The EC requires that manufactured goods have a certain proportion of their components made within the EC in order to qualify as EC-made.  Mrs. Hills charged Monday that the EC was using local content rules to force non-EC companies to relocate plants to Europe.  International Lease Finance Corp. said it placed three aircraft with two foreign airlines in a transaction valued at $220 million.  The company leased two new Boeing Co. 767-300 widebody aircraft to Air New Zealand for seven years under a $155 million contract, to be delivered by Boeing in February 1991 and January 1992.  In the second transaction, the company leased a Boeing 747-200 to Korean Airlines for 5 1/2 years, with extension options.  The aircraft, acquired from Singapore Airlines, is scheduled for delivery in July 1990.  Sometimes I tease animals.  Also, I feel useless at times, and I occasionally feel that I'm about to go to pieces.  Once in a while, I feel like smashing things.  Is that weird?  Only the Minnesota Multiphasic Personality Inventory can say for sure.  The MMPI, the world's most widely used psychological assessment test, sorts through responses to 567 such statements and determines, among other things, just how paranoid, depressed, manic or anxious a person really is.  The MMPI even thinks it can tell if you're lying: Only a flaming liar would respond "true" to the statement "I never tell a lie."  Despite the test's reputation as an uncannily accurate device for detecting people's peculiarities, however, users thought the MMPI had some quirks of its own.  So in 1982, the University of Minnesota Press, publisher of the test, appointed four psychologists to examine its baby.  Their diagnosis: MMPI was dated, sexist and excessively preoccupied with sexual adjustment, bodily functions and religiosity.  Last month, an updated and supposedly gender-neutral version of MMPI was released, with more than 250 true/false statements added, deleted or changed.  Some of the alterations are simply linguistic, omitting, for example, the word "his" as it is used to apply to both sexes.  But the latest edition also includes new items intended to sniff out such aberrant behavior as drug abuse, eating disorders and Type A personality, which weren't in vogue when the test was first published in 1942.  People whom the original MMPI showed to have personality problems, however, won't find themselves ignored (and certainly not cured) by MMPI-2.  The 10 clinical scales by which MMPI measures a personality are essentially unchanged by the new statements.  But now instead of saying, "A person should try to understand his dreams and be guided by or take warning from them," the statement seeking a response reads, "People should try to understand their dreams . . ."  Sexism in language, farewell.  The statement "I used to like drop-the-handkerchief" has been removed, too.  Anachronisms, bye-bye.  New statements to which test subjects are asked to respond include: "Others tell me I eat too fast."  "I work very long hours even though my job doesn't require this."  And, "Once a week or more I get high or drunk."  Welcome to the 1980s.  With statements that seem so transparent, disguising one's true personality might appear to be a breeze for the would-be test-thwarter.  But a given response doesn't necessarily mean what it seems to mean.  And the dishonest test-taker tends to be tripped up by the lie scale.  Actually, MMPI contains three validity scales, intended to measure whether subjects are trying to appear superior or pathetic or if they're responding carelessly.  MMPI is widely used by psychologists and psychiatrists in clinical settings, but it has become increasingly popular as a job-screening tool, too, especially in high-risk, high-stress occupations like firefighting, commercial flying and operating nuclear reactors.  "The folks you don't want freaking out during an emergency," says Val Arnold, a vice president of Personnel Decisions Inc., an industrial-organizational psychology consulting firm in Minneapolis.  The brilliant thing about the test, Mr. Arnold says, is that it not only detects abnormality, but it also suggests "which way a person is going to crack."  As MMPI over the years came to be used more and more in employment, academia and the military, its publishers got a bit squeamish about items on such delicate matters as excreta and sexual preference.  "People resented their being asked about bowel and bladder functions in job screening," says Beverly Kaemmer, MMPI manager at the University of Minnesota Press.  "And the scales functioned well without those items."  Furthermore, "the test overidentified conservative Christians as having mental problems," Mr. Arnold says.  "If you believe in God and you believe in miracles, there's nothing particularly crazy about that.  But if it's not part of your religious faith, you might be suffering delusions."  The original MMPI was developed during the 1930s and 1940s by a psychologist and a psychiatrist looking for an efficient way to diagnose mental problems.  But because their research was begun during the Depression, the developers had a limited budget for assembling the so-called normative population, against which deviant behavior would be measured.  They eventually used 700 rural Minnesotans, most of them recruited while visiting sick friends or relatives at the University of Minnesota hospital.  The typical test subject was a 35-year-old with an eighth-grade education; most of the women were housewives, the men were skilled or semiskilled laborers.  The new normative population is larger -- about 2,600 people -- and encompasses a wider range of socioeconomic groups from seven communities across the nation.  Their responses are then compared with those of addicts, alcoholics, people in chronic pain and other troubled types.  "Here's a group that rapes, murders and steals," says Mr. Arnold.  "And here's a group that goes to church.  You start to see that there are very definite differences in the way they answer questions like, 'I like tall women,' or 'I like a shower rather than a bath.' But I think it's a mystery to the people who developed it why it works."  In other words, if pyromaniacs as a group prefer showers and tall women, among other things, and you do too, maybe, just maybe, you ought not to work for the fire department.  MMPI's publishers say the test shouldn't be used alone to diagnose psychological problems or in hiring; it should be given in conjunction with other tests.  But if a job candidate does poorly on MMPI, that will at the very least provide good grist for a job interview.  "The test might say you're a raving lunatic and then we'd interview you to see if it's true," says Mr. Arnold.  Legal challenges from hapless job seekers who find discrimination and privacy-invasion in the test haven't succeeded in court either, according to James Butcher, a professor of psychology at the University of Minnesota and one of the psychologists who oversaw the recent sprucing up of MMPI. Firefighters in Jersey City, N.J., lost a suit opposing MMPI because, the judge said, a municipality should be able to use whatever means it has at its disposal to ensure the mental stability of workers in high-stress jobs.  Mr. Butcher thinks the judge has a point.  "The test does sort people out," he says.  "Every time I'm flying in the back of a 747, I'm happy to know that the guy in front isn't planning to dive the plane into the sea."  Scandinavian Airlines System has held informal talks with Texas Air Corp. about buying all or part of its Continental Airlines unit, SAS President Jan Carlzon said.  If Continental Airlines "is up for sale," he said, "we will be there to talk and consider the possibilities."  Stockholm-based SAS, 50%-owned by the governments of Sweden, Norway and Denmark, holds a 9.9% stake in Texas Air as part of a marketing arrangement with Continental and Texas Air announced last fall.  Last month, individuals familiar with the situation said SAS and an unidentified partner were in advanced talks with Texas Air about the possible sale of Continental Airlines.  Mr. Carlzon declined to say whether the informal talks have involved a U.S. partner.  U.S. rules prevent foreign companies from having more than a 25% stake in a U.S. airline, and so any transaction would have to be structured so that SAS has a minority holding.  A group including Formica Corp.'s managers completed the $305 million acquisition of the laminates maker.  Also included in the group, which paid $19 a share for the Wayne, N.J., company, are a limited partnership organized by investment bank Dillon, Read & Co., and Masco Corp., a Taylor, Mich., building and home-improvement products company.  The group had received about 86% of Formica's shares under a tender offer that expired in May.  Each of the rest of the shares was converted to the right to receive $19.  The takeover group has agreed, subject to court approval, to settle litigation that had challenged an earlier, $18-a-share takeover proposal as inadequate.  Polar Molecular Corp. said it received a patent for its DuraFlo winter fuel conditioner.  The product is designed to improve performance of No. 2 diesel fuel in cold conditions that can cause diesel to gel.  Polar said its conditioner will keep diesel flowing to at least minus 25 degrees Fahrenheit, without having to dilute the fuel with premium diesel or kerosene.  Polar Molecular also said the product helps keep fuel injector nozzles clean and reduce harmful emissions.  Advest Inc., a unit of Advest Group Inc., agreed to acquire the retail offices of Newhard, Cook & Co., a St. Louis-based investment brokerage firm with 20 branch offices.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Advest said negotiations for the purchase of the rest of Newhard Cook's businesses will continue.  Advest Inc. is the brokerage subsidiary of Advest Group, a financial services concern.  The improvement in the broadest gauge of the U.S. trade deficit appears to be stalling, as many economists feared it would.  For the second consecutive quarter, the deficit in the balance of payments on the U.S. current account widened, the Commerce Department reported.  The deficit, which measures the country's trade in services, including financial transactions, as well as goods, expanded to $30.99 billion in the second quarter from $30.39 billion in the first quarter, the department said.  In the fourth quarter of 1988 this trade gap was $28.68 billion.  All the numbers were adjusted for seasonal variations.  An improvement in the country's huge deficit in trade of goods was eclipsed by a rare deficit in trade in services, a category that includes earnings on overseas investments.  A government analyst said the shift from a $1.51 billion surplus to a $176 million deficit was the first time since 1958 that the country posted a deficit in trade in services.  The government reported a services deficit in a recent quarter, but after collecting more data revised it to a small surplus.  The deterioration in services trade is troubling to economists.  "We are having to pay {to foreigners} a significant amount of what we produce in this country just as interest and dividends on money we've borrowed in the past to finance the current account deficit," said Frederick Ribe, assistant director for fiscal analysis at the Congressional Budget Office and an author of a recent CBO report on the current account deficit.  The size of the current account deficit alarms many economists and government policy makers because it means the country must borrow increasing amounts from abroad to finance its economy.  This, they say, inevitably will erode the standard of living of future generations.  The U.S. ran a current account surplus until 1982.  The deficit swelled substantially until 1987 when it began to shrink modestly.  But the persistence of U.S. budget deficits, the recent strength of the dollar and other factors have stopped the improvement.  The nation's merchandise trade deficit shrank to $27.72 billion in the second quarter from $28.39 billion in the first quarter.  The deficit in service trade primarily reflects financial flows, such as interest and dividend payments.  The U.S. ran a $4.84 billion surplus on such non-financial services as tourism and air travel in the second quarter.  But that surplus was overwhelmed by a deficit of $5.02 billion in financial trade.  For instance, dividend payments to foreigners who own businesses in the U.S. rose to $3.92 billion from $3.17 billion.  In contrast, payments to the U.S. from investments overseas fell to $7.77 billion from $9.14 billion, partly reflecting the bookkeeping effects of a strong dollar.  The Commerce Department added that Americans increased their holdings of foreign stocks by a record $4.1 billion in the second quarter, far exceeding the previous high of $1.9 billion set in the first three months of 1986.  The department also said that foreign purchases of U.S. Treasury securities in the second quarter dropped to $2.7 billion from $8.6 billion, largely because Japanese investors were heavy sellers in June.  U.S. government payments to foreigners, largely interest on government debt, rose to $8.59 billion from $8.32 billion.  Syncor International Corp. said its board approved a plan to buy back 1.5 million shares of its common stock, or 15% of its common shares outstanding, for about $10 million.  The shares to be purchased are owned by Compagnie Oris Industrie, the health care division of the Atomic Energy Commission of France and a supplier to Syncor.  Syncor, based here, is a maker and distributor of advanced medical diagnostic products.  This city threw itself a big party last week and entered the 21st century.  With the long-awaited and much delayed completion of I.M. Pei's Morton H. Meyerson Symphony Center, Dallas made a lavish gesture toward shaking itself loose from the Texas economic slump and symbolically readied itself for better times ahead.  Several years behind schedule and more than twice the original $40 million budget, the new symphony hall has sparked its own share of political protests (too much elitism in troubled times, cry its populist critics).  But cavils were mostly muted last Friday when the hall opened officially, at a black-tie gala that featured the Dallas Symphony Orchestra under the baton of Eduardo Mata, its conductor of 12 years.  It was an appropriately Texas-size opening, from the grandeur of the ladies' gowns and the abundance of champagne and canapes, to the choice of music for the inaugural concert: two great Romantic blockbusters, Mahler's Resurrection Symphony and the Tchaikovsky First Piano Concerto, played by Van Cliburn.  The DSO has suffered for years from having to perform in the cavernous and acoustically deadly Fair Park Music Hall, where one could often see, but seldom hear, a soloist playing a concerto with the orchestra.  Since the Pei building was barely finished in time for the opening, and since the orchestra had inadequate rehearsal time in the hall before opening night, no final appraisals can be made.  But from the looks (and sound) of things, Dallas has got something to be proud of.  In the Meyerson (so named to honor the Electronic Data Systems business associate of Ross Perot, who donated $10 million for the construction of the hall), Mr. Pei has combined his fondness for open, monumental space with a feeling for the intimate warmth (of sight as well as sound) that permeates the world's best concert halls.  His building is a study in contrasts.  Postmodernism has met Piranesi.  Swirling arcs and circular shapes (notably in the vast conoid window that offers a fabulous view of the Dallas skyline to the south and west) fancifully play off against the limestone, glass and marble building, which contains a shoebox hall placed catty-cornered within a larger rectangle.  The lobby is a grand public space that may seem cold when empty and should therefore be as filled with throngs as it was on opening night.  But it prepares the concert-goer with a sense of the magnitude of the experience that awaits within the hall itself.  Inside, however, tasteful restraint replaces grandeur.  The city made the daring decision to construct a small auditorium in order to duplicate the acoustical excellences of the best concert halls in Amsterdam, Vienna and Boston.  The Eugene McDermott Concert Hall (named in memory of one of the founders of Texas Instruments Inc.) holds 2,066 seats, about 200 of them in the choral terrace on the stage.  It is rich but simple, elegant but never plush or vulgar.  It puts to shame the Metropolitan Opera in more ways than one.  Onyx panels, with Josef Hoffmann-inspired designs, light up the balcony fronts.  Warm earth tones complement the stone floors.  The walls are richly panelled in African makore and American cherry woods.  The hall is square in cross-section (85 feet wide by 84 feet high) and relatively narrow.  Mr. Pei chose this shape for his first concert hall primarily to assure proper sound.  On this matter, judgment will have to wait.  Russell Johnson of Artec Consultants Inc., a New York acoustical firm, has designed three innovations for the chamber, the first and most controversial of which is as yet inoperable.  Over the stage hangs an enormous steel-and-wood canopy (in the shape of a boat bottom), supposedly capable of being raised or lowered to meet the needs of individual performances.  So far, it is stationary and likely to remain so for several months, at least until the safety of the mechanism can be guaranteed.  Additionally, Mr. Johnson has provided a 30-foot-deep chamber that surrounds the hall's upper level with a series of acoustical doors that may be opened or closed, and a set of acoustical curtains that can adjust sonic reverberation.  Since the orchestra had almost no time to get used to the hall and to itself, opinions about last week's performances may be premature.  The hall sounded for the most part bright rather than warm; the lower strings (in the Mahler) tended to get lost, although it's hard to know whether to fault the hall, the players or the conductor, and whether the problem is remediable.  On the plus side, the most delicate pianissimi are perfectly audible if not always resonant.  In the Tchaikovsky one could hear the balance between soloist and ensemble even in the biggest passages.  After the opening night, the gala continued.  A street fair over the weekend made one think, for a moment, that downtown Dallas just might become a truly urban space rather than a series of office buildings left eerily depopulated after dark.  Other events also followed in the hall: the Kronos Quartet played before a wildly appreciative audience that had a different kind of blue hair from that sported by Dallas society's grandes dames.  On Sunday evening, a stirring performance of the Verdi Requiem confirmed at least one critic's sense that it was perhaps not the fault of the hall that Mahler had sounded murky two nights before.  Now, Maestro Mata was perfectly capable of coaxing whispers from the chorus and bringing out the full operatic grandeur of both orchestral and vocal parts.  Two Met veterans, Tatiana Troyanos and Paul Plishka, were in perfect form and ably encouraged two relative newcomers, Susan Dunn and Richard Leech; all of their sounds resonated.  So did Mstislav Rostropovich's cello in his solo recital on Monday.  Leontyne Price brought the celebration to a close last night.  The Meyerson seems to have justified its high cost, which may soon seem like a bargain to people in Los Angeles and Philadelphia now planning new concert halls.  Costs have escalated everywhere.  But cutting corners will always spell disaster for this kind of enterprise.  The Meyerson owes its existence to the exuberant confidence of Dallas leaders during a period in the recent past when everything seemed possible.  In an age of diminished economic expectations and a growing skepticism about the place or value of the arts, Dallas made its bid for greatness fortuitously.  Sitting across the street from, and complementing, the equally handsome Dallas Museum of Art that Edward Larrabee Barnes designed several years back, the Meyerson may very well be the last great American piece of architecture for music for a long time to come.  ---  Mr. Spiegelman writes frequently about the arts from Dallas.  Thor Industries Inc. said it planned to buy 238,000 shares of its common stock from an institutional investor.  The maker of recreational vehicles said the purchase represents about 5% of its stock outstanding and "reflects management's and the board's strong confidence in Thor's future."  My compliments to Ruth Rudner for her Aug. 30 Leisure & Arts essay "Yellowstone a Year Later."  Its detailed vividness was truly a tone poem.  And this was aside from its importance to our understanding that "nature wastes nothing."  Judge Lloyd Buchanan  Safety Harbor, Fla.  Faculty retirements and fewer doctorate degrees will produce a shortage of professors in main academic areas starting in 1997, says a new study of the college labor market.  The most acute shortages will be in the humanities and social sciences, where qualified candidates will be available for only 71% of the jobs, the study said.  Overall, it saw six posts for every five candidates in the arts and sciences between 1997 and 2007.  If true, the predictions pose problems for colleges.  Schools may be forced to increase pay to attract more professors, a move that could raise tuitions and drive students away.  Or they could be forced to lower hiring standards.  The authors recommended more federal support for graduate study.  In mathematics and the physical sciences, the new analysis saw candidates for 80% of the jobs, while in the biological sciences and psychology, a surplus was forecast.  The study, "Prospects for Faculty in the Arts and Sciences," was released as a book yesterday.  Its authors are William Bowen, president of the Mellon Foundation and Julie Ann Sosa, a student at Oxford University.  Mr. Bowen and Ms. Sosa said the shortages will come about because of exits by an aging faculty and the shift in student tastes to more vocationally oriented college education, which produces fewer professorial candidates.  John Baden lamented in his Manager's Journal (editorial page, Aug. 21) that "no executive business or MBA program effectively prepares management to make discriminating choices on environmental matters."  That has changed.  The National Wildlife Federation's Corporate Conservation Council sponsored development of exactly such a curriculum, for which a pilot course was introduced Aug. 30 as an elective for the MBA program at Boston University.  Other courses will be offered next spring in business schools at University of Texas (Dallas), University of Minnesota, and Loyola University (New Orleans).  The council's course-development project includes creation of an extensive database inventory of environmental/business-management materials, which eventually will be made available to instructors nationwide.  Also, new materials are being prepared and tested in the pilot courses.  Among these are case studies of current business/environmental decisions, such as Du Pont's CFC phase-out.  We agree with Mr. Baden.  Environmental issues must be taken into account in corporate America's bottom line.  Jay D. Hair  President  National Wildlife Federation  Philip X. Masciantonio  Vice President  USX Environmental Affairs  and Chairman  Corporate Conservation Council  Washington  Upjohn Co. said it is seeking federal approval to market its Rogaine anti-baldness drug to women with hereditary hair thinning, a move that could expand the pool of the remedy's possible users by 67%.  Upjohn said it submitted for U.S. Food and Drug Administration evaluation clinical studies it conducted on the use of Rogaine by women with androgenetic alopecia.  The company estimated that 20 million women in the U.S. are affected by the condition.  Upjohn currently has FDA approval to market the prescription drug to an estimated 30 million men with pattern baldness.  An Upjohn spokeswoman said the company planned to market Rogaine to women all along.  However, FDA approval for using the drug on men came first because Upjohn didn't test the product on enough women initially.  Upjohn said it began testing Rogaine on women in 1987, about four years after tests on balding men began.  Although Upjohn banked on strong Rogaine sales, and spent heavily to advertise the product, results have been below expectations.  Analysts predicted annual sales could reach $200 million this year, but shortly after the advertising campaigns began earlier this year, sales hit only $4 million a month.  Resorts International Inc., the troubled casino company owned by Merv Griffin, received a $50 million offer from Showboat Inc. for a lease on a 10.5-acre parcel of land in Atlantic City, N.J., that the company had been trying to sell for months with little success.  Resorts, which has halted interest payments on $925 million of secured and unsecured notes, plans to unveil a financial restructuring plan to its bondholders next week.  While Showboat officials insist that they have received no response on the offer, a Resorts spokesman said the bid was rejected.  He said the company has received "expressions of interest" on the 99-year lease that are "substantially higher" than the $50 million Showboat offer.  The spokesman declined to say whether the company was in negotiations with any potential buyers.  Frank Modica, president of Showboat's casino-hotels in Las Vegas, Nev., and Atlantic City, said the company made the offer about 10 days ago, shortly after Resorts announced its debt payment moratorium.  Showboat, based in Las Vegas, currently pays Resorts about $7 million a year to lease the land under the Atlantic City Showboat, a 516-room property that opened in April 1987.  Resorts had been trying to sell the parcel along the Boardwalk for several months, but had originally estimated that it would fetch as much as $120 million, a figure most industry experts said was unrealistically high.  Raymond E. Neidl, a junk bond analyst with Dillon, Read & Co., estimated that the parcel would fetch perhaps $50 million or $60 million in the current market.  "We wanted to give them time to think about it, but we haven't heard anything back, no counteroffer," Mr. Modica said.  "They had overvalued it, but we think it's a fair offer."  Mr. Griffin had planned to sell some non-casino assets, including the Showboat lease, when he bought the company for $365 million last November.  Resorts hasn't been able to sell many of those assets, which has contributed to its current cashflow problems.  In a letter to bondholders dated Aug. 28, Mr. Griffin said Morgan Guaranty Trust has agreed to provide Resorts a $50 million line of credit secured by the Showboat lease, and is continuing to explore a sale of the parcel.  Mr. Griffin is scheduled for casino licensing hearings before New Jersey regulators on Sept. 25.  Eli Lilly & Co. said it halted the distribution of all drugs made at one of its Indianapolis plants and recalled 10 drugs after federal inspectors found widespread quality-control problems at the facility.  A spokesman for the Indianapolis-based drug maker said the company has started a broad review of its production procedures that could result in additional recalls if more problems are uncovered.  In a statement, Lilly said it is "confident that there are no safety or efficacy issues involved with the lots to be recalled."  The recalled drugs include several forms of darvon, methadone, two anti-infectives and an anti-inflammatory agent.  Lilly's spokesman said the drugs were mostly "older line products" sold either under the Lilly or Dista labels.  He said they constitute a relatively small part of Lilly's tablet and capsule production and would have no impact on the company's financial results.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Lilly's shares fell 75 cents to close at $59.625.  The investigation by the Food and Drug Administration did not include Lilly's largest drug lines such as its oral antibiotic, Ceclor, or Prozac, its anti-depressant drug.  Burton Love, the FDA's Midwest regional director, said Lilly voluntarily halted distribution from its Indianapolis plant and initiated the recall.  "We don't disagree with those actions," Mr. Love said.  The inspectors' 90-page report sharply criticizes Lilly's quality-control procedures.  During a four-month investigation, the federal inspectors said they found "objectionable conditions in nearly every area inspected."  The problems centered on poor record keeping, including missing recall records and follow-up data on drugs that failed to retain their stability or potency.  The inspectors also criticized Lilly's failure to adequately train its quality-control officers.  In one case the inspectors said dozens of Lilly's products went through major reformulations without any follow-up stability tests.  The inspectors' report said Lilly had numerous production problems with its darvon compounds, some of which resulted in recalls.  The company's ulcer drug Axid also had to be recalled after it failed to dissolve properly.  The inspectors reported that some of Lilly's codeine sulfate tablets failed stability and dissolving tests.  In some cases, the inspectors said Lilly failed to maintain records documenting problems leading up to recalls or detailing follow-up investigations.  Lilly's spokesman said that as a result of the FDA's findings the company has recalled 18 product batches covering 10 items.  "It's possible other lots can be affected" if additional problems are found, he said.  To date, Lilly has recalled five of its drug products this year and had two recalls last year.  "We had one or two product recalls in each of the previous years," the spokesman said.  Lilly said it expects to resume distribution from its Indianapolis plant within several weeks on a product-by-product basis.  The company said it halted distribution from the plant Aug. 25 after it received a copy of the FDA inspection report.  Despite the widespread problems uncovered at the Indianapolis plant, Mr. Love said the FDA had no immediate plans to extend its investigation to Lilly's other plants.  Instead, he said the agency was leaving it up to Lilly to conduct its own internal investigation of quality-control procedures at the plants.  FDA inspectors will follow up on Lilly's findings, Mr. Love said.  Spiegel Inc. is joining forces with actress Candice Bergen to create an unusual Christmas gift catalog.  The move is part of a growing trend by retailers to associate themselves with celebrities as a way to polish their images and differentiate themselves from competitors.  K mart Corp., for instance, has hired cookbook and entertainment writer Martha Stewart to help design and sell private-label household goods.  But Spiegel, based in Oak Brook, Ill., appears to be going a step further by devoting an entire catalog -- albeit a slim one -- to items selected by a celebrity.  The book is an outgrowth of a recent Spiegel ad, featuring an unusual candleholder with a monkey on the base that Ms. Bergen actually bought from Spiegel last November.  The understated ad, which ran last spring in such magazines as Vogue and Metropolitan Home, did better at drumming up new customers than Spiegel expected.  "Most retailers have used celebrities simply as a means to hype products," say Robert Parker, the catalog company's director of sales promotion.  "What we've done is used a celebrity, based on her real behavior, and asked her to help us edit a Christmas gift book."  The book, entitled "Candice Bergen's 42 Last-Minute Christmas Gift Ideas," will be mailed in November to one million of Spiegel's five million active customers.  In an introductory note, Ms. Bergen will explain why she likes shopping by catalog, especially during the busy Christmas season when stores are swamped.  She will go on to promote 42 clothing and decorative items, including a leather bomber jacket, a watch and a gum-ball machine.  Thomas Tashjian, an analyst at Seidler Amdec Securities Inc. in Los Angeles, said Ms. Bergen could help Spiegel because her television show, "Murphy Brown," is extremely popular.  Her character, a busy television journalist, is successful and has little time to shop.  "She probably capsulizes what their customers would like to be like," Mr. Tashjian adds.  Three quarters of Spiegel's customers are, in fact, working women.  "Today's busy woman is inundated with options and choices," says the company's Mr. Parker.  "What she's looking for is somebody to simplify her life and edit for her.  We thought that Candice Bergen would be the perfect choice."  Mr. Parker added that Spiegel, the nation's third-largest catalog company with sales of $1.4 billion last year, doesn't expect the new catalog to have a big impact on profit.  "What we're really looking at is image value and understanding how to build a stronger relationship with our customers," Mr. Parker said.  He described the gift book as "sophisticated and understated," and said Ms. Bergen's picture won't appear in it.  Mr. Parker declined to say how much Spiegel will pay Ms. Bergen for choosing the items and lending her name to the project.  Over the past two years, Spiegel has also run ads featuring items purchased by Jacqueline Bisset, Priscilla Presley and Bianca Jagger.  Eighty-four percent of Spiegel's stock is owned by the Otto family of West Germany.  The family also controls Otto-Versand G.m.b.H., one of the largest mail-order houses in Europe.  When Granada Corp. announced two weeks ago that it intended to repackage its six cattle-feeding limited partnerships into two publicly traded corporations, the company was besieged by phone callers -- more than 900 a day.  Most of the calls weren't nice.  Investors were furious that they were getting only $700 of stock for each $10,000 they had invested -- not including the tax benefits they had received.  They threatened lawsuits, grumbled about promises unfulfilled and wailed about brokers who may have oversold the partnerships' tax benefits and profit potential.  So goes another crash-landing in the battered limited partnership business.  Just as hundreds of the once-popular partnerships in oil and gas and real estate have failed in the past few years, now cattle partnerships are reaching the end of their lifespans and exposing their financial woes.  "I don't sell any more limited partnerships and never will again," vows Richard Bouckhout, a broker with Sun American Securities in Phoenix.  "The risk is so outrageous."  Mr. Bouckhout and about 60 of his customers purchased Granada units.  Cattle-feeding partnerships such as Granada's were once all the rage, providing investors with hefty tax write-offs and, occasionally, a nice profit, although that was a secondary consideration.  When it organized the partnerships in the 1970s, Granada thought it had devised a profitable vehicle both for itself and for investors.  Investors seemed to agree.  Some 20,000 of them poured $228 million into Integrated Cattle Systems V and Granada 1 through Granada 5.  Today, however, those six partnerships have a net book value of just $50 million.  The rest of the money disappeared as administrative fees, spending for research and losses on cattle feeding and the sale of breeding cattle, Granada says.  For Granada, the cattle-feeding partnerships were a godsend, providing funding then unavailable from banks, says David Eller, who owns Granada with his brother James.  "Basically, they were financing all the business of {Granada} with limited partnerships," says Spencer Jeffries, president of Partnership Profiles Inc., a Dallas firm that tracks limited partnerships.  Thanks to the partnerships, Granada was able to pioneer embryo transfer technology for cattle.  It developed the first successful cattle-cloning technique, which could lead to the production of more uniform, high-quality beef for packers.  It has gathered one of the largest herds of purebred cattle in the world and acquired a number of meat production companies.  In 1988, the company generated $1 billion in revenue and a profit of about $2 million.  But Granada's limited partners weren't so lucky.  As a prolonged cattle industry slump set in through the 1980s, many cattle-feeding partnerships -- including Granada's -- started racking up persistent losses.  Indeed, the slump drove many of those partnerships and their sponsors out of the cattle business, even before the tax-law changes in 1986 curbed the partnerships' value as tax shelters.  And unlike real estate partnerships, which at least ended up owning apartments and office buildings, cattle partnerships wound up with few, if any, assets to cushion the blow.  The cattle were sold at a loss, draining equity.  Granada's partnerships took another hit as well.  As an extra inducement to investors, Granada shuffled the ownership of the cattle fed by the partnerships in such a way that, Granada's tax experts reasoned, any profits from partnership operations could be treated and taxed as capital gains, rather than ordinary income.  But in 1988 audits of Granada 2 and Granada 3, the Internal Revenue Service ruled that the partnership proceeds were ordinary income, thus increasing investors' tax liability.  The ruling came as a surprise, Granada officials say, because the IRS had approved capital-gains treatment on Granada's previous partnerships.  In explaining its reversal of previous rulings, the IRS told the company the transactions appeared to be simply an attempt to avoid taxes, instead of serving a legitimate business purpose.  It came as even more of a surprise to investors, who received tax bills for Granada 3 and Granada 4 just a couple of weeks ago.  A Dallas salesman who sank $55,000 into a Granada partnership says the IRS billed him for $40,000, the amount he had written off in 1985.  "And I thought I was wired into the best deal money could buy," he says sadly.  The prospectuses for each partnership advised investors to seek advice on the tax consequences.  Unfortunately, many investors, it appears, relied on their brokers' assurances that the tax benefits would pass IRS muster.  Granada defends its record as a sponsor of partnerships, arguing that they were sold as tax shelters, not as money-making ventures.  Only recently, Mr. Eller says, did he discover that some brokers "oversold" the partnerships, orally promising two-to-one and three-to-one returns on equity.  When investors "came charging through our doors, we found out" how the partnerships were sold, he says.  The partnerships were sold by hundreds of brokers at several large and small brokerage houses.  It is unclear, however, who did the overselling.  Mr. Bouckhout, the Phoenix broker, says that before he invested in and sold the Granada partnerships he was assured by company executives that earlier partnerships were profitable.  "The promises made by those folks {at Granada} and the agents selling for them were totally different from what this turned out to be," says Franklin Clark, a North Carolina doctor who invested $320,000 in Granada 2 and additional sums in other partnerships.  Granada's Mr. Eller says that four of the company's six partnerships gave investors positive returns after counting tax write-offs, even after the IRS ruling, although he isn't bragging about the figures.  Generally, Granada investors in the 50% tax bracket were able to amass enough write-offs to offset their original investment, says Kevin Gannon, Granada's vice president for corporate finance.  And with the stock Granada plans to distribute, returns on those partnerships over their seven-year life will range from 2.8% annually to 10.3% annually, he estimates.  The two new publicly traded companies being offered to investors have more potential than investors think, Granada officials say.  Though limited partners will receive only $700 in stock for each $10,000 invested, that valuation doesn't reflect the value of Granada's research or its patents, which will be held largely by the new corporations, Mr. Eller says.  Investors may still consider Granada's offering a pittance.  But Mr. Eller points out that it is more than the company was obligated to do.  According to the partnerships' prospectuses, Granada could simply liquidate, and the limited partners would get virtually nothing.  Granada doesn't need investor approval to invoke its plan.  Unless the SEC rejects the plan or investors get a court-ordered injunction, the stock will be distributed this fall.  Singer Michael Jackson will be moonwalking in L.A. Gear Inc. sneakers.  The footwear company is set to announce at a news conference in Hollywood today that it has reached an agreement with Mr. Jackson to serve as a celebrity spokesman, industry sources said.  L.A. Gear, of Marina del Rey, Calif., and Mr. Jackson's spokesmen declined to comment.  Terms of the agreement couldn't immediately be determined, although it is expected to be broader in scope than Mr. Jackson's former affiliation with PepsiCo Inc. Mr. Jackson has worked with Pepsi on various promotions during the past several years.  Most recently, Pepsi served as sponsor for the singer's 18-month world tour, an agreement that industry sources say was worth more than $10 million to Mr. Jackson.  The singer is working on a new greatest-hits album set for release this fall.  His affiliation with L.A. Gear may tie in with the album, the sources said.  L.A. Gear has a big celebrity sponsor in former Los Angeles Lakers basketball star Kareem Abdul-Jabbar.  Pop singer Belinda Carlisle was a spokeswoman for L.A. Gear, but she became embroiled in a legal dispute with the company over television commercials.  The average interest rate fell to 8.6150% at Citicorp's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, from 8.6557% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $590 million were submitted.  Accepted bids ranged from 8.61% to 8.62%.  Citicorp also said that the average rate fell to 8.385% at its $50 million auction of 182-day commercial paper from 8.4740% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $550 million were submitted.  Accepted bids ranged from 8.38% to 8.39%.  The bank holding company will auction another $50 million of each maturity next Tuesday.  Richard Posner's view of a Justice Holmes biography ("Bookshelf: Star of the Legal Stage," Leisure & Arts, Aug. 9) expresses admiration for the ideas and style of this Justice.  Perhaps the following might serve to round out the picture a bit more.  Prof.  Felix Frankfurter, who had clerked for Holmes, was also a great admirer of this "star" and never lost an opportunity to mention him favorably.  The only time Frankfurter exhibited the slightest hint of something less than awe or admiration was when he told his classes that Holmes did not believe in reading newspapers and, consequently, never read them -- this at a time when there were, of course, no other forms of news media.  No reason was ever given for this practice and one can only speculate.  Holmes's ideas and style contrasted with those of some of his contemporaries, especially as to the exclusionary rule to which Holmes was firmly committed.  On this subject the blunt spoken Chief Justice Taft wrote: "A standard which would forbid the reception into evidence if obtained by other than nice ethical conduct by government officials would make society suffer and give criminals greater immunity than has been known heretofore."  Holmes, in a somewhat disdainful dissent, noted: "We have to choose, and for my part I think it a lesser evil that some criminals should escape than that the government should play an ignoble part."  Holmes actually believed that if a policeman, without a proper warrant, discovered evidence incriminating a rapist or a murderer, that evidence should be discarded even if it meant letting the rapist or murderer go free.  This no doubt seemed perfectly sensible to someone who chose to insulate himself from the world and who was apparently completely out of touch with reality.  Albert Mayer  New York  The House Ethics Committee said it will conduct a preliminary inquiry into the case of Rep. Barney Frank (D., Mass.) who acknowledged hiring a male prostitute.  Rep. Frank asked for the inquiry after news stories described how he first hired Steve Gobie for sex, then employed him as a personal assistant paid from his own funds.  The congressman said he fired Mr. Gobie after discovering that he had been using the congressman's apartment here for prostitution.  One of the committee's 12 members, Rep. Chester Atkins (D., Mass.), excused himself from the case.  Rep. Atkins is Democratic party chairman in Massachusetts.  He said, "Barney Frank is my friend . . .  I cannot be sure that my judgment of this friend would be 'impartial and unbiased,' as the House rules require."  House Speaker Thomas Foley (D., Wash.) designated Rep. Louis Stokes (D., Ohio), a former chairman of the committee, to take Mr. Atkins's place.  The ethics panel is evenly divided between Republicans and Democrats.  Tuesday, September 12, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 13/16% low, 8 13/ 16% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.:8.75% 28 to 44 days; 8.675% 45 to 59 days; 8.60% 60 to 89 days; 8.375% 90 to 119 days; 8.25% 120 to 149 days; 8.125% 150 to 179 days; 7.75% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000:8.85% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.70% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.28% one month; 8.31% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.24% six months; 8.26% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market:8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.73% 30 days; 8.62% 60 days; 8.53% 90 days; 8.48% 120 days; 8.35% 150 days; 8.28% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% two months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% three months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% four months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% five months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 15/16% one month; 8 15/16% three months; 8 15/16% six months; 8 7/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.05%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par).9.97%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.12%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Airlines are applying $20 increases in some markets on one-way tickets popular among business travelers.  It wasn't clear how many markets are affected, but the price increases went into effect yesterday from many Midwest cities and scattered routes throughout the country.  For example, between Minneapolis and Chicago, the price for a ticket requiring three days reservation jumped to $206 from $186.  The cheapest fare available without reservation rose to $226 from $206, and the regular coach fare also increased $20 to $260.  For three weeks the airlines have been delaying the increases as they waited for competitors to match them.  In most markets, the fare rises apparently are still on hold.  James R. Kuse has always tried to avoid the spotlight.  Now, despite his efforts, Georgia Gulf Corp.'s chairman and chief executive officer is standing center stage.  Mr. Kuse is scheduled to meet today with investor Harold Simmons and NL Industries Inc. to discuss their proposal to force Georgia Gulf into a recapitalization or leveraged buy-out.  Although Mr. Kuse hasn't formally rejected the $1.38 billion offer, he has moved to strengthen his chemical company's anti-takeover defenses.  The widespread interest in the meeting casts the 59-year-old Mr. Kuse in an unfamiliar role.  Since taking charge at Georgia Gulf in 1984 when the company was spun off from Georgia-Pacific Corp., he has avoided securities analysts, shunned publicity (he declined to be interviewed for this article) and played down statistics that most chief executives would love to hype: a quadrupling of profits and a 500% increase in Georgia Gulf's stock price.  "If I had never heard the name 'Kuse,' I would think {president and chief operating officer Jerry R.} Satrum ran the company," says John L. Garcia, an analyst at Wertheim Schroder & Co. Adds Theodore Semegran, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., "The man's an enigma to me."  Who will prevail at today's meeting?  Wall Street is betting on the tenacious Mr. Simmons.  But the Texas investor shouldn't be misled, say Mr. Kuse's colleagues, by the Georgia Gulf chairman's quiet demeanor.  "He's a damn good leader," says James R. Taylor, a vice president at Georgia-Pacific who once worked with Mr. Kuse.  "No nonsense and straightforward.  You don't have to guess too often where he's coming from."  A native Oregonian, Mr. Kuse joined Georgia-Pacific's chemical division in 1967 as an industrial chemicals salesman.  As he climbed the corporate ladder steadily over 17 years, he became known as a man of few words and one who was willing to delegate authority.  "He was not the kind to get involved in the details of solving a problem," recalls Mr. Taylor.  "For example, when we would have a problem with costs getting too high, he'd suggest that you, 'Go back and get into the numbers,' then bring it back to him.  That would be the end of the conversation."  Mr. Kuse built a tiny chemical division into a business that eventually accounted for more than a third of Georgia-Pacific's revenue.  On his watch, 15 chemical plants went up within the space of 10 years.  But because it produced products primarily for the construction industry, the division was hurt by periodic slumps in housing starts in the late 1970s and early 1980s.  In 1984, Georgia-Pacific sold the struggling business to Mr. Kuse and three other top managers for $275 million.  That turns out to have been a steal.  The economy recovered, and Georgia Gulf had some of the most modern plants in the chemical industry.  Meanwhile, Mr. Kuse's strategy of keeping the company lean -- there are five corporate officers and a total headquarters staff of about 35 -- helped profits grow to $193.6 million in 1988 from $36.4 million in 1985.  Mr. Kuse also gave employees an opportunity to buy into the company when it was spun off from Georgia-Pacific.  An investment of $100 in 1984 would be worth more than $41,000 today. (Mr.  Kuse's own stake of 7.1% in the company is currently valued at about $101 million.) Analysts say employee ownership, along with a generous benefits package and competitive salaries, has inspired a high degree of loyalty at Georgia Gulf and has kept turnover low.  Recently, Mr. Kuse seemed to melt even farther into the background when he relinquished the title of president and control of more of the company's day-to-day operations to the 45-year-old Mr. Satrum.  Now, Mr. Simmons has drawn him into the limelight with an offer that has pushed Georgia Gulf's stock to a price of almost $60 a share from about $40 in the space of two months.  In this case, though, considering Mr. Kuse's track record, investors might not mind seeing Georgia Gulf come out on top.  Says Shearson Lehman's Mr. Semegran: "I can't wait to see what it does over the next five years.  JEFFREY LEVINE, executive vice president of Par Pharmaceutical Inc., testified Monday before the House Energy and Commerce Committee's investigative panel.  In yesterday's edition, it was incorrectly said that Mr. Levine didn't appear as a witness because of illness.  (See: "FDA Finds Problems at 10 of 12 Firms Being Probed in Generic-Drug Scandall" -- WSJ Sept. 12, 1989)  The Senate approved the nomination of Donald Gregg to be ambassador to South Korea, even though some Democrats questioned whether he knew more than he has acknowledged about the Iran-Contra affair.  Twenty-one Democrats joined the Senate's 45 Republicans to confirm Mr. Gregg, 66-33.  Testifying under oath at confirmation hearings before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, Mr. Gregg denied alleg ations that he was involved in the illegal effort to resupply the Nicaraguan Contra rebels.  Mr. Gregg had a long career in the Central Intelligence Agency, including several years as station chief in Seoul, and was President Bush's national security adviser when Mr. Bush was vice president.  The nomination was also controversial in South Korea, where some thought his CIA connection could inflame anti-American feelings.  When an ad agency goes sour, when its clients head for the door, how far can it slide before it hits the point of no return?  Saatchi & Saatchi Co. is about to find out, as it pushes the envelope in trying to turn around the beleaguered New York office of its Campbell-Mithun-Esty agency.  The office earlier this week racked up the latest in a long string of account losses when Tambrands Inc. pulled its $12 million feminine hygiene products account, awarding it to Ally & Gargano.  Earlier this year, it lost the $25 million American Home Products Corp. account, including the Anacin business.  Last month, its chairman, Joseph W. O'Donnell, resigned under pressure.  The latest setbacks are hardly isolated instances.  The New York office's losing streak has now run for more than three years, raising the question of whether a slump that severe and that sustained can be overcome in the image-obsessed advertising business.  Several ad executives questioned yesterday had their doubts.  Lee Anne Morgan of Morgan Anderson & Co., a consulting firm that helps clients choose ad agencies, notes that successful agency turnarounds are rare.  "It's a Catch-22 situation," she says, because clients don't want to go to an agency that isn't winning new business.  She adds that if Campbell-Mithun-Esty's name were to appear on a list of finalists for an account, "a consultant would have to counsel their clients that the agency has lost a ton of business, and who knows how long they're going to be able to keep {the staff} they have on board?"  What's worse, even if an agency does manage to turn itself around, perceptions don't always keep track with reality -- and perceptions are everything in advertising.  "It's easier to do a start-up" then to turn around a fading agency, Ms. Morgan asserts, "because at least then they feel the whole world is open to them, instead of people having negative perceptions."  Yet Saatchi and Campbell-Mithun-Esty management are pulling out the stops to try to turn around the New York office.  William D. Dunlap, Campbell-Mithun-Esty's chief executive officer, predicts that "within six months, it will be stabilized and moving ahead."  He says the New York office is currently in three new business pitches, and should hear the results within 60 days.  Mr. Dunlap, who is based at the agency's Minneapolis headquarters, now spends three days each week in the New York office.  A few months ago, Richard Johnson, one of the agency's top creative executives, was dispatched from Detroit to take on the creative mantle in New York.  The agency is also planning to tap the talents of its other offices to shore up New York's fortunes.  All three non-New York offices are relatively strong.  Mr. Dunlap notes that David Tree, the top creative executive in Minneapolis, has participated in several New York pitches.  He says all the offices will try to ferret out new-business leads for New York.  And he hopes to bring some of the agency's more successful ventures to New York, such as a unit that produces TV programming.  "We have a lot of excellent, dedicated people.  We just need a few breaks," he says.  Meanwhile, the agency is busy fending off the rumours that swirl about it like vultures.  Speculation that Texaco Inc. was putting its account up for review prompted the oil company to release a statement categorically denying it.  Saatchi management, meanwhile, in early spring had to assure Campbell-Mithun management, in writing, that it had no intention of selling the agency, as had been rumored.  "We have every intention, as does Bill {Dunlap}, of supporting CME-New York through this period, and of re-establishing it as a strong, positive, New York agency," says Terry Bannister, co-chief of Saatchi's advertising operations.  And the agency is struggling against more than three years of severe troubles at the New York office, which until last year was a separate agency, William Esty Co.  The problems date back to 1986, when Esty lost both its R.J. Reynolds tobacco and Nabisco cookies and crackers business after the merger that created RJR Nabisco.  Then, in early 1987, just after Esty hired Mr. O'Donnell, the agency lost its largest client, the $150 million Nissan Motor Corp. U.S.A. account.  It also resigned the $40 million MasterCard International account, which was under review.  Mr. O'Donnell tried mightily to improve Esty's workmanlike creative product -- but succeeded instead in alienating clients who were at the agency precisely because they wanted conventional, unexciting ads.  Industry executives say American Home Products left the agency after Mr. O'Donnell tried to persuade it to run more cutting-edge creative work.  Mr. O'Donnell, who is traveling and couldn't be reached, also didn't throw himself as heavily into wooing new business as Saatchi had hoped; industry executives say he didn't feel the creative work was yet up to snuff.  The string of account losses, and Mr. O'Donnell's inability to stem the flow, prompted Saatchi to merge Esty with Minneapolis-based Campbell-Mithun in July, 1988, in what effectively was a takeover relegating Mr. O'Donnell to the sidelines.  Today, the New York office has $210 million in billings -- less than half of the $510 million it billed as an independent agency in 1985.  Mr. Dunlap attributes part of the problems since then to the usual post-merger adjustment period.  "I want to make this seem like one company," he adds.  "I think it took a little longer than I anticipated.  But we're at a point now where it's really coming together."  ---  Ayer Takes Double Hit  Illinois Bell, a client of N W Ayer Chicago since 1937, yesterday pulled its $19 million ad account and assigned it to Tatham-Laird & Kudner, Chicago.  News of Illinois Bell's defection comes just days after Ayer lost another longtime account, the $10 million Deere & Co. business.  Illinois Bell and Deere were the agency's two largest clients.  The agency is now just a $15 million shop with only a handful of small clients, including Leaf Inc. and a Honeywell division.  Another client, Citicorp Savings Illinois, is about to take its business to another agency as well, industry executives say.  Ayer Chicago has also had its share of management turmoil.  Last month, John Wells, who headed the office, was fired after executives there decided his performance wasn't acceptable, people close to the agency say.  Dom Rossi, Ayer's director of U.S. operations, has been leading the office but is looking for a Midwestern ad executive to take over permanently.  "We're committed to Chicago," Mr. Rossi said in an interview yesterday.  He added that Ayer is looking to make an acquisition in the Chicago area in order to bolster its presence there.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   ACQUISITION: WPP Group acquired Seiniger Advertising, a Los Angeles entertainment ad agency, for an initial payment of $10 million and additional payments over four years which could reach $30 million, based on performance.  STAKE INCREASED: WCRS Group PLC is planning to buy all of Carat Holding S.A., a giant media buying company, industry executives said.  As reported, WCRS said it was negotiating to increase its stake in the European concern.  NEW ACCOUNT: Time Warner Inc., New York, awarded its Time magazine ad account to Lois/GGK, New York.  It had previously been handled by Young & Rubicam.  Billings are estimated to be as much as $9 million.  To accept the account, Lois/GGK resigned the $2 million USA Today account it won more than five years ago.  A spokeswoman for Gannett Co., publisher of USA Today, said it will begin contacting agencies shortly.  SUZUKI REVIEW: American Suzuki Motor said Wieden & Kennedy, Los Angeles, dropped out of the review for its $30 million account.  Remaining participants are Asher/Gould and Hakuhodo Advertising, both of Los Angeles.  A decision is expected next month.  BEAR STEARNS Cos.' stock price rose 18.5% in the six months through Sept. 8.  In a table yesterday, the percentage was misstated because of a failure to adjust for two stock dividends.  (See: "Heard on the Street: Brokerage Houses Admire Rivals' Stocks" -- WSJ Sept. 12, 1989)  Intel Corp., in a bid to cash in on a growing market for high-performance computer chips, unveiled a new chip that it says is the first to use an advanced processing technology.  The chip, called the i960CA processor, will use superscalar parallel processing, in which a chip processes as many as three computer "instructions" at one time, the company said.  Conventional chips only process one instruction at a time.  The attempt to develop that technology "has been the four-minute mile of the industry," said Bear, Stearns & Co. analyst Andrew Neff.  "It's what everyone is trying to do."  The chip also gives the Santa Clara, Calif., company a broader line of high-end chips.  The i960CA chip "is very important for Intel," said Mr. Neff, because "it allows them to address markets they weren't positioned to address before."  With the chip, Intel has targeted a fast-growing market for 32-bit chips called embedded microprocessors.  Unlike conventional microprocessors used in desktop computers, which can be reprogrammed, embedded chips are preprogrammed to be the "brains" of specific devices.  Slower eight-bit and 16-bit embedded chips are often used in equipment such as video recorders and floppy-disk drives.  The new 32-bit chip, which can process 66 million instructions a second, could allow devices such as laser printers, navigational computers in airplanes and medical instruments to operate much faster than they could with older embedded microprocessors.  "That market is just coming into its own.  There's going to be a lot of opportunity," said Alice Leeper, an analyst with Dataquest, a San Jose, Calif., market-research firm.  The 32-bit chip market will be $3.3 billion in 1993, according to Dataquest, up from $835 million last year.  The majority of that market will be for embedded chips like Intel's i960CA, she said.  Intel's parallel-processing technology allows the chip to look ahead at a series of instructions that are flowing toward it.  The chip picks groups of instructions that can be executed at the same time, rather than processing each instruction in the order it arrives.  Intel has alluded to the chip previously as the third leg of its microprocessor strategy.  Earlier this year, Intel unveiled its 80486 chip, a high-speed successor to earlier Intel chips that now power many of today's desktop computers.  It also introduced the 860 chip, a microprocessor employing a technology called reduced instruction set computing, or RISC.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Intel shares jumped $1.25 to close at $31.  William B. Allen's article on Operation Rescue ("Police Brutality -- but No Outrage, editorial page, Aug. 18) overlooked some facts: Those people were arrested for violently attacking women seeking access to health care; for violently attacking the property and staff of legal, state-licensed health care facilities.  They were prepared in advance to violate the law in order to provoke arrest.  They were trained to resist arrest, forcing police to employ accepted, legal tactics for subduing resisters.  They were trained to exploit these police tactics by contorting their own bodies, causing their own physical discomfort.  They were trained as to the precise moment to shout, "Video, video]" so their cameraman could film closeups of their contorted bodies and faces.  These isolated film clips do not tell the story of police brutality and unnecessary arrests.  This is the story of a group deliberately violating the civil rights of innocent citizens who will not conform to their religious philosophy on abortion.  It is frightening that Mr. Allen, as chairman of our Civil Rights Commission, cannot see that this group's activities and goals parallel the McCarthy era, not the civil-rights movement.  Catherine H. Bruno  Silverthorne, Colo.  ---  This is exactly what Operation Rescue wants.  The attention, but also the arrests.  Their logic is: Get arrested, make the city lose money on police overtime, clog the courts with trespassing offenders and force the city to press for the closing of abortion clinics.  Last year, Rex Moses, director of Operation Rescue in Austin, spoke before a meeting of the Young Conservatives of Texas.  I was at that meeting and became so enraged at Mr. Moses's sweeping propaganda that I withdrew my membership rather than take part in an organization that condoned such behavior.  Jessica D. Vincent  Austin, Texas  ---  After reading Mr. Allen's article it is obvious that the incredible controversy created by the abortion issue is too much for even our Civil Rights Commission and elected officials to handle.  It is a sad commentary on our supposedly advanced system of justice that despite numerous documented instances of police brutality toward Operation Rescue protesters no committee in Congress is willing to even investigate the serious civil-rights violations that have taken place.  Until our representatives find the courage to confront the abortion issue head-on, protests will continue, police will be brutal, people will suffer, innocent lives will be lost and civil rights will be ignored.  Edward F. Veres  Audubon, N.J.  ---  It's disgusting to see Mr. Allen attempt to liken the Operation Rescue demonstrations with the 1965 attempts by blacks to register to vote.  The blacks of Selma, Ala., were trying to exercise their constitutional rights; the Rescue people are trying to deprive others of theirs.  Mr. Allen characterizes the "rescues" as peaceful and nonviolent.  Is a mob of screaming people running through a clinic and smashing equipment his idea of nonviolent?  When a seven-months pregnant woman has to climb a ladder to her doctor's second-story office because 150 shouting people have surrounded the doors, should she smile and say that their right to protest abortion "peacefully" is more important than her right to medical care?  Laura S. Billington  Maple Valley, Wash.  ---  Perhaps there is less sympathy for participants in Operation Rescue because they are not peacefully demonstrating to obtain their rights, but are illegally and immorally attempting to harass, beleaguer and torment women who wish to enter the clinics to obtain needed abortions.  They are attempting to impose their beliefs on others and to interfere with others' exercise of fundamental rights.  Occasional police overreaction in the removal of such outlaws is regrettable, but probably unavoidable.  My sympathy goes to the people being harassed, not the harassers.  Marc Richman  Washington  ---  I was at an early Los Angeles confrontation, and saw the "passive resistance" techniques used by the protesters.  This was the sequence: Both Operation Rescue people and pro-choice people were told to clear the area around the women's clinic, on penalty of arrest if they did not.  Pro-choice people left the area encircled by police.  Operation Rescue did not.  Police tried vainly to get the latter to walk to police vans.  When they would not, the police were forced to drag or carry them, almost certainly sustaining back or internal injuries in some cases when protesters lay limp or dragged their heels.  Barbara E. Bernstein  Los Angeles  ---  It is a profanity to equate Operation Rescue with actions of Martin Luther King Jr. When Operation Rescue protesters block a clinic entrance, that is illegal, but nonviolent.  But when they deliberately and maliciously crowd, shout at, coerce, intimidate and place vulnerable women seeking help in fear of immediate injury, an assault has been perpetrated.  A battery need not be committed; it is still an assault.  An assault is violence.  Operation Rescue has committed a great many of these assaults with relative impunity.  They do not deserve the mantle of nonviolent action.  Albert J. Forman  Concord, Mass.  New Computer Process  Speeds Design Time  DESIGNERS and their customers save time and money with a new generation of computers and software.  Computer-aided industrial design shortens development cycles for automobiles, electronics and other products.  Designers create and modify models with a three-dimensional perspective and show them to engineers to see if the designs are possible before final commitments are made.  CAID is different from computer-aided design, or CAD, which has been around for a decade.  CAD is concerned mainly with how things work; CAID, with how things look.  CAID can produce free-form designs with ease, a task which is time consuming and complex for CAD. Artists can easily operate CAID systems, while extensive training in mathematics is required to do CAD.  Chrysler Corp. and Ford Motor Co. have teamed up with Evans & Sutherland, a computer company, to develop a CAID system that Chrysler says can cut weeks and maybe months off the time it takes to bring a new car to market.  "Even being able to take one or two months out of the design cycle can result in millions of dollars in savings," says Tom Gale, a Chrysler vice president.  John Houlihan, industrial design director at Timex Corp., says his CAID system, produced by Alias Research, allows watch designers to explore small modifications that they didn't have time to consider in the past.  "We can be more creative," he says.  CAID is even being used for inexpensive packaged goods.  Stevan Lipson, president of Cincinnati-based Lipson-Alport-Glass & Associates, says his design firm was able to create a new ice cream package for a client 30% faster by using a CAID system.  Book Jackets May Be  Catchier Than the Plots  PUBLISHERS are resorting to gimmicks to draw attention to hardback books.  Random House publishes a book on healing stones with an actual stone hanging from the front cover.  E.P. Dutton brings out "Red Snow" with artificial snow trapped behind a clear plastic jacket.  And Abbeville Press markets a book on miniature golf with a cover of fake grass.  Publishers are "fighting" to catch the buyer's eye in the bookstore much the way cereal makers contend in the supermarket, says Frank Metz, art director at Simon & Schuster.  Paperbacks have used unusual cover designs like holograms for some time, but such techniques are just spreading to the hard-cover trade.  Atlantic Monthly Press puts an organ-donor card on the back flap of "Transplant," a book by heart surgeon William Frist, with the suggestion that readers fill out the card and carry it with them.  "I don't mean to sound cynical," says Wendell Minor, a jacket designer and illustrator, "but the donor card sounds like a clever packaging technique."  Some experts think gimmicky covers may do more harm than good.  "They're just trying to shout at you, and that's a turnoff," says Louise Fili, art director at Pantheon Books.  This Guitar Holds  Its Shape Better  NEW GUITAR design draws rave reviews, but some skepticism, too.  An age-old problem with guitars: The tension of the strings pulls the neck out of shape, making the instrument harder to play and spoiling the sound.  Most wooden guitars have threaded steel truss rods embedded in the neck to alleviate the warp problem, but these must be adjusted periodically.  Robert Kunstadt, a New York patent attorney and amateur musician, thinks his "free neck system" solves the problem of neck warp, at least for electric guitars.  Mr. Kunstadt's guitar has a hollow aluminum beam running between the instrument's head and its left shoulder.  The beam diverts string tension away from the neck.  To further reduce tension, the neck is mounted on movable joints.  People who have played Mr. Kunstadt's guitar are enthusiastic.  "A real good sound," says jazz guitarist John Scofield.  Ed Sullivan, manager of the guitar department at Rogue Music in New York, says, "It was easy to play.  The distance from the strings to the fretboard was consistently low."  Skeptics abound, however.  Mark Herbert, a guitar repairman in Jamaica Plains, Mass., calls neck adjustment a "small part" of the maintenance that most guitars require twice a year.  And Kevin Walsh, director of artist relations at Gibson Guitar Corp., doubts Mr. Kunstadt's design will be a hit with guitar players, whom he describes as "a very finicky bunch."  Odds and Ends  BLACK & DECKER and the Kansas City chapter of the Industrial Designers Society of America offer $10,000 to the person who designs the best new toaster. . . .  New York's Cooper Hewitt Museum and Guiding Eyes for the Blind, a group that trains seeing-eye dogs, invite architects and designers to submit designs for an exhibition of doghouses.  Diane S. Liebman was named vice president of legislative and media relations at this transportation company.  Ms. Liebman, 42 years old, had been vice president of corporate communications at the CSX Transportation subsidiary.  She is succeeded by Donna W. Rohrer, 44, who takes an expanded role and the new title of vice president of corporate and marketing communications at CSX Transportation.  She had been assistant vice president of corporate communications for CSX Corp.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Occidental Petroleum Corp. -- $276 million of 10 1/8% senior debentures due Sept. 15, 2009, priced at 99.35 to yield 10.201%.  Rated Baa-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-B by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The issue was priced at a yield spread of 211 basis points above the Treasury's 30-year note.  GTE South Inc. -- $100 million of first mortgage bonds, due Sept. 15, 2029, won in competitive bidding by a group led by Salomon Brothers Inc. and reoffered with a 9% coupon at 97.50 to yield 9.237%.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P, the issue was priced at 115 basis points above the Treasury's 30-year bond.  The issue is noncallable for five years.  Connecticut Light & Power Co. -- $75 million of first and refunding mortgage bonds, Series SS, due Sept. 1, 2019, won in competitive bidding by a group led by Salomon Brothers and reoffered with a 9 3/8% coupon at 98.650 to yield 9.51%.  Rated Baa-1 by Moody's and triple-B-plus by S&P, the issue was priced at 143 basis points above the Treasury's 30-year bond.  The mortgage bonds are non-refundable for five years.  @ MUNICIPALS  Washington Public Power Supply System -- $721.8 million of nuclear project No. 1 and nuclear project No. 3 refunding revenue bonds, tentatively priced by a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group to yield from 6.25% in 1990 to 7.70% for original issue discount bonds due in 2015.  Insured term bonds due 2018 yield 7.27%.  The uninsured bonds are rated double-A-minus by S&P and single-A by Moody's.  Term bonds include $18.5 million of 7% insured original issue discount bonds due 2004 priced at 98.186 to yield 7.20%; $36.6 million of 7.5% original issue discount bonds due 2007 priced at 99.017 to yield 7.60%; $295.6 million of 7.5% original issue discount bonds due 2015 priced at 97.756 to yield 7.70%; $95.1 million of 6% original issue discount bonds due 2017 priced at 82.084 to yield 7.55%; $123.1 million of 7.25% insured original issue discount bonds due 2016 priced to yield 7.35%; and $54.6 million of 6% insured original issue discount due 2018 priced to yield 7.27%.  Compound interest or zero-coupon bonds yield from 7.20% to 7.30%.  New York State Mortgage Finance Agency -- $260 million of housing revenue bonds tentatively priced by a Bear Stearns & Co. group to yield from 6.30% in 1993 to 7.70% in 2029.  The bonds are insured and double-A-rated.  The serial bonds are being reoffered at par to yield from 6.30% in 1993 to 7.05% in 2001 for non-alternative minimum tax bonds; and from 7.10% in 2002 to 7.25% in 2009 for capital appreciation bonds.  Term bonds have a 7 3/8% coupon and are priced at par and due in 2019.  Among serial and term bonds subject to the alternative minimum tax, yields range from 6.45% to 7.50% on serial bonds; term bonds are 7.60% priced at par and due 2009 and 7.70% priced at par and due 2029.  New Jersey Housing Finance Authority -- $256 million of revenue bonds priced earlier by a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group.  The issue consists of $48 million of Series C bonds, which yield from 6.30% in 1993 to 7.375% in 2019; and $208 million of Series D bonds yielding from 6.50% in 1993 to 7.70% in 2029.  All bonds were priced at par.  The issue is insured and triple-A-rated.  Riverside Asset Leasing Corp., Riverside County, Calif. -- $195 million of hospital project revenue bonds with capital appreciation bonds tentatively priced by a First Boston group to yield from 7% in 1999 to 7.30% in 2019.  The bonds are rated single-A/single-A-plus.  The 7% serial bonds are being reoffered to yield 7% in 1999, 7.05% in 2000 and 7.10% in 2001.  Capital appreciation bonds are zero-coupon bonds yielding from 7% in 2002 to 7.10% in 2005.  Term bonds have coupons ranging from 6%, priced to yield 7.30% in 2019, to 7 1/4%, priced at 99 1/4 to yield 7.326% in 2007.  Hillsboro County, Fla. -- $133 million of Aviation Authority for Tampa International Airport revenue bonds, due 1992-2004, 2009, 2019, tentatively priced by a Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. group to yield from 6.20% in 1992 to 7.204% in 2019.  The bonds are insured and triple-A-rated.  Serial bonds are being reoffered at par to yield from 6.20% in 1992 to 7.10% in 2004.  Term bonds have coupons of 7.10%, priced at 99 1/2 to yield 7.147% in 2009, and 7%, priced at 97 1/2 to yield 7.204% in 2019.  Tennessee -- $84 million of home ownership program revenue bonds, due 1991-2005, 2009, and 2020, apparently won by a Goldman Sachs group.  The bonds, rated single-A by Moody's, were priced for reoffering to yield from 6.40% in 1991 to 7.75% in 2020.  Mississippi -- $68.5 million of series 1989 capital improvement general obligation bonds, apparently won by a J.P. Morgan group.  The bonds, rated double-A/double-A-minus, were priced for reoffering to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to 6.90% in 2009.  North Carolina -- $50 million of various public improvement bonds of 1989, apparently won by a Wachovia group.  The bonds, rated triple-A, were priced at par to yield from 5.80% in 1991 to 6.70% in 2005.  @ AGENCY AND MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $500 million of 8 3/4% debentures, due Sept. 20, 1996, priced at 99 5/8 to yield 8.823%.  The issue, which is non-callable for four years, will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The issue was priced at 68 basis points above the Treasury's seven-year note.  The offering is an unscheduled bond issue made in response to market conditions.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $400 million of Remic securities in 11 classes underwritten by Salomon Brothers Inc.  The issue, the 100th real estate mortgage investment conduit offering by Fannie Mae, brings total issuance under the program to $35.7 billion since it began in April 1987.  The new issue, series 1989-65, is backed by Fannie Mae 9 1/2% securities with a weighted remaining term to maturity of 29 years.  Price details weren't immediately available.  @ EUROBONDS  ECCT1989-2 (vehicle) -- $325 million of credit card receivables-backed 9% Eurobonds due Oct. 15, 1994, yielding 9.05% at its fixed reoffered level of 99.80, via UBS Phillips & Drew.  Fees 0.325.  Mitsubishi Metal Corp. (Japan) -- $300 million of Eurobonds due Oct. 5, 1994, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 5/8% coupon at par via Nikko Securities Co. Europe.  Each $25,000 bond carries five warrants, exercisable from Oct. 19, 1989, through Sept. 14, 1994, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2%.  Terms fixed next Monday.  Fees 2 1/4.  Hokuetsu Paper Mills Ltd. (Japan) -- $150 million of Eurobonds due Sept. 28, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par via Yamaichi International Europe Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 12, 1989, to Sept. 16, 1993, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing price when terms are fixed next Monday.  Fees 2 1/4.  Bank of Communications (Taiwan) -- $100 million of floating-rate notes due Oct. 30, 2001, paying six-month London interbank offered rate plus 0.10 point priced at par, via Goldman Sachs International Ltd. Once-only put option at par Oct. 30, 1996.  Callable from 1996 at par.  Fees 0.13.  Vnesheconombank (U.S.S.R.) -- 500 million marks of 7 1/2% bonds due Sept. 27, 1996, priced at 100 1/4 to yield 7.45%, via Commerzbank AG. Fees 2 1/4.  General Electric Capital Corp (U.S.) -- #100 million of Eurobonds due Sept. 26, 1994, priced at 101 1/2 to yield 11.60% less fees via Kleinwort Benson Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Mitsubishi Metal Corp. (Japan) -- 200 million Dutch guilders of bonds with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 2 1/8% coupon at par due Oct. 5, 1993, via Amro Bank.  Each 10,000 guilder bond carries 10 warrants, exercisable from Oct. 19, 1989, to Sep. 14, 1993,to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% above the closing price when terms are fixed next Monday.  Fees 2 1/8.  Caisse Centrale Desjardins du Quebec (Canada) -- 11 billion yen of 5.35% Eurobonds due Oct. 12, 1993, priced at 101 5/8 to yield 5.35% less full fees via LTCB Intnational.  Fees 1 5/8.  Sumitomo Special Metals Co. (Japan) -- 200 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1994, with a fixed 0% coupon issued at par via Swiss Bank Corp. Put option on Sept. 30, 1991, at a fixed 107 7/8 to yield 3.82%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note is convertible from Oct. 12, 1989, to Sept. 16, 1994, at a 5% premium over the closing share price next Monday, when the foreign exchange rate is scheduled to be fixed.  Fees 1 3/4.  Mitsuba Electric Manufacturing Co. (Japan) -- 70 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 28, 1994, with equity-purchase warrants and fixed 2 5/8% coupon at par via Wirtschafts & Privatbank.  Guaranteed by Bank of Yokohama.  Exercise period of the warrants Oct. 15, 1989, to Sept. 12, 1994.  Fixing next Tuesday.  Call from March 28, 1992, at 101 1/4, declining by 1/4.  Girozentrale & Bank der Oesterreicheschen Sparkassen (Austria) -- 50 million Swiss francs of bonds due Oct. 19, 1999, with equity-purchase warrants and a fixed 4 1/4% coupon at par via Credit Suisse.  Exercise period of the warrants Nov. 7, 1989, to Oct. 19, 1994.  Each 5,000 Swiss franc bond issued with 100 warrants, each of which allows the purchase of one participation certificate at 347 Austrian schillings, a 23% premium.  Exchange rate fixed at 8.17 schillings to the Swiss franc.  U.S. agriculture's rebound from last year's severe drought was solidified by a government report, confirming earlier estimates for sharp rises in the 1989 grain harvest.  The Agriculture Department predicted corn production this year at 7.32 billion bushels, down only slightly from the 7.35 billion bushels it forecast a month ago when it made its first field survey of 1989 crop conditions.  The latest estimate is a 49% increase over last year's drought-ravaged corn crop of 4.9 billion bushels.  Department economists forecast a 23% jump in soybean production, to 1.89 billion bushels, 1% below the August estimate.  They predicted wheat production of 2.06 billion bushels, 14% higher than in 1988 and 1% above the August forecast.  While corn-crop development is lagging behind normal in most of the 17 major producing states, farmers and government officials are "breathing a little easier," Martin Abel, an Alexandria, Va., farm consultant said.  Dry weather in early August has given way to crop-enriching rains in recent weeks.  Also, the latest government analysis, reflecting conditions on Sept. 1, is based on more field measurements and considered more complete than the Aug. 1 report, Mr. Abel noted.  The latest corn-crop estimate was roughly in line with what private analysts had expected.  Some analysts recently forecast the 1989 harvest at 7.28 billion to 7.30 billion bushels, though other estimates ranged from 7.13 billion to 7.44 billion bushels.  But because the government forecast exceeded some analysts' predictions, pressure for lower prices may be exerted in today's corn futures trading, analysts said.  Richard Loewy, president of AgResource Co., Chicago, said some analysts and speculators had predicted that the early-August dry spell would trim yields sharply below the level actually estimated in the government's September report.  The department expects corn yields averaging 112.4 bushels an acre, down only slightly from the 112.8 bushels an acre it estimated as of Aug. 1, and well ahead of a yield of 84.6 bushels an acre during drought-stricken 1988.  The estimated yield for 1989 would be seven bushels below the record high of 119.4 bushels an acre in 1987.  The soybean-output forecast was even closer in line with most market expectations, so it likely won't spark a futures-market reaction, analysts said.  Mr. Loewy estimated that with some rain during the rest of the month, yields could rise a bit for late-maturing soybeans in eastern Corn Belt states, including Indiana and Ohio.  Crops in those states suffered from a wet spring, so their growth is far behind normal, Mr. Abel noted.  If they avoid a frost in the next two weeks, their currently expected yield is assured, though a frost could still hurt the corn's quality and affect prices, he said.  Despite rising grain production over last year, supplies are "snug," which means that government planners are relying on normal yields next year to build stocks, Mr. Abel said.  He expects Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter to keep the so-called land set-aside requirement for corn farmers at 10% of their acreage next year, even in the face of tight supplies, in order to hold federal farm subsidies at the current level.  Department analysts predicted a corn inventory of 1.68 billion bushels on Sept. 1, 1990, the same as the Aug. 1 estimate, but down from 1.86 billion bushels on Sept. 1 of this year and down from 4.26 billion bushels at this time in 1988.  They forecast a soybean stockpile of 275 million bushels by Sept. 1, 1990, down slightly from last month's prediction of 285 million bushels, but well above the 155 million bushels estimated for Sept. 1 of this year.  Despite martial law, the arrests of thousands of intellectuals and workers and an intimidating propaganda barrage, many Chinese citizens remain defiant.  While no one is likely to take to the streets again soon, the spirit of resistance seems to be building anew.  Examples abound.  A 30-year-old worker, who witnessed the killings in Tiananmen on June 4, says he will never forgive the government.  "We all lost our innocence on June 4," he says, insisting that his name not be published.  He says that he refuses to speak during the mandatory weekly political-study sessions at his factory.  Each week he declines opportunities to biaotai, or declare his support for the government.  Many others who took part in the demonstrations have yielded to pressure and performed their biaotai.  They view it as the only way to survive under a repressive regime, all the while hoping that things eventually loosen up.  "How can I say what I don't believe," the worker asks, "especially after so many people have died?"  He is emboldened by the stories he hears of mass defiance by teachers at Beijing University, who not only are refusing to bow to the official line but who also criticize the government openly in their political sessions.  In another sign of defiance, students at People's University, also in Beijing, tried to organize a memorial service for students slain on June 4, according to Chinese sources.  The students knew that the service would be officially unwelcome.  So, in an attempt to avoid a head-on clash with authorities, they announced their plans beforehand.  As a result, on Monday night the government sent armed police and soldiers to the campus.  The service didn't take place.  It was the first known attempt at organized student unrest since July 23, when a few hundred Beijing University students staged a spirited late-night rally on campus.  They sang songs, including a tongue-in-cheek version of "Without the Communist Party, There Would be No New China," a musical mainstay of the new propaganda.  One student, alleged to be the leader, was expelled for violating "martial law regulations."  Separately, Beijing authorities remain concerned about violent reprisals.  Large numbers of guns and bullets that were taken from soldiers in June still haven't been recovered.  Western military sources say there have been occasional sniper attacks on troops in Beijing.  The military sources also say there have been at least two unexplained explosions, thought to be bomb blasts, in Beijing in recent weeks.  In addition, a Tianjin man, armed with explosives, was arrested recently as he tried to board a train to Beijing.  "If you add up all of these things, you have to conclude that there are a lot of people out there who are very unhappy about what has happened," says a Western military attache.  "The danger of plots whose objective is toppling the government has not been completely removed," Premier Li Peng told the French daily Le Figaro in an interview last week.  "There are still many bad elements who have in their hands automatic rifles, machine guns and submachine guns.  That is one of the problems, but there are others."  The Wall Street Journal and NBC News said they hired Peter Hart and Robert Teeter, two prominent national pollsters, to conduct public-opinion surveys through next year.  The two news organizations, in addition to their regular polls, will do quarterly surveys of the nation's economic, political, social and cultural attitudes.  The Journal and NBC have conducted polls together since 1986.  "We are delighted to continue our partnership, which has been so productive since 1986," Wall Street Journal Managing Editor Norman Pearlstine and NBC News President Michael Gartner said in a joint statement.  "And we are very pleased to obtain the services of Peter Hart and Bob Teeter.  Their creativity and extraordinary experience will be an enormous asset as we seek to explain and interpret public opinion."  Mr. Hart and Mr. Teeter have been pollsters for more than 20 years, Mr. Hart working primarily for Democratic candidates, Mr. Teeter for Republicans.  They will work jointly on the polling for the news organizations, which retain full editorial control.  Overseeing the surveys are Albert R. Hunt, chief of the Journal's Washington bureau, and Timothy J. Russert, NBC's Washington bureau chief.  The Wall Street Journal is published by Dow Jones & Co. NBC News is part of the National Broadcasting Co. unit of General Electric Co.  New Zealand's Labor government once again has Roger Douglas sitting in the Cabinet.  The former finance minister, whose free-market "Rogernomics" made Reaganomics look distinctly wet, was voted back into the Cabinet six weeks ago, prompting the abrupt resignation of Prime Minister David Lange.  But Mr. Lange's demise was not Mr. Douglas's vindication; his appointment as minister of police and immigration in Prime Minister Geoffrey Palmer's first Cabinet is scarcely pivotal.  Just by sitting at the table he may influence the debate, but Mr. Douglas no longer is a key player in economic policy.  Unusual for a country in which rugby rouses more passion than politics, Mr. Lange and Mr. Douglas fell out over ideology.  Their struggle was nothing less than a battle to the death over what the Labor Party stood for.  The answer remains unclear.  Exhausted by infighting, Labor is entering a period of ideological slack.  It is clear, however, that more economic radicalism is out of the question.  In the mid-1980s, the spectacle of a Labor government on a libertarian rampage captivated free marketeers world-wide.  New Zealand embraced the precepts of economic rationalism with a vengeance, removing agricultural subsidies, floating the currency and reforming the public sector.  Mr. Douglas, the self-effacing standard bearer of "Rogernomics" and finance minister from 1984-1988, saw that after decades of stifling regulation and declining economic performance, most of the socialist recipe book had been found wanting.  He believed deregulation was the means to more generous social programs, becoming a fellow traveler in an enterprise that conflicted with the traditional Labor heartland.  Rogernomics placed impossible strains on a traditionally left-wing party, though a prolonged post-election honeymoon kept the tensions at bay at first.  Re-election in 1987 was followed almost immediately by the October stock market collapse, ushering in two years of deep recession and climbing unemployment.  But Mr. Douglas pressed on and in December 1987 unveiled a breathtaking plan to reform personal taxation, including a flat tax on personal income of just 24% and a comprehensive income-maintenance regime.  Implicit in the package was further reform of benefits and social provisions so that spending would not continue to outstrip revenue.  Curbing social expenditure was crucial if the flat-tax package was to succeed.  It was never given a chance.  The prime minister scuppered it, signaling that his social agenda was off-limits.  Thus began the slow, debilitating struggle between the two men.  Mr. Douglas pressed on doggedly; Mr. Lange, recoiling from the public identification with the "New Right," became obsessed with stopping him.  In December 1988, Mr. Douglas precipitated his own sacking by unsuccessfully challenging the prime minister's leadership.  But when the Labor Caucus voted on Cabinet vacancies six weeks ago, Mr. Douglas was swept back in.  A reluctant nominee, he returned "prepared to go back as the tea boy," in Mr. Lange's words.  There it might have ended -- an uneasy but welcome truce to a governing party nearly 30 points behind in the polls.  Then Mr. Lange quit, claiming in a self-indulgent press conference that he could resign safe in the knowledge that the New Right had been vanquished and that the social agenda was safely in hands familiar with Labor's self-appointed tradition of being the nation's social conscience.  He also condemned his former finance minister's vision as "an excrescence on society."  The initiative now has passed to Mr. Palmer, whose supporters positively relish his ability to bore people, and to Mr. Douglas's successor as finance minister, David Caygill, a cautious practitioner with acutely honed political instincts.  A judicious mixture of formula spending cuts, tax increases and one-off revenue grabs has held the line on the fiscal front to date.  In the next financial year, however, that deficit is set to widen again.  Mr. Caygill's first budget hinted at social reform but the timing (and the bills) are pushed out well beyond the next election.  The intellectual coherence that marked the party's brief flirtation with economic liberalism has disappeared.  So whither Rogernomics?  Nowhere.  It's history.  Rogernomics simply was an overdue dose of structural reform applied half a decade after Margaret Thatcher and against the backdrop of a buoyant world economy.  It was the uncommissioned Douglas agenda, first glimpsed with the flat-tax proposal, that truly was radical.  That agenda -- contestable funding and provision of social services, labor-market and income-maintenance reform -- seems well and truly dead.  Traditional socialist dreams also still abound on the Labor bench, such as the absurd notion of setting wages on the basis of "comparable worth" as part of a payequity plan.  The new deputy prime minister, Helen Clark, was given the Labor portfolio specifically to see this bureaucratic fantasy implemented.  Indeed, labor-market reform remains the government's Achilles' heel.  Without it, New Zealand is chained to centrally determined wages and denied the site-by-site wage flexibility that other countries take for granted.  The chances of reform under Ms. Clark seem slender, given her mandate to rescue the party's alliance with the unions.  The important question is who -- Roger Douglas or David Lange -- will cast the longer shadow over the remainder of Labor's short term. (An election must be held in 1990.) The Douglas reforms may make wider reforms inevitable, as the inexorable forces of finance and debt engulf the welfare state.  Reform of the way hospitals, schools and universities are funded still is in the cards.  Certainly the fiscal pressure of Mr. Douglas's tax reforms have made government more accountable for its spending.  On the other hand, an electorally embattled government like Labor's is likely to be prey to much pleading from special-interest groups.  The jury still is out on the Palmer/Caygill team.  But it is safe to say New Zealand has ceased to be a fashionable anecdote of libertarian experimentation.  A niche amid the now-graying ranks of staid liberalization policies seems a more likely home.  There will be no "Caygillomics."  For New Zealanders, the circus is over, after five years of heady turmoil.  But for those out of work or those pondering their future in New Zealand, whether as citizens or investors, questions remain.  The government likes to claim that the legacy of Rogernomics has rescued New Zealand from the road to ruin.  But if Labor applies the brakes to the forces it has set in motion, the economic pyrotechnics of the past five years will have produced only bigger government and a much heftier overall tax burden.  That's an unlikely starting point for an economic renaissance.  ---  Mr. Upton is associate finance spokesman for the National Party.  Rockwell International Corp. said it completed an internal investigation at its Rocky Flats nuclear-bomb plant and determined that the government's allegations of wrongdoing there are unfounded.  In its strongest and most specific rebuttal to charges made about the plant's activities, Rockwell concluded that "our investigation clearly disproves the existence of criminal conduct" at Rocky Flats, a vast facility run for the Energy Department just outside Denver.  Last month, a federal grand jury began mulling evidence in the case, including infrared photographs the government has said show that Rockwell illegally dumped toxic chemicals from Rocky Flats into neighboring streams and burned hazardous waste in an incinerator that was supposed to have been shut down.  Hundreds of news reports about an array of allegedly illegal activities at Rocky Flats have stemmed from an affidavit prepared by the Federal Bureau of Investigation to secure a search warrant for the 6,550-acre site.  The document, which detailed the existence of the infrared photos and contained other condemning information, was unsealed in June.  But Rockwell disputed the affidavit point by point, and in a 12-page letter sent last week to Michael Norton, the U.S. attorney in Denver, the company maintained, "The allegations in the affidavit have created an atmosphere of public hysteria. . . .  we urge you to work with us to ease the public concerns your investigation has generated.  In fulfilling your public office, we believe you can do no less."  In the letter to Mr. Norton, Rockwell said it couldn't have clandestinely burned the incinerator in December 1988 as the FBI alleged because for it to be used, scores of workers must be involved, and "we believe that no one interviewed by the government stated that the incinerator was operating."  Moreover, the company said, a Rockwell review of numerous records and a DOE report examining "six document trails" showed that the incinerator was shuttered.  Instead, the company suggested, the infrared images obtained by the FBI were probably caused by an exhaust system that, for safety reasons, must continually belch heated air -- even when the incinerator itself is idled.  "The chimney is always thermally active," Rockwell said, adding that it has been frustrated in its attempts to review the government's infrared photos so "we may put this issue to rest."  The company took similar stands against other allegations made in the affidavit.  It said, for instance, that many of the chemicals purportedly dumped in Walnut Creek turned out to be common, household items such as vinegar and alcohol.  And, Rockwell said, sewage the FBI alleged was flowing from Rocky Flats to Woman Creek was actually going into a drainage area under proper permit.  "Our investigation confirms Rockwell's original position that we have managed the facility responsibly and effectively," Chairman Donald R. Beall said yesterday from the aerospace company's El Segundo, Calif., headquarters.  "The government must now do its part by setting the record straight and disclosing all the facts."  Mr. Norton couldn't be reached yesterday, but he has replied to Rockwell's letter, contending that "until this investigation is completed, we will have no further public comment to make concerning its direction or its activities."  As a result of that response, Rockwell has called on the governor of Colorado and other officials to help pressure the Justice Department into making available the information that the company claims will "allay public fears" about Rocky Flats.  A spokeswoman for Gov. Roy Romer said he had no immediate reaction, but he will meet today with Energy Secretary James Watkins and might make a statement after that.  Working Clashes  ("Increase in nation's total employment figures raises concern among inflation watchers." -- News note)  Time was when news of more people employed  Caused the hopes of the nation to bloom;  Now it prompts predictions of peril  By purveyors of gloom and doom.  -- George O. Ludcke.  ---  Sub Human]  My corporate ego takes a beating  Each summer vacation, when I learn  That my vital slot with the firm  Gets filled by a student intern.  -- Edward F. Dempsey.  Australia's Federal Court set aside a regulator's ruling that entrepreneur Alan Bond is unfit to hold radio and television broadcast licenses.  But the court denied a request by Mr. Bond to end the Australian Broadcasting Tribunal's inquiry into his media operations.  That left the tribunal with the options of resuming its inquiry, within limits set by the court; announcing what other action, if any, it will take against Mr. Bond; or appealing the ruling to the High Court, the country's highest legal forum.  A spokeswoman for the tribunal said a decision about its next step won't be taken until its regulators examine the judgment more closely.  Mr. Bond said in a statement he is "extremely pleased" by the decision, which he said "will give great encouragement" to the thousands of employees and shareholders of his troubled Bond Corp. Holdings.  Regardless of the tribunal's next move, Mr. Bond still must weather other regulatory and corporate storms.  His Bond Corp. empire of brewing, media, property and resources interests is caught in a cash bind.  Australian corporate regulators have announced a formal inquiry into some of his business activities, as well as those of other Bond Corp. directors.  And Mr. Bond is locked in a messy legal battle with his former business ally, the state government of Western Australia.  Mr. Bond has been jockeying to find a way to ease his financial troubles and is expected to announce soon another attempt to restructure his most valuable asset, Bond Corp.'s brewing operations.  While the court's decision yesterday potentially relieves regulatory pressure on Mr. Bond to sell his controlling stake in Bond Media Ltd., which operates a commercial TV network in Australia, some analysts think Bond Corp. may be forced to sell Bond Media to raise cash.  Mr. Bond repeated yesterday that he has no intention of selling the controlling stake.  The broadcasting tribunal ruled in June that Mr. Bond and his companies weren't "fit and proper" to control radio and TV stations because it found in a year-long investigation that he made an improper payment to an Australian politician to settle a defamation claim, that he threatened an insurance company with a media attack through his TV network, and that he gave misleading evidence.  But the court said yesterday that the tribunal made "reviewable" errors in the inquiry.  It cited in particular regulators' failure to consider evidence about Mr. Bond's role in the management of his media outlets, "although the legal relevance of such evidence was manifest."  Congress has a rare opportunity to launch what could be the most successful urban jobs program in American history, and all it would require is a minor change in immigration policy -- which is being restructured by Congress anyway.  Under the Entrepreneurial Immigrant Program, any enterprising foreigner willing to invest at least a quarter of a million dollars in a new business in an economically depressed area would be awarded an immediate visa.  The prospective immigrant would be required to create at least five new jobs for U.S. workers and would have to agree to operate in the depressed area for at least five years.  A confession: This is not an entirely new idea.  Canada has had a business immigrant program for almost 10 years and the Kennedy-Simpson immigration bill, which passed the Senate in July and soon will be taken up by the House of Representatives, would allow 6,800 investor immigrants into the U.S.  Two thousand visas would be reserved for immigrants willing to invest at least $500,000 in a new commercial enterprise with at least 10 employees in a disadvantaged rural or urban area.  Championing the idea are Sens.  Phil Gramm (R., Tex.), a conservative, and Paul Simon (D., Ill,), a liberal.  But there's really no reason to limit the number of entrepreneurial immigrants at all.  If 2,000 such immigrants are good for the country, why not 10,000?  The American public's main criticism of immigrants has always been the dubious claim that they take jobs from U.S. workers.  Those entering the U.S. under the entrepreneurial immigrant program would be making jobs, not taking them.  By requiring a minimum $500,000 investment, however, the Senate bill would prevent many people with more modest amounts of capital from starting small businesses in parts of the country where jobs are in short supply.  Small businesses often start with an initial capital investment of far less than $500,000.  Thus, the proposed alternative Entrepreneurial Immigrant Program would require a start-up investment of only $250,000, about the amount required under Canada's program.  Would such a program work?  In Canada, the "Business Immigrant" program is working well.  According to Canada's Employment and Immigration Office, in 1988 alone 3,258 foreign entrepreneurs -- predominantly Asians -- invested nearly $2 billion in new businesses, creating nearly 15,000 jobs for Canadians.  These new ventures were not just restaurants and corner grocery stores.  Many of the immigrants started firms in manufacturing, financial services, textiles, computer services and export-import.  Residential real estate is not considered a commercial enterprise under the program.Canada's former minister of state for immigration, Gerry Weiner, has quipped that the U.S. would be doing Canada a great favor by keeping the American immigration system "exactly like it is."  One criticism of such an Entrepreneurial Immigrant Program for the U.S. is that it would invite more foreign investors to buy up American assets.  This fear of foreign investment -- several bills under consideration in Congress aim to regulate the flow of capital into the U.S. -- is grounded in xenophobia, not economics.  If anything, the Entrepreneurial Immigrant Program would reverse the "problem" of foreign investment.  The whole idea is to attract foreign investors who want to live here and want to become American citizens.  Today, many of these people can't gain visas, and the profits from their investments flow abroad.  The Entrepreneurial Immigrant Program would put the profits from these new enterprises to work here.  Others object to the investor immigrant program because they claim that it would permit wealthy foreigners to "buy their way past the Statue of Liberty."  But is a successful entrepreneur less deserving of a visa than a foreigner with a Ph.D., or the brother or sister of a U.S. resident or a farm worker -- three groups that now receive preferential treatment under immigration law?  If the U.S. must ration visas, why not give at least some consideration to those who will provide immediate benefits to U.S. citizens?  Over the past three decades Congress has tried dozens of approaches to revitalize decaying urban and rural areas, usually without success.  It spent nearly $5 billion on the Urban Development Action Grant program; the program became little more than a political slush fund and was mercifully defunded in 1988.  Despite an annual $3 billion budget, the Community Development Block Grant program has similarly failed, as has the 25-year-old Appalachian Regional Commission, which spends about $100 million a year, targeting much of its aid to counties that have unemployment rates far below the national average.  To its credit, Congress is now reassessing how best to stimulate economic activity in distressed areas.  HUD Secretary Jack Kemp's push for enterprise zones, which offer tax and regulatory relief to investors in decaying areas, is one new approach that holds promise.  The Entrepreneurial Immigrant Program is similarly promising.  ---  Mr. Moore is a fellow in federal budgetary affairs at the Heritage Foundation.  Apple Computer Inc. will unveil its long-awaited portable computer in Los Angeles next Wednesday, but those familiar with the machine are giving it mixed reviews.  "I don't think people will find it very exciting," said Andy Hertzfeld, an independent engineer who designed the system software for Apple's original Macintosh computer.  The portable's biggest drawbacks: weight, size and price.  It weighs nearly 16 pounds, is too bulky to fit either on a person's lap or an airline tray table and will cost $5,800 to $7,000.  "At that price someone will have to really need one to buy it," said Neil Shapiro, who runs a computer bulletin board on Compuserve for Macintosh users.  Despite a lukewarm reception from enthusiasts, Apple is billing the machine as a "no compromise Mac," citing a new type of display screen and a novel cursor mechanism, among other things.  The company is expected to sell many of the portables because they use the same proprietary software as the company's popular Macintosh machines.  "Apple will have no problem selling every unit it produces over the next six months," said Mark Eppley, president of Traveling Software Inc., Bothell, Wash., which makes software for portables.  "There's just incredible demand for a battery-operated Mac."  In its fiscal year beginning Oct. 1, Apple, which will make the portables available immediately, is likely to sell nearly 100,000 portables, worth about $400 million, estimates Daniel Benton, an analyst at Goldman, Sachs & Co.  In its current fiscal year, Apple's total sales are expected to exceed $5 billion.  Besides adding to its bottom line, Apple hopes its new portable will enhance its reputation as a leader in bringing new computing technologies to market.  Since the departure of co-founder Steven Jobs four years ago, the company has been criticized for introducing products that don't break new ground, but rely instead on well-worn technology.  With the portable, John Sculley, Apple's chief executive officer, hopes to quell such talk by showing he's willing to push the margins of technology.  "Sculley's proving he's not riding on Jobs's coattails," Mr. Eppley said.  Others say it's too soon to tell whether the portable's display screen -- its major innovation -- is a boom or a bust.  Choosing the right display screen has always been at the heart of Apple's challenge in bringing a portable to market.  For years, Apple held back from entering the business mainly because it couldn't find a display screen it felt could adequately represent its graphics-oriented software and point-and-click mouse cursor.  More than two years ago, the company decided to use a new, largely untried display in which each screen dot, or pixel, is turned on or off by an integrated circuit.  This so-called active-matrix display gives a more vivid picture than liquid-crystal displays used in Zenith, Toshiba and other popular portables, but it costs more.  To keep costs down, Apple chose a black-and-white display.  Even so, the new display is "probably the most dazzling part of the portable," said Michele Preston, analyst at Salomon Brothers.  It's also the riskiest.  Active-matrix displays are only available for use in computers today in small quantities because they are very difficult to manufacture.  Because each is basically a sheet of semiconductors, several imperfections can spoil an entire display.  Only one tiny U.S. firm builds them.  Major Japanese electronics firms, including Sharp and Toshiba, have invested heavily in the technology, but they have decided to concentrate their efforts on far-costlier color displays.  That leaves Apple reliant on two small Japanese producers of active-matrix displays.  Apple won't identify the display suppliers but sources say that they are Hosiden, the major supplier, and Kyocera, the newcomer.  Shortages of active-matrix displays could plague Apple for as long as two years, said Joseph Castellano, president of Stanford Resources Inc., which researches the electronic display market.  Even then, "it's likely that the most plentiful displays will be color," he said.  "No one's making a major investment in black-and-white."  Besides the short supply, there is another problem.  While users of Apple's portable say the machine displays icons, graphics and a moving cursor flawlessly, they complain that the screen loses its luster in dull light.  Makers of competing portables say they aren't surprised.  "Apple's introducing a technology that's not a reliable, high-volume technology yet," said Andrew Czernek, vice president of marketing for Zenith Data Systems, a maker of portables.  "It's a potential product killer."  The other novel features in Apple's portable are less risky.  Instead of a mouse, the machine uses a trackball, embedded in the keyboard, to direct the cursor.  The life of the battery, meanwhile, was extended by reducing power consumption.  An icon on screen illustrates the power remaining in the battery.  This is made easier, sources said, because Apple selected a lead-acid battery rather than a conventional one.  The use of a lead-acid battery, however, may have so increased the portable's size and weight that few people will use it while they travel.  On an evening pleasure cruise along the Volga river, the mood was anything but festive.  Instead of dancing to the blaring disco music, most of the 100 or so passengers, Soviet officials in their 20s, sat on deck in small groups and fretted over the hottest topic in the country these days: the possibility of impending political disaster.  "Do you think civil war is going to break out?"  Stepan Kisilyov, a senior correspondent for the newspaper Komsomolskaya Pravda, asked Viktor Goncharov, a newly elected member of the nation's parliament.  "I just don't know," Mr. Goncharov replied grimly.  "It depends on the army."  "You can't count on them," interjected a friend who serves in the armed forces.  "All the officers who support perestroika have been discharged."  Suddenly, the prospect of Mikhail Gorbachev's great reform experiment collapsing, perhaps in a river of blood, no longer seems beyond question.  Over the past two months, the nation's mood has turned very dark as dozens of long-standing problems have spiraled, apparently out of control.  For the first time, the Soviet media are openly speculating about the prospect of a Kremlin coup.  The doomsday talk has grown so rampant that last weekend Mr. Gorbachev himself, fresh back from his summer vacation, felt compelled to deny rumors about "the threat of a coup or even civil war," accusing both radicals and conservatives of spreading alarm.  The seriousness of these rumors may be put to a test next week when the Communist Party's Central Committee meets.  The Soviet leader is expected to address the thorny "nationalities" problem, and possibly use the occasion to fire some of his outspoken opponents in the Politburo.  Should Mr. Gorbachev successfully take control of his critics on both the left and right, he could emerge with his own centrist standing strengthened.  But should he prove unwilling or unable to take on his critics, some analysts say he could be weakened, perhaps irremediably.  Despite glasnost, the policy of greater openness, the government's inner machinations remain hidden, making any realistic evaluation of the chances of a coup impossible.  There are no overt signs that conservatives are openly plotting, and nobody knows what the military top brass or the KGB security police -- the two institutions that could play key roles in any power shift -- really think of Mr. Gorbachev.  Both have reasons to be unhappy: The army has been forced to undertake wrenching change, including the demobilization of 500,000 officers, as it implements unilateral cuts in conventional arms.  And the KGB, still the most secretive and feared body in the country, is under intense pressure to open up its activities to public scrutiny, something no intelligence service in the world does willingly.  At the same time, Mr. Gorbachev remains widely popular, though less so than he is in the West.  Public support for his sweeping program of change, however, is being sorely tested by the country's worsening problems.  In almost every republic, latent ethnic tensions have exploded into the open, and hundreds have been killed in race riots in the south.  Moldavia, Azerbaijan and the runaway Baltic republics have been plunged into political turmoil as nationalists have put themselves on a collision course with Moscow.  On top of this, ever since the coal miners of Siberia and the Ukraine stopped work in July and won major concessions, political strikes have become a potent weapon used by a variety of groups with grievances.  The miners' strike, which ended when the Soviet leadership caved in to all their demands and made perhaps rash promises of quick improvement, cost the country millions and reinforced the reformers' fears.  Now, in the nation's republics, opponents of the present system are also learning to organize.  Strikes by ethnic groups have paralyzed Moldavia and Azerbaijan in recent weeks, and they may catch on among the numerous other nationalities with grievances, including Crimean Tatars, ethnic Germans and Abkhazians, a minority that lives in Georgia.  "The miners' strike is the first warning bell that we're moving toward a disaster," says Abel Aganbegyan, a leading Soviet economist.  He cites the precedent of Poland, saying that strikes by Solidarity there destroyed the economy.  The U.S.S.R. can't afford a similar experience, he says, adding that drastic measures are needed.  Violent crime, racketeering and gang warfare are on the rise, too.  Most troublesome for the Soviet leadership is that the economic reforms it started to implement two years ago have not only failed to improve living standards, they have even made some things worse.  Almost every week, another household item joins the list of goods in short supply.  The latest nationwide shortage is of tea, a beverage Russians traditionally consume in vast quantities.  Many seem close to despair as the economy continues to deteriorate.  Tass news agency estimates that 1,000 out of the 1,200 goods that make up the standard Soviet "basket of consumer goods" are now in short supply.  A visit to a grimy supermarket in the center of Volzhsky, an industrial town near Volgograd, shows why disgruntlement is on the rise.  One morning, the wire baskets arranged along the sides of the dimly lit store are empty but for dirty jars of pickled green tomatoes and small cans of herring in a sickly tomato sauce.  At the meat counter, there is no meat or sausage, just two small gray chickens and lumps of lard.  The store has no fresh vegetables, no salt, no washing powder and no sugar.  There are some glasses of yogurt, but it is old and turning yellow.  A middle-aged man with a string shopping bag walks in, wanders around grumbling and walks out again without buying anything.  Suddenly, a blue truck drives up and delivers some boxes.  As they are unloaded at a desk near the cashier, a line quickly forms around the desk, even though people don't know what the boxes contain.  As a woman unpacks them, they crane forward and see that they are filled with filter cigarettes -- yet another commodity in short supply here.  The first man in the line buys 30 packs, cramming them into the pockets of his suit.  "Our way of life is horrible and abnormal," one Moscow pensioner wrote to a newspaper in the capital recently.  "It has never been like this before. . . .  Even during such a terrible time as the war, we were not so afraid of tomorrow."  As internal political tension mounts, the debate is now focusing squarely on Mr. Gorbachev himself.  Soviet intellectuals have fretted about the future of Mr. Gorbachev's reforms ever since he started implementing them.  But their talk about civil war, even if it remains just talk, marks a new and dangerous low point.  Many believe that the reformers in the Kremlin are losing control.  The present black mood contrasts sharply with the jubilation many felt at the opening of the first democratically elected Soviet parliament last spring, which heard unprecedented criticism of the system and numerous calls for more rapid change.  But some of the most ardent supporters of reform soon grew disillusioned when they realized they were in a distinct minority.  Since then, a group of reformist parliamentarians has been formed under the leadership of Kremlin maverick Boris Yeltsin, in effect a political faction of the type banned since the days of Lenin.  This splintering of party unity has emboldened Mr. Gorbachev's critics.  On a visit to the U.S. this week, Mr. Yeltsin went so far as to predict that Mr. Gorbachev has only six months to a year to show progress, or else he will face "a revolution from below."  Several Western analysts here also believe that the disillusionment has been partly fueled by the crackdown in China following Mr. Gorbachev's visit there.  "Events in China came as a shock," says one European diplomat.  "They showed that reforms often don't work, that they can be reversed."  So far, Mr. Gorbachev seems unwilling to follow the example of Chinese leader Deng Xiaoping and start a retrenchment.  Visiting a Leningrad factory in early July, he told the workers there, "If I were faced with the choice of returning to the old system of leading and running the country, I would immediately resign."  And in his televised speech last weekend, the Soviet leader again pledged to forge ahead with his plans for reform, promising that "the Soviet Communist Party will be able to fulfill its role as society's political vanguard."  But as the list of problems has grown, even Mr. Gorbachev's confidence has failed to reassure those who fear an impending crisis.  He himself has acknowledged that life has grown worse, not better for people during perestroika, and said that "society feels the utmost importance of the present moment."  Public fears have been further inflamed by ominous statements from people such as Yegor Ligachev, a conservative rival of Mr. Gorbachev, who has become a figurehead for those Soviets who fear that perestroika and glasnost have already gone much too far.  "Nationalists and separatists of various hues are actively working to disunite and weaken the leadership," Mr. Ligachev said in one recent Soviet television interview.  "We must take measures . . . to guarantee the security of our country."  Mr. Ligachev didn't elaborate on the measures he had in mind, although he said they should be political and not dictatorial.  His statement came amid a fierce Brezhnev-style propaganda campaign in the Communist Party daily Pravda that has painted grass-roots political movements in the Baltics and elsewhere as antidemocratic forces bent on destroying the Soviet state.  The harsh tenor of the rhetoric caused many to wonder whether it had been launched without Mr. Gorbachev's supervision.  Other conservatives have been even more explicit.  A Communist official in the Ulyanovsk region in Central Russia last month issued a withering attack on the nation's elected parliament, the centerpiece of Mr. Gorbachev's political reforms, and called for a nationwide party purge.  Justifying his call for a purge, Oleg Kasarov wrote: "There were also purges under Lenin. . . .  For many years we took from Lenin only what was convenient.  Isn't this also happening in the era of perestroika?"  Even more ominous, some writers have begun to draw parallels to the ouster of Soviet leader Nikita Khrushchev in 1964.  A recent article in Moskovskaya Pravda asked bluntly whether such a move could be repeated today.  "To call things by their names instead of hiding behind euphemisms, it is ultimately a question of a political coup, the removal of the leadership headed by Gorbachev, or at least making that leadership change course in running the country," Nikolai Mikhailov wrote.  Although he concluded that the new spirit of democracy and pluralism in the nation could act as a safeguard against another coup, Mr. Mikhailov conceded that many of the conditions leading to Mr. Khrushchev's downfall are present today.  "The situation in 1989 is immeasurably more acute than it was 25 years ago," he wrote.  "In 1964 we had no inkling of the present inter-ethnic conflicts and ecological problems, the scale of today's inflation, the situation that exists on the food and commodity market, the burgeoning of organized crime, corruption and so on."  Another article, in the weekly Argumenty I Fakti, even went so far as to describe the stages leading to civil war.  Leningrad author Sergei Andreyev suggested that nationalist turmoil and strikes in industry could be followed by widespread riots and the creation of vigilante groups by highly placed opponents of perestroika.  Ultimately, responding to growing calls for law and order, the Soviet leadership would have to impose martial law and send tanks into the streets, he wrote.  Soviet reform-minded intellectuals are now desperately thinking through ways to prevent disaster.  One possibility, aired by Andranik Migranyan, a researcher at a prestigious Moscow think-tank, would be for parliament to grant Mr. Gorbachev extraordinary powers to suspend the constitution and form a "national salvation committee" -- a step the Soviet leader shows no inclination to take.  Until recently, much of the talk of political disaster had been among intellectuals.  But now it is starting to catch on among ordinary men and women too.  The refrain to one of the most popular songs on the Soviet charts these days, by the group DDT, goes: "We're anticipating civil war."  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Beatrice Co., offering of $200 million of senior reset notes and $150 million of senior floating rate notes, via Salomon Brothers Inc.  KnowledgeWare Inc., proposed initial offering of 2.4 million common shares, of which 1,657,736 will be sold by the company and 742,264 will be sold by holders, via Montgomery Securities and Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  Marsam Pharmaceuticals Inc., offering of 1.3 million common shares, of which one million shares will be sold by the company and 300,000 shares will be sold by holders, via Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Navistar Financial Corp., a unit of Navistar International Transportation Corp., shelf offering of up to $400 million principal amount of debt securities.  Sequa Corp., shelf offering of up to $250 million principal amount of debt securities.  Tidewater Inc., offering of 4,631,400 common shares held by the Jacobs Group, via Salomon Brothers, Howard, Weil, Labouisse, Friedrichs Inc., and others.  The Bush administration, in a bid to help U.S. exporters, will seek "vigorous new negotiations" aimed at persuading other industrialized nations to limit the practice of providing aid to countries that agree to buy their goods.  Citing budgetary constraints and other factors, the administration said it has decided against seeking funds for a new U.S. "tied-aid" program.  Instead, the administration said it will recommend that available funds be used to help the U.S. gain leverage in the planned negotiations.  And within budget constraints, it wants to increase financing for overseas construction projects involving U.S. companies, which have been losing business to foreign competitors.  Tied aid consists of grants or low-interest loans offered to foreign buyers by a country on the condition that the buyer uses the money to purchase goods from the aid-providing nation.  Japan, West European nations and Canada -- who together provide as much as 75% of all such aid for capital projects -- have used the device to win contracts to supply telecommunications, railways, electric power and other capital and infrastructure projects in developing nations.  The U.S. accounts for only 2% of tied-aid credit for such projects.  Tied aid is a hot political issue, particularly because of the nation's continuing trade deficit.  In 1988, the U.S. ran a $128 billion merchandise trade deficit.  Because of the recent strengthening of the dollar, many economists fear the deficit could worsen in the coming months.  Last April, the Export-Import Bank estimated that U.S. exporters are losing hundreds of millions of dollars of potential exports every year because of tied-aid practices by other nations.  "The administration hereby recommits itself to working with Congress to ensure that, to the maximum possible degree, competition in our export markets focuses on price, quality and service rather than on the availability of concessional financing," Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady and Export-Import Bank Chairman John Macomber said in a letter to Congress.  The Bush administration already has suggested that industrial nations agree to several modifications to current tied-aid practices.  These include "untying" aid programs for capital projects so that recipients wouldn't be obliged to buy from donor countries but could use the aid to buy elsewhere, too.  Other suggestions include limiting use of tied aid to particular sectors or markets and banning the introduction of tied-aid credits late in the process of bidding.  The negotiations on ending tied aid will be held under the auspices of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, the Paris-based group of developed countries.  To back its negotiating strategy, the administration said it will use the Tied Aid Credit Fund, or "war chest" as it is known, more aggressively than in the past.  The fund has been used since 1987 to encourage adherence to earlier agreements on tied credit.  The administration proposes using it to provide tied aid in areas of specific interest to U.S. exporters where competitors also use tied credits.  The Agency for International Development also will maximize its support for foreign capital projects, the administration said in its report to Congress.  The administration added that if "sufficient progress isn't made toward achieving our negotiating objectives," it would retain the option of recommending that additional resources be devoted to the establishment of a U.S. tied-aid credit program.  The House overwhelmingly approved a statute designed to circumvent a Supreme Court ruling that bars punishing a person who burns the U.S. flag as a political protest.  The 380-38 vote came after House Speaker Thomas Foley assured proponents of a constitutional amendment barring physical attacks on the flag that he would schedule a House vote on it later this year if the statute passed.  Republican lawmakers were upset that the measure was considered under a House procedure that precluded any attempts to either alter the statute or offer a constitutional amendment in its place.  The method requires a two-thirds majority, and House Republicans had threatened to withhold support to force a vote on an amendment.  Only a handful of liberal Democrats and conservative Republicans voted against the measure.  Before the vote, Mr. Foley assured House GOP Leader Robert Michel of Illinois and G.V. "Sonny" Montgomery (D., Miss.), chairman of the House Veterans' Affairs Committee, that if the statute is enacted, the House would vote on a proposed constitutional amendment the two men are sponsoring.  Rep. Foley opposes the amendment.  A constitutional amendment requires a two-thirds majority in both the House and Senate and the approval of 38 of the 50 state legislatures.  The Senate is to vote on a statute protecting the flag and on a constitutional amendment by mid-October.  Senate Judiciary Committee hearings on an amendment are to begin today.  Mr. Foley said the House vote would come after the Senate action.  As wary as Speaker Foley is of tampering with the First Amendment, he is also aware of the political risks in blocking a vote on a constitutional amendment.  "We're against it, but we're not going to use the scheduling of the House as a weapon," said an aide to the Washington state Democrat.  In a statement, the Bush administration reiterated its support for a constitutional amendment to ban flag burning.  The administration labeled the bill "merely a symbolic gesture and not a serious effort to provide real protection for the flag."  Talk of a presidential veto is "premature," according to White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater.  Democrats are still angry and nervous over the way President Bush used the flag to associate himself with patriotic values in last year's presidential campaign and are fearful of being driven into the same corner that Michael Dukakis found himself on the Pledge of Allegiance issue.  The House-passed measure would make it a crime for anyone to "knowingly mutilate, deface, burn or trample upon" a flag, punishable by as long as one year in jail and an unspecified fine.  An exception would be made for disposing of a worn or soiled flag.  Currently, federal law makes it a crime to "knowingly cast contempt" upon a flag by "publicly mutilating, defacing, defiling, burning or trampling upon it" and provides penalties of as long as a year in jail and a fine of as much as $1,000.  In June, the Supreme Court threw out the conviction of a Texas man who set a flag afire during a 1984 demonstration.  The court said he was "engaging in political expression" that is protected by the First Amendment.  By dropping the phrase "cast contempt," proponents of the legislation believe it would avoid the court's objection by targeting an action rather than the intent behind it.  Boeing Co.'s Boeing Canada, de Havilland Division said it received a $26 million order for three Dash 8 Series 100 commuter airplanes from Air Dolomiti, an Italian carrier.  The first of the 37-passenger aircraft is scheduled to begin service in the third quarter of 1990, Boeing Canada said.  The latest order brings to 315 total orders for all series of the Dash 8.  Seattle-based Boeing is an aerospace and defense contracting concern.  The East German government's fury at its ally Hungary for allowing East German tourists to flee to the West is only one sign of a new dynamic that promises to be a source of recurrent conflict through the 1990s.  As East-West tension subsides under the impact of "glasnost" and liberalization in Poland and Hungary, tensions within the Warsaw Pact will continue to grow.  Hungary announced the unilateral "suspension" of its treaty obligation to return East Germans to East Germany, so the exodus, and the diplomatic friction, is bound to continue.  Moreover, this is far from the first clash between Hungary and its Warsaw Pact allies since the May 1988 Hungarian Communist Party Congress that set Budapest on the path of liberalization.  Early this year, Hungary joined with Western and other non-Communist governments in calling for an investigation of abuses by the government of Romania.  This summer it unilaterally canceled a joint project with Czechoslovakia to build a huge new dam complex on the Danube -- a project vigorously opposed by Hungary's democratic movements for its utter disregard of environmental consequences.  In response to the cancellation, the Czech government has threatened to sue.  Last month, when 10,000 Czechs defied their government to commemorate the 1968 Warsaw Pact invasion that ended the liberal regime of Alexander Dubcek, democratic activists from Hungary and Poland joined them.  One of the Hungarians managed to videotape the demonstration, and the tape was then broadcast by Hungarian state television.  Thus, the many Czechs who receive Hungarian TV signals could see for themselves a different version of the events than their official media were putting out.  While the Czech government objected to the Hungarian broadcast, the Hungarian foreign minister warned that Prague's detention of two Hungarians who had taken part in the demonstration would "disturb bilateral relations."  This was not the first time that Hungarian state television had irked the Czech government.  This spring it ran two interviews with Mr. Dubcek despite protests from Prague.  Another Hungarian broadcast, an interview with former King Michael of Romania, prompted Bucharest to recall its ambassador.  Now that Polish television is scheduled to come under the direction of a non-Communist minister, Czechs should be able to receive many more broadcasts that the Prague authorities will find offensive.  What is true for TV broadcasts will perforce also apply to print media.  Already East Germany, like Cuba, has begun banning some Soviet periodicals for their excessive liberalism.  What will the East Bloc censors do now that Poland's vast array of independent publications will become legal and above ground?  On the economic front, both Poland and Hungary harbor hopes of making their currencies convertible.  This would be a milestone on the path of economic rebirth, but it would complicate and perhaps eviscerate Poland's and Hungary's trade relations within the Eastern Bloc.  On the diplomatic front, the two countries are bound to be less observant of bloc discipline in the U.N. and in Helsinki review meetings.  On the ideological front, the new Polish Legislature, with the support of most of its Communist members, has voted to repudiate Poland's participation in the 1968 invasion of Czechoslovakia.  Hungarian Communists have done likewise.  This leaves the Prague government in the anomalous position of still justifying an invasion of its own country that some of the invaders now call unjustifiable.  Even on the military front small rumbles can be heard.  An official of the Hungarian Communist Party Central Committee's foreign-policy department raised a ruckus by declaring that the larger threat to Hungary's security comes not from the West but from Romania.  Such military rumblings probably will grow no louder.  Eastern European liberalizers, both Communists and democrats, are united in their wish not to arouse security worries in the Kremlin.  But the economic, diplomatic and ideological pressures on the non-liberalizing regimes in Eastern Europe are sure to intensify.  Communist regimes rely on regimentation and indoctrination.  Modern communications technology has proved corrosive of these.  The spread of liberalism behind the iron curtain will prove even more so.  Now, challenges to control and legitimacy will come not only from the "imperialists" but from within the "socialist camp" itself.  East Germany, Romania and Czechoslovakia increasingly will face a choice.  If they defy the winds of reform, they will have to resist the penetration of their borders by subversive people, publications, broadcasts, and perhaps even technology (like copying machines) not only from the West but from other parts of the East.  Their propaganda mills will have to work overtime to rebut the criticism from fellow pact members.  And perhaps they will have to stop letting their own citizens travel to those Communist states that will not promise to return them.  In short, the iron curtain will be drawn tighter around a radically reduced circumference.  A far happier scenario would show at least one of these hard-line states yielding to the reform current.  Given its democratic experience before World War II, as well as Mr. Dubcek's "Prague Spring," Czechoslovakia would be the most likely candidate. (Strong democratic sentiment exists among the people, but the Communist Party's reformers were rather thoroughly purged after 1968.) If Czechoslovakia were to join the reform camp, it would create a band of liberalizing states across the center of Eastern Europe whose progress would be hard to reverse.  It is hard to say which scenario is more likely.  But what seems certain is that if reform continues apace in Hungary and Poland, then the Eastern Bloc will soon learn its own version of a lesson Americans confronted a century ago-that a house divided against itself cannot stand.  ---  Mr. Muravchik is a resident scholar at the American Enterprise Institute.  Despite recent disclosures of alleged fraud, MiniScribe Corp. hasn't lost a major customer in several months and hopes to return to profitability by the first quarter of 1990, said Richard Rifenburgh, chairman and chief executive of the disk-drive maker.  In a telephone conference with more than a dozen industry analysts, Mr. Rifenburgh painted a generally upbeat future picture for MiniScribe, noting sales are expected to drop only modestly this year, to more than $500 million, compared with an unaudited $603 million in 1988.  But analysts who follow MiniScribe were less sanguine.  MiniScribe's stock, already battered by disclosures of questionable financial results, closed at $1.3125 a share, down 75 cents in national over-the-counter trading.  It was the most actively traded over-the-counter stock yesterday, with more than 3.1 million shares trading hands.  The company has said that it is operating at a loss, but hasn't produced quarterly financial figures this year and has said that it can't produce reliable financial results for at least the past three years.  Mr. Rifenburgh took the reins at MiniScribe in February after the abrupt resignation of Q.T. Wiles, the corporate turnaround artist who had been summoned in 1985 when the company was in financial trouble.  Soon the company was posting sharp gains in earnings and profits.  But an internal investigation ordered by Mr. Rifenburgh, a summary of which was released late Monday, showed that senior officials at the company used a variety of ruses to fabricate sales gains, including counting shipments of bricks and defective drives as sales.  Much of the company's hopes are pinned on a new 3 1/2-inch disk drive that is only one inch tall and which MiniScribe hopes to ship in volume in early 1990.  Mr. Rifenburgh said six MiniScribe customers have evaluated prototypes thus far and have unanimously given them high performance ratings.  But problems remain.  Alexa McCloughan, an analyst who follows MiniScribe for Goldman, Sachs & Co., said she doesn't question the company's viability, at least in the short term, but wonders whether it can become profitable.  Steven L. Ossad, of Montgomery Securities, said he is troubled by MiniScribe's repeated refusal to identify major customers.  He also believes that MiniScribe won't get its next generation of disk drives, the 2 1/2-inch models, into the marketplace in time to capture a significant market share.  Mr. Rifenburgh said that model won't go into production before late 1990 or early 1991.  Mr. Rifenburgh also acknowledged that he has visited Japan in recent weeks to resolve quality and delivery problems at MiniScribe's sole source of microprocessors.  Although the problems may cause some short-term shortages, Mr. Rifenburgh said he believes the problems have been solved.  He also acknowledged that technical problems with the drive's software have pushed back production dates, although he said the delays have been less than a quarter.  MiniScribe's cash situation was described by Mr. Rifenburgh as "pretty good," as reflected in a reduction of accounts payable from $160 million to less than $100 million.  But much of the company's positive cash flow in recent months has been created by its willingness to "cannibalize" inventory, he added, and MiniScribe has used up its short-term credit line of $70 million.  The company is also saddled with $97 million in convertible debentures and approximately $100 million in trade debt.  The credit crunch means the company will have to turn to existing assets for working capital to gear up production of the one-inch drives.  Separately, Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it downgraded the company's long-term subordinated debt, due 2012, to Ca from Caa.  The size of MiniScribe's asset base will remain unknown for at least another six weeks.  Mr. Rifenburgh said the company's auditors, Coopers & Lybrand, still are "not far enough along to put numbers" on MiniScribe's financial situation.  "I think it's clear that we'll have a pretty significant negative net worth," he added.  Asked about the financial overhang created by a dozen shareholder lawsuits, Mr. Rifenburgh noted that the plaintiffs, mostly shareholders, would be "silly" to push MiniScribe into Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceedings because the company's debtors would take precedence.  The suits, he added, are "just a burden you have to live with, although in this case they obviously have some merit."  Mickey Mouse came courting European investors yesterday -- and he's expected to go home a happy rodent.  Walt Disney Co., with its usual fanfare, unveiled plans to offer European Community residents nearly 51% of the shares in its "Euro Disneyland."  To help push shares in the French project, the U.S. company climaxed a news briefing here by introducing a "special guest" -- a larger-than-life Mickey Mouse character who shook hands and posed for pictures.  Disney is transforming 4,800 acres of sugar-beet farmland 20 miles east of Paris into a gigantic $3 billion theme park and resort.  The European complex, set to open in early 1992 as Disney's biggest project ever, will join similar parks in Anaheim, Calif.; Orlando, Fla.; and Tokyo.  Disney so far has spent about $300 million on Euro Disneyland.  The share issue will represent "the first public offering of shares in all EC countries simultaneously" at its launch next month, Gary Wilson, Disney executive vice president and chief financial officer, told the London news conference.  Investors also will have a chance to own a chunk of a Disney theme park for the first time, added John Forsgren, Disney treasurer.  Disney will keep a 49% interest in Euro Disneyland, Disney officials said, emphasizing that the French government required placement of more than half the shares with EC investors.  But such shareholders will be free to sell their stakes to U.S. investors 90 days after the offer occurs, Mr. Forsgren said.  The ambitious issue should successfully raise about six billion French francs ($894.5 million) as long as Disney doesn't price it too aggressively, analysts said.  The company's "theme parks are a very proven concept," observed Robert Miller-Bakewell, an investment analyst at U.K. brokers County NatWest WoodMac.  "Secondly, the Disney name has a very strong cachet to it."  Disney doesn't think it's leaving much to chance.  The company's promotion effort for its issue will include advertisements in 35 European newspapers and a 10-city "road show" for financial analysts and the news media.  While Disney's well-known name may assure success for the Euro Disneyland share offering, the park itself isn't a sure-fire winner.  Three other theme parks recently have opened or soon will do so in France.  MCA Inc., Disney's bitter U.S. rival, also is looking at theme-park projects in France and England.  Then there's the Babel of European languages and the often inclement Paris weather.  The French have emphasized that French will be the "first" language of the park (although everything also will be written in English).  "There will, whenever possible, be universal sign posting, and many attractions will be identified by visual cues," Disney said in the offer's preliminary prospectus released yesterday.  To overcome uncertain local weather, Euro Disneyland will have more indoor attractions and covered waiting areas than other Disney theme parks, according to Bob Fitzpatrick, the European park's president.  And Disneyland's success in Tokyo shows the concept works "in a cold climate and in a much different culture," added Mr. Wilson, the chief financial officer.  About half of the public offer will be sold in France through a syndicate led by Banque Indosuez with Banque Nationale de Paris.  Another fourth of the shares will be offered in Britain, and the rest in remaining EC countries.  Outside of France, the sale will be conducted by a syndicate led by S.G. Warburg Securities with Credit Suisse First Boston Ltd.  The shares will be listed on exchanges in Paris and London, and "as soon as practicable" in Brussels, Warburg said.  ---  Richard Turner in Los Angeles contributed to this article.  Laser printers, which spawned the desktop publishing industry and changed the standards for business documents, are about to get a lot cheaper.  Market leader Hewlett-Packard Co. plans to introduce a low-priced laser printer next week that soon will be sold for a "street price" under $1,000, computer retailers familiar with the product said.  That's a drop of almost 33% from street prices for older models.  "Nobody in the industry was expecting this" price level, said Jonathan Seybold, publisher of Seybold Reports, a Malibu, Calif., newsletter on electronic publishing.  With prices dropping below $1,000, laser printers may start replacing the low-quality dot matrix printers that many computer users now have on their desks.  While plunging prices for personal computers garner lots of attention, the less-noticed drop in laser printer prices may have a more visible impact.  Laser printers have already helped cause the revolution in desktop publishing that has made newsletters attractive and some corporate reports striking.  "Now, you're going to see typographic output used by many more people," Mr. Seybold said.  Top-quality laser printers print an unlimited variety of letters, designs and pictures with almost typeset quality by using a laser beam to "write" on a rotating drum that attracts toner, much like a copier.  Low-priced laser printers use the same technology but handle fewer fonts and can't do fancy graphics.  They offer more capabilities and better quality than the popular dot matrix printers that currently dominate the market, analysts said.  A Hewlett-Packard spokesman confirmed that the Palo Alto, Calif., company plans to introduce a laser printer that can print four pages a minute with a list price of $1,495.  He declined to comment on the price that retailers will charge.  Bobby Orbach, director of business development at 47th St. Computer, a unit of discount retailer 47th St. Photo in New York, said that based on a standard discount, "it's fair to say the price will dribble down to $999."  Market analysts said the pricing by Hewlett-Packard was unexpectedly aggressive.  Trade magazine reports had predicted that Hewlett-Packard's new printers would have a list price between $1,700 and $2,000.  Last month, two U.S. units of Japanese printer makers, Seiko Epson Corp. and Toshiba Corp., both introduced low-end laser printers that print six pages a minute with list prices of $1,899.  Hewlett-Packard, which buys the printer engines from Canon Ltd. of Japan, had about 44% of the low-end laser printer market in the U.S. last year, according to MacDonnell Ulsch, a researcher with American Institute for Business Research, Framingham, Mass.  Market researcher Bis Cap International, Norwell, Mass., estimates that the "non-impact" office printer market, which primarily includes laser printers and excludes dot matrix and daisy wheel printers, was about $2.7 billion last year and will expand to $4.5 billion by 1993.  The dot matrix market was about $3.9 billion, but growth is slowing and is expected to start declining after next year.  Mr. Ulsch predicted that Hewlett-Packard's new printer, called the HP Laserjet IIP, will mostly be used to replace daisy wheel printers that produce typewriter-quality print but are slow and noisy.  Daisy wheel printers, once common, have only a small market share today because many users have concluded that dot matrix printers have acceptable quality.  Mr. Orbach of 47th St. Computer said the new printer will also compete with top-of-the-line dot matrix printers. (Lower-quality dot matrix printers cost as little as $150.) He said a four-page-a-minute laser printer is as fast as such dot matrix printers as Epson's LQ 2550, which has a discount price of $939.  Moreover, laser printers are quiet, print on envelopes and don't need the perforated, folded paper used by many dot matrix printers.  Daniel Bricklin, a pioneer software developer who is president of Software Garden Inc., Newton, Mass., is so optimistic about the growth of laser printers that his latest product is a utility that lets popular older software such as Lotus Development Corp.'s 1-2-3 and Ashton-Tate's dBase print labels and forms on laser printers.  "As a developer, I'm tickled pink" by the dropping prices, he said.  Vadim Yasinovsky, president of Clear Software Inc., a Brookline, Mass., software developer, said: "A revolution has hit us from behind."  He said that laser printers are becoming so common that for his company's next product, he is considering ignoring dot matrix printers altogether.  That will save development time for printer instructions and allow the software to produce better looking charts.  Hewlett-Packard Co.'s Apollo Systems division unveiled a low-priced computer workstation designed for technical professions in a move that analysts said would likely spark a round of price cutting.  The $3,990 workstation, priced well below the typical $10,000 to $15,000 range, breaks a price barrier for workstations.  Designed for a variety of uses, including manufacturing and distribution, the workstation represents Hewlett's biggest splash yet into the low-end workstation market, one of the industry's growth areas.  "All workstation producers are involved in a race to see who can create lower and lower prices," said Peter Rogers, a computer analyst with Robertson, Stephens & Co. "Hewlett-Packard seems to have done a decent job of that."  Mr. Rogers and other analysts expect Hewlett-Packard's move to lead to a round of price cutting over the next year that could intensify if the Japanese enter the workstation fray.  The Hewlett-Apollo workstation is two-thirds the U.S. list price of Sun Microsystems Inc.'s 3/80 workstation and about half the price of Digital Equipment Corp.'s DEC VAXstation 3100.  Spokesmen for those two companies weren't immediately available for comment.  Although about the same price as many personal computers, the workstation is more powerful, has wider applications and has more sophisticated graphics than a higher-priced PC.  For Hewlett-Packard, the new workstation also gives the big computer maker some breathing room in digesting its recent acquisition of Apollo, which it bought in April for $476.4 million.  The purchase vaulted Hewlett-Packard from a distant third to first in the hotly contested workstation market, but it also left Hewlett with the task of melding the two companies.  "There is some truth to the talk that Hewlett-Packard has to move quickly to integrate Apollo and . . . in doing so give the customer a coherent set of signals," said Mr. Rogers.  When Victor Posner decided to stand up a powerful group of his Arby's Inc. franchisees last month, Leonard H. Roberts, then president of the roast-beef-sandwich chain, urged the financier to reconsider.  "Just meet with them, or we'll have a crisis on our hands," Mr. Roberts recalls telling Mr. Posner.  But the franchisees wanted the meeting so they could make an offer to buy the fast-food chain.  Mr. Posner, chairman of the chain, would hear none of it on their terms, which included bringing a lawyer.  Now, as Mr. Roberts predicted, Arby's has a crisis on its hands.  The canceled meeting and subsequent events have brought to a boil franchisee frustrations that had been simmering since Mr. Posner acquired the chain five years ago.  In the past two weeks, Mr. Posner rejected a $200 million buy-out offer from a franchisee group, fired Mr. Roberts -- who had won the hearts of the franchise owners by engineering the chain's remarkable turnaround -- and installed a new president the franchisees find objectionable.  The uproar at Arby's is the latest example of the growing activism and rebelliousness of today's franchisees.  "Franchisees are beginning to realize they have more economic power," says Don Boroian, chairman of Francorp Inc., a franchise consulting firm in Olympia Fields, Ill.  Rupert Barkoff, chairman of the American Bar Association's Forum on Franchising, adds: "The leverage franchisees get in {buy-out} transactions is often the only way they have to protect their interests."  Sometimes, when franchisee concerns are ignored, the resulting rebellion can deliver a parent company into unwanted hands.  Burger King's franchisees, already rankled by what they saw as Pillsbury Co.'s short-term outlook, banded together in loud opposition to Pillsbury's plan to spin off the struggling fast-food chain as a way to thwart a hostile takeover attempt by Grand Metropolitan PLC of Britain.  At the time, the spinoff plan seemed sure to doom Burger King by loading it with debt.  Within weeks, the franchisees' opposition effectively derailed the plan.  Pillsbury, lacking other substantial defenses, succumbed to Grand Met.  When franchisees aren't consulted on major management changes, the resulting rebellion can usher in new management.  More than 100 Manpower Inc. franchisees, shocked at the sudden, forced resignation of longtime Chief Executive Mitchell Fromstein, met last December to try to bring him back.  Partly because of their virulent reaction, the temporary-services company's new parent, Blue Arrow PLC of Britain, dumped its top executive and replaced him with Mr. Fromstein.  "You can't make radical changes that will affect {franchisees}, or may affect them, without bringing them into the loop," says Mr. Fromstein, who met with franchisees in 1975 asking their support before he took Manpower's top job.  But the Arby's case also shows how precarious a franchisee revolt can be.  As today's franchisees become bigger and more sophisticated, franchisers increasingly make a point of giving them a stronger voice in system-wide decision-making.  But when an owner, such as Mr. Posner, decides to take a hard line, both sides become engaged in a giant game of chicken.  "Posner is fighting with the people he really needs," says Leenie Ruben, president of Marketing Spectrum Inc., an Arby's marketing consultant.  The franchisees, meanwhile, risk slowing Arby's growth and drawing retaliation from Mr. Posner if, say, they eventually decide to withhold royalties -- one option that has been considered.  For now, the franchisees are mulling over their options and waiting.  Arby's franchisees have been wary of Mr. Posner since he acquired the chain in 1985 through a unit of his DWG Corp.  His domineering style, his troubled businesses, his well-known distrust of most outsiders -- all spread fear throughout the Arby's system.  Says Charles Hyslop, president of Sybra Inc., Arby's second-largest franchisee: "His reputation preceded him."  But Mr. Posner quickly scored points with big franchise owners by appointing Mr. Roberts, a former Ralston Purina Co. executive, to head Arby's, and, more importantly, by giving him operating autonomy.  The move paid off.  Under Mr. Roberts's direction, Arby's brought in hundreds of new franchisees and launched an aggressive ad campaign, challenging the bigger, better-known burger chains.  Last year, sales for the chain's 2,100 resaurants rose 18% -- three times the industry's average gain -- to $1.16 billion.  But behind the scenes and the rosy numbers, Mr. Roberts says, he was continually fighting Mr. Posner's centralized system and strong-willed ways.  Persistent battles over Mr. Posner's efforts to delay bonuses and incentives led Mr. Roberts to threaten to resign.  Ira Hermann, a former Arby's executive who now is president of the Rax chain, says he is still waiting for his 1988 bonus.  Former executives say Mr. Posner also has tried to force a move of Arby's headquarters from Atlanta to Miami Beach, Fla., where Mr. Posner runs DWG and the rest of his far-flung empire.  The franchisees and former executives say moving the company out of town would be costly and cause several key managers to leave.  A spokeswoman for Mr. Posner says plans to move Arby's were made with the "full cooperation of management."  She says she doesn't know about the dispute over bonuses and couldn't comment.  Mr. Posner couldn't be reached for comment.  Because Mr. Posner has a practice of holding on to cash as long as possible, according to people familiar with his operations, he required that checks over $500 be funneled into Miami Beach for signatures.  That and other cash-flow maneuvers that slowed payment of bills prompted some suppliers to require some Arby's company-owned restaurants to pay cash for deliveries.  Mr. Posner's spokeswoman plays down the significance of the check practice, adding that it didn't hurt Arby's.  But such maneuvering didn't escape the attention of Arby's franchisees, a close-knit fraternity.  They became increasingly wary of Mr. Posner and began to develop contingency plans to counter moves they expected him to make.  AFA Service Corp., the chain's franchisee-owned marketing arm, had plans for a rapid relocation out of Arby's headquarters to independent offices in Atlanta if Mr. Posner ever tried to move Arby's to Miami.  Concern over recent DWG litigation, though, is what finally pushed the franchisee group to launch a buy-out offer.  For months, Mr. Posner's holding company has been fighting a $572 million hostile bid from New York investor Andrew Heine.  DWG and Mr. Heine have now locked horns in litigation surrounding that takeover, the outcome of which, the franchisees worry, could eventually hurt Arby's -- for instance, if Mr. Posner has to pay a settlement.  The franchisee group, R.B. Partners Ltd., also made the offer because it worried that the Arby's senior executives who led the turnaround would be snapped up by other fast-food companies.  But the buy-out group, made up of eight large franchisees that own about a quarter of Arby's restaurants, met only Mr. Posner's firm rejection.  Adding injury to insult for the franchisees, Mr. Posner last week replaced Mr. Roberts with Irving Riese, a principal at Riese Organization, a closely held New York company that controls more than 500 restaurants and realestate operations.  Says Joseph Smalz, chairman of AFA Service, "How would you like someone who is your direct competitor to be your president?"  Also, franchisees suspect that Mr. Riese is negotiating to buy Arby's from Mr. Posner, despite Mr. Posner's denials.  Despite all the commotion, it isn't clear how far, in the end, the franchisees will be able to push Mr. Posner.  Even if they fail in their own buy-out attempt, the franchisees could end up exerting considerable influence over other possible transactions.  Franchisee resistance, for example, could scare off a potential suitor or a lender.  As Francorp's Mr. Boroian says: "A franchisee can be an animal whose hostility grows with every royalty check he writes."  ---  @ The Hottest Fast-Food Franchises  @ Ranked by percentage sales growth in 1988; includes only chains with sales increase of at least $166 million  @ Subway Sandwiches 66.7%  @ Little Caesar's Pizza 25.2%  @ Arby's 17.4%  @ Dairy Queen 16.6%  @ Domino's Pizza 16.2%  @ Pizza Hut 12.0%  @ McDonald's 7.6%  @ Hardee's 7.5%  @ Kentucky Fried Chicken 7.4%  @ Burger King 3.5%  @ Growth in Restaurants  @ Top percentage increases in 1988 restaurants; includes only those with increases of at least 180 units  @ Subway Sandwiches 57.9%  @ TCBY 42.9%  @ Little Caesar's Pizza 19.0%  @ Arby's 16.2%  @ Domino's Pizza 11.5%  @ Source: Technomic Inc.  The Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. outlined the fees it is considering imposing when banks buy thrifts and convert them to banks.  In the new savings-and-loan bailout law, Congress directed the FDIC to charge the fees to prevent the bank-deposit insurance fund from being diluted when banks buy savings and loans and thus bring more deposits under FDIC protection.  The FDIC is moving quickly because the fees must be set before the government can sell some of the 260 insolvent thrifts under its control to banks that want to convert them into banks.  FDIC Chairman William Seidman said the FDIC hopes to institute the fees next week.  The fees would be set at 79 cents for every $100 of insured deposits in the acquired thrift, according to a staff memo accepted by the FDIC board as a basis for discussion.  That corresponds to the current ratio -- 0.79% -- of the FDIC's bank insurance fund to the deposits the fund backs up.  Some observers had expected the fee to be higher -- about 1% or 1.5% of insured deposits -- because the bank-insurance fund has been relatively low after the wave of bank failures in recent years.  "It's lower than we expected it to be," said Barry Taff, a Washington attorney who handles banking acquisitions.  He said regulators may have decided to set the fee fairly low to encourage banks to acquire insolvent thrifts.  In purchases of insolvent thrifts controlled by the Resolution Trust Corp., the fee would be based on so-called core deposits -- consumer deposits from regular customers of the thrifts.  Because these insolvent thrifts often attracted large amounts of deposits by offering unusually high interest rates in an attempt to preserve their liquidity, the FDIC would base the fee only on deposits expected to remain with them when the buyer lowers interest rates.  Also, in the case of thrifts acquired from the RTC, the fee payment could be spread out over five years.  The RTC is the agency set up by the new law to merge or liquidate insolvent thrifts.  Under the bailout law, a bank also can buy a branch of a healthy thrift and convert it to a bank -- as long as the branch holds less than 35% of the thrift's overall deposits.  In those acquisitions, the fees would be based on all insured deposits of the branch, not just the core deposits, and the payment would have to be made in one lump sum soon after the acquisition.  The bailout law also calls for "exit" fees to be paid into the Savings Association Insurance Fund when a thrift is converted to a bank and thus switches to the bank fund.  Those fees are to be determined by the FDIC in conjunction with the Treasury Department.  FDIC staff recommended that there be no exit fee in sales of thrifts under RTC control.  The United Airlines pilot-management group plans to present financing for its $6.75 billion, $300-a-share bid to UAL Corp.'s board tomorrow in hopes of gaining approval over a rival bid by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  UAL shares surged $4.625 a share to $281 yesterday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, amid indications the labor-management group, which is led by UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf and includes British Airways PLC, is close to wrapping up a financing commitment from banks.  Mr. Davis, who launched the battle for the nation's second-largest airline five weeks ago, just began inspecting confidential UAL data Monday in an effort to determine whether he will raise his last offer of $6.19 billion, or $275 a share.  The board seemed to be timing tomorrow's meeting, its first since the Wolf group submitted an offer on Sept. 1, to coincide with that group's obtaining financing.  That could signal the board's inclination to view the proposal favorably.  However, one person familiar with UAL said the board, which is being advised by the securities firm of First Boston Corp. and the law firm of Davis Polk & Wardwell, is likely to want to hear from Mr. Davis before making any decision.  If Mr. Davis asks for more time, as seems likely, it could be difficult for the board to refuse.  On the other hand, if Mr. Davis seems to be merely stalling in hopes the Wolf bid will collapse instead of working on raising his bid, the board could try to close out the process.  Instead of forming a special commitee, 13 of UAL's 14 outside directors have been weighing the takeover proposals.  The only directors who haven't participated are Mr. Wolf, UAL Chief Financial Officer John C. Pope, and Ralph Strangis, a Minnesota lawyer with close ties to Mr. Wolf.  The Wolf group's move to obtain a speedy decision from the board appears to be aimed at heading off a protracted battle with the UAL machinists, who have voiced objections to the pilot-management bid.  It would also reduce the chance of dissension in the ranks of United's 6,500 pilots, who face pay cuts of as much as 10% and other compensation cutbacks to help finance the bid.  It could also cut the chance of regulatory intervention by federal officials concerned about debt leverage or foreign ownership of U.S. airlines.  The financing for the bid is expected to include about $1.5 billion in bank debt for an employee stock ownership plan that will own about 75% of the new company.  It will also include more than $4 billion in straight bank debt, but not any high-risk, high-yield junk bonds.  The machinists have broken off talks with the pilots about participating in the bid, and they are exploring alternatives such as teaming up with other bidders or proposing a recapitalization.  The union hasn't seen details of the pilot proposal because its advisers have refused to promise they won't discuss the terms publicly.  The machinists have held talks with Mr. Davis and have planned a meeting with aides to Texas investor Robert Bass, who is also considering bidding for the company.  They may also demand big pay increases when their contract expires in November to make up for ground they lost two years ago.  But other than talking tough to try to frighten bank lenders about the chance of a strike, the machinists seemingly have few ways of blocking the pilot bid.  The pilots, on the other hand, made a seven-year no-strike pledge in a contract package negotiated with Mr. Wolf as part of the offer.  The pilots are contributing $200 million from a retirement fund for their as-yet undisclosed share of the employees' equity.  British Air will pay $750 million for 15%.  UAL managers will pay about $15 million, representing the proceeds of some of their existing UAL stock options, for 1%, and also will receive options for 9% for an undisclosed consideration.  Holland & Knight, Florida's biggest law firm, is making a heavy commitment to public-interest work.  In January the firm will form a full-time community-service and public-interest litigation section.  Few major law firms nationally, and none in the South, have established departments devoted to pro bono work.  Steve Hanlon, a public-interest lawyer in the Tampa Bay, Fla., area, will join the firm as a partner in January to head the group.  Mr. Hanlon, 47 years old, will be assisted by one full-time associate and several other associates who will rotate from other sections of the firm.  His annual budget for salaries is expected to be between $350,000 and $400,000.  "It's a commitment that's way at the top of the ladder in terms of major-firm commitment to public-interest work," said Mr. Hanlon.  "It's a big leap."  Holland & Knight's program, modeled after the 20-year-old public-interest litigation department at Hogan & Hartson, of Washington, D.C., will take public-interest cases statewide through the firm's seven Florida offices.  A major focus of the section's litigation will be government programs for the poor, said Mr. Hanlon.  Gregg Thomas, the Holland & Knight partner who hatched the plan, said: "We think that our leadership in this area ought to be a challenge to other Florida law firms to do the same thing."  ---  PROCTER & GAMBLE Co. settles cookie suit.  The suit against three rival cookie makers was settled yesterday for $125 million in what was one of the largest patent cases ever filed.  The settlement with PepsiCo Inc.'s Frito-Lay division; Keebler Co., a subsidiary of United Biscuits Holdings PLC of London, and RJR Nabisco Inc.'s Nabisco Brands Inc. vindicates P&G as the originator of a homemade-style cookie that is soft on the inside and crispy on the outside.  The product involved is its Duncan Hines Ready-to-Serve Cookies.  The bulk of the $125 million settlement will be shared evenly by Nabisco and Keebler.  A Nabisco spokesman said the settlement wouldn't impact on RJR Nabisco's earnings or its products.  A Keebler spokesman declined to comment.  Frito-Lay will contribute about $19 million, which will be paid by its insurance carrier, according to a Frito-Lay spokesman.  The trial was to begin Oct. 2 and was expected to last five months.  About 125 witnesses were supposed to testify, including carbohydrate chemists and sensory-perception scientists.  "They were planning to debate what's crispy and what's chewy," says Jerome G. Lee, a partner at Morgan & Finnegan, the New York law firm representing P&G.  He was one of 37 lawyers involved in the case.  About 120,000 pages of pretrial testimony piled up during more than 800 days of deposition taking.  Half of the spectator seats in a courtroom in U.S. District Court in Wilmington, Del., were to be removed to make room for 10,000 trial exhibits.  The case would have been a boom for local business.  Nearly 100 rooms at the Hotel DuPont in Wilmington were booked for the trial.  The P&G suits, filed in 1984, were full of charges that the defendants stole Duncan Hines cookie dough and spied on its plants.  The settlement stipulated that P&G's patent was valid and enforceable and prevents future infringement.  But cookie production at the three defendant companies won't be affected by the settlement because each changed its recipe after P&G filed suit.  ---  GRADUATES OF UNACCREDITED LAW SCHOOLS in California are more often subject to discipline.  That's the conclusion of a recent study conducted by the state bar and released Sept. 1.  The report has sparked a bitter debate over the ability of the state's approximately 25 unaccredited law schools to produce competent lawyers.  Robert Fellmeth, who did the study as part of the bar's efforts to revamp its system of disciplining lawyers, claims the schools are deceiving students by taking their money and allowing them to graduate with marginal skills.  "It's institutionalized fraud and they ought to be wiped out," said Mr. Fellmeth, a law professor at the University of San Diego and director of the Center for Public Interest Law in San Diego.  "I don't want to start a fight with these schools but the data correlating discipline problems with their graduates just jumps out at you."  Mr. Fellmeth's research indicates the typical problem-lawyer is a male, solo practitioner who has been in practice for at least 10 years and is a graduate of an unaccredited school.  Few minorities are in this group, he said.  One third of the 284 lawyers disciplined during the past two years were from unaccredited schools.  This is significant, he said, because less than 10% of the state's lawyers are from unaccredited schools.  James Liontas, president of the Independent Law School Association in Mountain View, Calif., an association of unaccredited law schools, plans to write the California attorney general demanding that Mr. Fellmeth substantiate his findings.  "This is just outrageous," said Mr. Liontas, who is also president of the unaccredited Peninsula Law School in Mountain View.  "I don't believe he'll be able to factually support his statements."  The unaccredited schools mustn't be eliminated, according to Mr. Liontas, because their affordable tuition and night classes offer working women and minorities an opportunity to become lawyers.  Said Mr. Fellmeth: "We don't necessarily need more lawyers.  We need more competent ones."  ---  MYERSON & KUHN, which has been racked by defections, is losing five more partners.  Three partners have resigned in recent days to join the New York office of McDermott, Will & Emery, a Chicago firm.  They are Gregor F. Gregorich, J. Lawrence Blades and William L. Kandel.  Two partners in New York-based Myerson & Kuhn's Washington office, Albert Halpern and David Ifshin, have also departed.  Mr. Ifshin has joined the Washington office of Chicago's Ross & Hardies.  It isn't known what firm Mr. Halpern will join and he couldn't be reached for comment.  Stan Towne, managing partner of McDermott Will's New York office, said the three Myerson & Kuhn partners will join his firm's litigation department.  They were formerly partners at Finley, Kumble, Wagner, Underberg, Manley, Myerson & Casey.  Finley Kumble collapsed in late 1987 and is mired in bankruptcy proceedings.  Myerson & Kuhn partner Harvey Myerson said the departures were "a mutual decision on the part of them and the firm."  But individuals familiar with the exodus said the partners resigned because they were unhappy with Mr. Myerson and the firm's management.  ---  LOBBYING GROUP LAUNCHED: Stanton P. Sender, former chief lobbyist for Sears, Roebuck and Co., has joined Morgan Lewis & Bockius's 175-lawyer Washington D.C. office.  Mr. Sender, 56, will build a government-relations practice group and coordinate the representation of the firm's legislative clients.  ---  BOSTON BAR ELECTS FIRST BLACK PRESIDENT: Rudolph F. Pierce, a partner in the Boston law firm of Goulston & Storrs, will serve a one-year term as president of the 7,000 member Boston Bar Association.  Mr. Pierce, 47, is a litigator at the approximately 90-lawyer firm.  He was previously a U.S. magistrate and a superior-court judge.  Last month, Goulston & Storrs won an American Bar Association Pro Bono Publico Award for public service.  Vigorous buying of big technology stocks shook the Nasdaq over-the-counter market out of its recent doldrums.  After essentially marking time last week and Monday, the Nasdaq Composite Index jumped 1.44 to 471.86.  The 0.3% rise was almost equal to that of the New York Stock Exchange Composite.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average gained only 0.1%, however.  Trading volume totaled just over 151 million shares, the most active session in a month.  August's average daily volume was 131 million shares.  Yesterday, there were 1,017 advancing issues, compared with 853 declining ones.  "Technology stocks were the bright spot," declared Len Hefter, managing director of the OTC trading desk at Jefferies & Co. in Dallas.  "They carried the market."  Within the group, Intel led the charge, climbing 4.2%, or 1 1/4 to 31 on volume of more than 1.7 million shares.  The semiconductor maker said it would introduce a "significantly faster" microprocessor chip.  Intel's robustness, along with the strength of other selective technology issues, bumped the Nasdaq 100 Index up 2.73 to 448.65.  The Nasdaq Financial Index wasn't nearly so strong, improving 0.11 to 468.68.  Robert Padala, manager of OTC trading at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette, said investors don't seem to be worried about any big sell-offs in the technology sector.  But Mr. Hefter noted that technology stocks have had trouble sustaining their advances in the recent past.  "They always seem to retrench after having a good day," he said.  Other computer-related stocks that added to their share prices included Apple Computer, which rose 1/4 to 46, and Microsoft, which gained 7/8 to 60 1/4.  Several First Executive issues were active.  The insurer's common stock closed at 12 on 1.2 million shares.  First Executive's newly issued rights, which became effective late yesterday, closed at 2 7/8 on turnover of more than 1.4 million.  Shares of its new preferred were unchanged at 15 3/4 on nearly 1.4 million shares.  Its warrants closed at 1 1/4.  First Executive said ICH Corp. intends to sell the rights it received as part of the insurance concern's rights offering.  Under the previously announced offering, holders will receive one right for each five First Executive shares held as of last Monday.  Each right entitles the holder to purchase a unit comprised of one convertible preferred share of First Executive and two warrants exercisable into First Executive common stock.  First Executive's chief financial officer, Merle Horst, said ICH holds about 17 million First Executive shares.  Separately, ICH said in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it is considering selling its 20% equity stake in the insurer.  About 35% of the Nasdaq volume was in issues that aren't on the National Market System, where the biggest issues are traded.  Among active smaller stocks, MiniScribe lost another 3/4 to 1 5/16 and topped the most-active list with turnover of more than three million shares.  The stock is reeling from reports that the company's senior management "perpetrated a massive fraud" on the company, its directors, outside auditors and investors, according to an internal company investigation.  The investigation found that some of the firm's former top officers were involved in fraudulent activities dating as far back as 1985, in an attempt to show exaggerated growth.  Phoenix Technologies slid 3/4 to 4 5/8 on 156,500 shares.  The maker of computer software said it expects to report a "substantial loss" for its fourth quarter, ending Sept. 30, as well as a loss for the year.  In the fiscal 1988 fourth quarter the company had net income of $3 million, or 27 cents a share, on revenue of $14.5 million.  For the year, Phoenix Technologies had net income of $8 million, or 86 cents a share, including a tax credit of $204,000, on revenue of $44.8 million.  GNI Group rose 1 1/8 to 6 on 189,000 shares.  The environmental services stock received a "buy" recommendation from an analyst at Houston-based Rauscher Pierce Refsnes.  Quadrex dropped 1 1/8 to 5 3/4 on news that the Sacramento Municipal Utility District rejected the company's proposal to purchase the Rancho Seco nuclear power plant.  Shares of RSI, a distributor of outdoor power equipment and office furniture, slid 1 7/8 to 14 1/4 on 138,400 shares.  On Monday, the company changed to Oct. 6 the date of shareholder eligibility to vote on two proposals.  One is the proposed distribution to holders of all the stock of Porter Brothers and the proposed merger of Delta Woodside into RSI.  InterVoice jumped 1 3/4 to 27 3/4.  The company's executives begin a "road show" -- in which a company promotes its securities to potential investors -- in connection with the company's planned secondary stock offering.  Marsam Pharmaceuticals lost 1/2 to 15.  The generic drug maker filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission an offering of 1.3 million shares.  The Securities and Exchange Commission, in a harsh rebuke of accountants, suspended a partner and a former partner of Coopers & Lybrand for approving misleading financial statements by Savin Corp.  The five-year suspensions of David Checkosky, a current partner, and Norman Aldrich, who has left the firm, mean that neither can audit a public company's financial statements.  The SEC said that the two men improperly stated that the office-equipment company's financial statements between 1981 and 1984 were in accordance with generally accepted accounting standards.  Harris Amhowitz, Coopers' general counsel, called the SEC action "unjustified and wholly inappropriate" and said both men will appeal the decision.  He added that the auditors' actions were supported by several experts, including the president of the Financial Accounting Standards Board.  "In effect, the {SEC} staff second-guesses almost a decade later good faith professional judgments made in a highly technical area requiring the interpretation of complex accounting bulletins," Mr. Amhowitz said.  The SEC said Messrs.  Checkosky and Aldrich approved financial statements in which Savin treated the costs of developing a new photocopier as start-up costs.  In 1985, Savin agreed to write off $48.7 million in deferred costs after the SEC charged it with understating losses between 1981 and 1984.  The commission's findings and the suspensions were upheld last week by an SEC administrative law judge, who said the accountants "showed little concern for the truthfulness" of Savin's financial statements.  The law judge's decision was announced yesterday.  Ed Coulson, the SEC's chief accountant, said the SEC has stepped up its enforcement efforts in the area of financial disclosure, even though the cases require an enormous amount of time and effort.  Mr. Coulson said that auditors play a crucial role in ensuring public confidence in the integrity of financial statements, "and therefore we hold them to a high standard."  The action against Messrs.  Checkosky and Aldrich follows the recent suspension of a partner with another major accounting firm.  Stephen Clark, a partner with Peat, Marwick, Main & Co., was suspended for nine months for signing financial statements that weren't in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.  Senate Appropriations subcommittees rejected any new procurement funding for the Navy's troubled Trident D-5 missile and cut all of the Bush administration's request to continue development of the national aerospace plane in fiscal 1990.  The decision on the D-5 missile follows a recent series of embarrassing failures in tests of the weapon system, and while expressing continued support for the program, appropriators in both houses have been worried by the missile's performance.  A House-passed bill this summer fully funded the estimated $1.8 billion sought by the Pentagon for procurement, but the chairman of the House defense subcommittee yesterday indicated he is open to the Senate cuts given continued restraints on total defense spending.  "We're looking more and more at that," said Rep. John Murtha (D., Pa.).  "Something like the D-5 could fall out."  Development of the high-speed space plane depends on the Air Force and the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, but the ambitious project ran short in both areas.  Neither the Senate defense subcommittee nor an appropriations panel covering NASA approved any of the administration's request.  Though the House has allocated an estimated $383 million for the program, this total is certain to be cut in conference between the chambers.  The pressure for reductions reflects the continued budget difficulties facing the appropriations process, and while restoring funds for many of the major weapon systems sought by the administration, the Senate defense subcommittee was forced to move money away from faster-spending operations accounts favored by the House.  The final product, which would appropriate $279.6 billion for the Pentagon in the year beginning Oct. 1, closely mirrors the recommendations of the Senate Armed Services Committee to preserve funds for such major systems as the Air Force's Advanced Tactical Fighter, and the MX and Midgetman missiles cut by the House.  Apart from the Lockheed Corp. D-5, the chief exception may be in the president's Strategic Defense Initiative, where spending would be held to $3.7 billion, or significantly below the Senate-authorized level.  More controversy may come with a floor amendment, backed by the subcommittee, to add $8.5 billion to the bill for a set of initiatives not yet authorized.  These include $1 billion for ships and tankers to expand the Navy's sealift capability, and $1.69 billion to buy what would be the Army's final 174 Apache helicopters from McDonnell Douglas Corp.  The Apache funding, which would be made available over a two-year period, is in neither the administration's request nor the House-passed bill.  Although influential senators are behind the plan, it comes at a time when the panel finds itself endorsing cuts from other aircraft accounts, including the Navy's F-14D fighter and CH-53 heavy helicopter as well as the C-17 cargo plane and the V-22 tilt-rotor Marine Corps transport.  The action on the Pentagon budget came as another Senate subcommittee separately approved an estimated $67 billion in fiscal 1990 appropriations for federal housing, space and veterans programs.  NASA funding would be increased an estimated $1.66 billion to accommodate $1.85 billion for the new space station.  And while the space plane was stricken from the budget, the committee preserved at least early funding of $20 million for the ambitious Craf Cassini program -- a follow-up to the recently celebrated Voyager mission.  The subcommittee matched House-passed increases of almost $2.4 billion in spending for the troubled Department of Housing and Urban Development and added significantly elsewhere to House totals -- already above the president's requests -- for the Environmental Protection Agency.  This generosity masked a series of budget devices to stay within outlay ceilings and, more than ever, the panel resorted to restrictions delaying the impact of spending next year.  For example, an estimated $140 million for EPA abatement accounts would be available for spending only in the last weeks of the fiscal year.  In another case, the panel would lift the $110,000 cap on FHA-insured mortgages for single-family homes.  Mortgages would still be limited to 95% of the median cost of a home in the sales area, but the result would be to make more mortgages available in high-cost areas and thereby stimulate a rush of application fees -- helping to offset the deficit temporarily.  A few months ago, visions of a steady stream of leveraged buy-outs -- and fat fees -- were dancing like sugarplums in the heads of London investment bankers.  But the dream is turning sour.  High interest rates and high stock prices are making the British LBO market prohibitively expensive for potential investors, and are causing a backlog of stalled LBOs to pile up on the shelves of many investment banking firms.  "I don't want to appear a cynic, but what this country needs is a good five-cent recession," quips Anthony J. Freeman, head of mergers and acquisitions at Merrill Lynch International Ltd. "Like everyone else, we're finding it quite difficult" to arrange LBOs, he adds.  Moreover, the high interest rates -- the base lending rate currently is 14% -- have cooled Britain's credit-driven consumer buying boom, and thus made trouble for a number of completed or proposed LBOs by retailing companies, including Magnet PLC, Ward White PLC and MFI Group.  Few in the London financial community predict that LBOs will vanish from the British scene.  But many bankers and investors predict that, because of certain peculiarities of the British financial system, LBOs may never make the impact here that they did on the U.S. corporate and financial scene in the 1980s.  An LBO generally involves the purchase of a company by a group including the current or a new management team using a large amount of debt supplied by financial institutions.  The debt is to be repaid, usually within five to seven years, through the company's cash flow -- if necessary, by the sale of assets.  Because of the highly leveraged nature of the transaction, lenders command a high interest rate.  "The note of caution that has crept -- perhaps galloped -- into the market is a temporary phenomenon," asserts Jeffrey Rosen, a managing director of Wasserstein, Perella & Co.  "But I don't see any rampant waves of LBOs engulfing the British market."  For one thing, Mr. Rosen notes, many British lending institutions are nervous about providing high-yield junk debt.  And investing institutions here "haven't become instant arbitragers like in the U.S.  They take a more thoughtful attitude toward a sale, and price isn't always the prime consideration," he adds.  Alistair MacLennan, senior fund manager at Norwich Union Insurance Group, says flatly: "We would be cautious" about LBOs.  The current 14% base lending rate translates into at least a 15% to 17% junk rate, reckons Merrill Lynch's Mr. Freeman.  By saddling a company with those interest rates, "It makes it very, very difficult to get the numbers to work on most LBOs in Britain," he says.  Observes Ronald M. Freeman, Salomon Brothers Inc.'s head of European investment banking:  "The LBO opportunity in the U.S. was created not so much by Mike Milken," Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.'s former junk-bond wizard, "it was created by {former Federal Reserve Board Chairman} Paul Volcker, who took the cost of funds down from 20% to 5% in a straight line."  Other factors are pressing the LBO market.  Michael Stoddart, chairman of Electra Investment Trust PLC, says his company is wary of investing in British LBOs because "the outlook for business is worse than it has been for some time."  Yet, he adds, high stock prices "have raised the expectations" of corporate managers that they still can get a high premium for their shares in a buy-out.  Michael Howell, Salomon's head of European investment strategy, asserts that corporate cash flows generally are lower in Britain than in the U.S. because British workers are one-third less productive.  "There's a case for cherry-picking" certain LBO targets in the United Kingdom, "but there isn't a case for generalized LBO activity," he says.  Much of the LBO euphoria was generated last July when Sir James Goldsmith bid #13.4 billion ($20.72 billion) for B.A.T Industries PLC, in what would be the second largest buy-out in history.  But the bid has become ensnared by the regulatory tangles it has encountered in the U.S.  That has left bankers to ponder the fates of some large retailer LBOs.  Because of lack of demand, Magnet underwriters, led by Bankers Trust Co., last month shelved plans to resell the #281.2 million debt they incurred in the company's LBO.  Gordon Bonnyman, a Bankers Trust managing director, recalls that a potential institutional buyer of the Magnet debt balked "because he said he had just paid twice" for another buy-out, MFI, "and he indicated he didn't want to go through the same thing again."  MFI earlier had to return to its investors to refinance some debt remaining from its 1987 buy-out.  Ward White failed to raise enough money for its own buy-out and instead was taken over last month by Boots Co.  One banker who isn't complaining is Daniel Brill, head of Citibank's European leveraged capital division.  "My people are working round-the-clock on three U.K. buy-outs, each in the billion-dollar league," he says.  "Maybe I'm the exception that proves the rule."  @ ---  @ Major British LBOs  @ (In billions of pounds)  @ Gateway (1989) #2.150  @ MFI (1987) 0.718  @ Reedpack (1988) 0.631  @ Magnet (1989) 0.629  @ Lowndes Queensway (1988) 0.450  @ Source: Salomon Brothers Inc.  {Third of a Series}  AVA, Mo. -- It is 3:15 on a sultry midsummer afternoon in this little town in the Ozarks, and the shops around the aging town square are quiet.  Inside Ruby's Country Store, J.G. Heinlein is about to make another pitch for the virtues of entrepreneurship.  He listens closely as the owner, who has a chance to buy a bookstore's inventory, frets about taking the risk.  Mr. Heinlein leans forward in his chair.  "I'll bet you can handle it, Ruby," he says.  He praises the idea -- her own -- with enthusiasm, then suggests a source of cheap shelving and helps plan the displays.  "You've come along a lot in the past year," he says as he rises to leave.  Mr. Heinlein is a small-business evangelist.  He operates in this remote, Bible Belt town of 2,800, and to him, such seemingly trivial events are the building blocks of recovery from a long economic slide.  As executive director of the Ava Area Chamber of Commerce, he works to reverse Ava's fortunes by spreading a gospel of enterprise, self-confidence and perseverance among all kinds of small-business owners.  In the process, the 65-year-old retiree hopes to plant seeds of growth that will thrive for decades to come.  Mr. Heinlein is on the front lines of a fast-growing effort by both public and private agencies to help entrepreneurs, long overlooked by politicians and discouraged by the culture of their communities, take root in the rocky economic soil of rural America.  At stake is the future of thousands of small towns.  "It poses a tremendous challenge," says Douglas C. Bachtel, a rural sociologist at the University of Georgia.  In the past, rural towns fought to lure big manufacturing plants.  Mr. Heinlein himself was part of an industrial-recruiting team that landed Spalding and Rawlings plants for little Ava.  In the 1950s, Missouri held the town up as a model of successful industrial recruitment.  But now U.S. manufacturers are shunning rural America in favor of cheaper labor overseas, so officials of small towns are training their sights on small businesses.  Mr. Heinlein, a blue-eyed, energetic businessman who operated oil-distribution and auto-parts companies in Ava for decades, sets up accounting systems, plants new ideas, finds financing, and counsels owners, often late into the night.  When Ruby Piland, owner of Ruby's Country Store, moved last winter, he helped her and her family lug merchandise across the town square until midnight.  Lining the square and the roads around the town are dozens of firms he has helped.  Ava's chances of igniting an economic boom by recruiting a single big manufacturing plant are nil, residents concede.  "I think we're forced to look at small companies and new entrepreneurs who have an idea, and expand on that," Mr. Heinlein says, rattling around town in his old yellow truck.  He has hit his share of roadblocks in Ava, the insular seat of poverty-pressed Douglas County.  The inhabitants of this rough-and-tumble region, where the courthouse was torched in a Civil War era dispute over relocating the county seat, sometimes rebel against new ideas.  When Mr. Heinlein proposed using state funds to promote the Ava farmers' market, residents nixed the idea.  "People said, 'I don't want the state looking over our shoulder,'" recalls a local businessman who was present at the meeting.  Planting the seeds of enterprise, risk-taking and new ventures isn't easy.  Mr. Heinlein once tried to set up a young Ava man in a machine-shop business, offering to finance the purchase of $20,000 in equipment.  "He wouldn't agree to do it," Mr. Heinlein says.  "He didn't want to be in debt."  Now, the young man works for someone else.  "He's not happy," Mr. Heinlein says.  But unlike many small towns, Ava's community leaders are intent on bolstering the economy: A group of merchants and businesses funded Mr. Heinlein's $5,000-a-year job 2 1/2 years ago; Mayor James "Bud" Norman is improving public services; and the Agriculture Department's extension service has coordinated many of the town's development efforts.  At the Chamber of Commerce, a converted 60-year-old stone gas station next to a vacant lot, a steady stream of "clients" flows through the door, and Mr. Heinlein's rolling chuckle and beefy handshake convey ceaseless good humor.  Sometimes, Mr. Heinlein makes startup loans himself.  Douglas S. Muzzy, a retired dairy farmer, couldn't get bank financing to expand his company, Country Heritage, a producer of organically grown chickens.  Mr. Heinlein provided operating cash last year, and since then, Mr. Muzzy has expanded fourfold, with profit margins running well over 30%.  "If it hadn't been for his faith, I'd have ended up" with a business one-fourth the size, Mr. Muzzy says.  "As it is, I'm looking forward to getting larger facilities."  Mr. Heinlein also looks for opportunity outside Ava.  He started a vigorous recruiting campaign, including a meeting with the governor, that won Ava a promise of a new National Guard Armory.  And when Charles Mackey, general manager of OK Manufacturing, a leather-goods maker in Springfield, Mo., was looking for a new location, he received an unsolicited letter from Mr. Heinlein.  He liked a vacant building in Ava, and Mr. Heinlein helped him sign up for job-training funds.  He now employs 22 people.  "J.G. is our contact man with the outside world," says Mayor Norman.  But it's not clear that Mr. Heinlein's grass-roots efforts will bear much economic fruit.  For every two start-ups, there's one closure.  "One of the frustrations is, you go in and help one, and then six months later the guy down the street is in trouble," says Judi Hackett, a rural-development official for the Council of State Governments.  "You're constantly doing patch-up work."  Few of Mr. Heinlein's efforts yield measurable results.  Mrs. Piland's store, for instance, barely makes a dent in the region's economic problems: She pours all her profit back into the business, and employs just one worker part-time.  Ava's limited market torpedos other entrepreneurs.  Fast Track, a miniature-auto-racing store, had been open only three months when Mr. Heinlein tried to help stanch its losses by setting up a bookkeeping and accounting system.  "We established a break-even point.  I told {the owner}, 'If you can't reach that, you're in trouble,'" Mr. Heinlein says.  But it was too late.  Owner Richard Whittenhall recalls, "We never did reach" break-even.  Ava is too small to support such a business, says Mr. Whittenhall, a mechanic at a local auto dealership.  Back at the chamber office, Mr. Heinlein bids his volunteer assistant good night.  The office's hand-lettered paper sign flutters against the window, where an ancient air conditioner grinds away against the Ozark heat.  On the town square nearby, store owners turn over the "Closed" signs on their front doors, one by one.  As Mr. Heinlein shuffles through a pile of paper work, a visitor asks why he works so hard in the face of such heavy odds.  He pauses, as though surprised by the question.  "I get a bang out of seeing what you can accomplish," he says.  "I was in business, and I had problems through the years.  I nearly went broke two times myself.  If I can help somebody now, I'd like to do that."  TV: A National Broadcasting Co. unit and a Westwood One Inc. unit formed a joint venture, NBC's Scores Plus, an interactive telephone service.  The 24-hour service will provide scores and game details for all major professional and college sporting events, including football, baseball, basketball and hockey, as well as commentary by sports experts, for 95 cents a minute.  WHO'S NEWS: Bernard Gallagher was named president and chief operating officer of Century Communications Corp., a cable-TV systems operator.  He succeeds Leonard Tow, who remains chief executive.  He was vice president and treasurer of Comcast Corp. . . .David L. Smith was named to the new post of executive vice president of cable operator Osborn Entertainment Corp., controlled by Osborn Communications Corp.  He was director of programming for the television stations division of Katz Communications Inc.  After trying to grow out of its developing-country debt problems, Manufacturers Hanover Corp. has decided to shrink out of them.  Manufacturers Hanover will drop in size to about $57 billion in assets, down from $74.36 billion at its peak in 1985, if a possible sale of a controlling interest in its CIT Group Inc. goes through.  Manufacturers may sell control of the asset-based lending subsidiary to Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd. for about $1.2 billion.  The expected transaction means that Manufacturers, seeking at all cost to avoid a merger, will likely fall to the nation's ninth largest banking company from the seventh spot.  In banking, where asset size is synonymous with importance and power, that prospect is enough to ruin any self-respecting banker's golf game.  But it is one that Manufacturers Chairman John F. McGillicuddy must take if the bank is to bolster its capital base in the face of $8.25 billion in developing-country debt and avoid a merger with another bank in the years ahead.  The possible CIT sale is tinged with irony.  When the bank agreed to purchase C.I.T. Financial Corp., as it was then called, for $1.51 billion from RCA Corp. in 1983, Mr. McGillicuddy faced one of the toughest sales jobs of his career.  The Federal Reserve Board chairman then, Paul Volcker, frowned on the purchase of the consumer and commercial finance company because of Manufacturers' big portfolio of troubled loans to developing countries and comparatively weak capital base.  But Mr. McGillicuddy argued C.I.T. would give it a new source of earnings to offset the developing-country loan problems and, with its presence in most states, become the nucleus of a nationwide bank franchise someday.  It was only this personal sales pitch by Mr. McGillicuddy and a promise to raise even more new capital than planned that carried the day at the Fed, according to well-placed individuals.  But in buying CIT, Manufacturers failed to spot certain loan-quality problems, especially with its loans to the oil-service companies, mobile homes and certain Mexican borrowers.  In addition, its factoring business was hit with some fraud incidents involving employees.  As a result, Manufacturers spent the better part of three years restructuring CIT. Last year, CIT earned $120 million, well above $40 million in 1987 but still below the $129 million reported in 1984.  A Salomon Brothers Inc. comparison of commercial finance companies' 1988 results shows that CIT had a 9.4% return on equity, the lowest of the 11 companies examined.  Now that a sale is near, Mr. McGillicuddy, in effect, is conceding that CIT wasn't the much-needed panacea.  The possible sale of a CIT stake is but the latest in a series of painful decisions that Manufacturers has been forced to make as it has restructured over the past two years.  As operations and assets are sold off and the prospects for a turnaround in the developing-country debt outlook remain dim, some analysts and bankers say, Mr. McGillicuddy is determined to avert sale or merger.  A Manufacturers spokesman said the bank wouldn't comment further, for now, on the possible sale of CIT or the strategic choices faced by the bank.  But as one leading bank-management consultant, who asked not to be named, said, "A merger will be the last ditch."  Arranging such a merger with another U.S. bank would be tough.  Wall Street investment bankers would be hard-pressed to devise a more effective anti-takeover defense, or poison pill, than Manufacturers' $8.25 billion portfolio of loans to developing countries.  But, thanks to the strong yen, arranging a sale to a Japanese bank, possibly even Dai-Ichi Kangyo with its $388 billion in assets, seems plausible.  Manufacturers' ties to Japan are wide and deep.  Japanese bankers have indicated that Manufacturers is in many respects the leading U.S. bank in that country.  In fact, Manufacturers Trust Co., a predecessor of the present-day bank, in 1949 became the first U.S. bank to open a representative office in Japan following World War II.  Manufacturers' strength in Japan can be traced to Tristan E. Beplat.  A Manufacturers Trust officer prior to the war and now retired, Mr. Beplat was the chief of the money and banking office under Gen. Douglas MacArthur during the postwar reconstruction of Japan.  And the contacts that he gained in Japan have been invaluable to Manufacturers over the years.  For now, a merger with a Japanese institution or anyone else doesn't seem imminent.  With the possible sale of the CIT stake, securities analysts are upgrading their assessments of Manufacturers.  Charles Peabody, a securities analyst at Kidder, Peabody & Co., yesterday dropped his "sell" rating on Manufacturers and said the stock should perform in line with the market.  The possible Dai-Ichi transaction, he said, should allow the bank to raise $300 million to $500 million of equity cheaply.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Manufacturers stock fell 37.5 cents to close at $42.125 a share; it had risen sharply the day before.  With $6.8 billion in medium- and long-term developing-country loans outstanding and $1.4 billion in reserves earmarked for those loans, Manufacturers needs to raise about $2 billion to shore itself up.  With $600 million in retained earnings through 1992 and an issue of $200 million to $300 million in common shares likely, Mr. Peabody said, "I can see how they're going to get there by the end of 1992."  Mr. Peabody's target price for Manufacturers' shares is $50 within the next year, and he puts its breakup value at $65 a share.  Shifts in sentiment among analysts like Mr. Peabody are encouraging to Manufacturers.  Nevertheless, Manufacturers remains a favorite target among short-sellers, who sell borrowed stock expecting to make a profit when the stock price declines.  And one investor who has shorted Manufacturers' stock over the years said the restructuring and possible CIT sale haven't changed his bearishness on the stock.  "I can't tell you when, but someday that developing-country debt and leveraged buy-out loans and real estate construction loans are going to come home to roost," the investor said.  The tough decisions aren't over for Manufacturers.  For one, Mr. McGillicuddy, 58 years old, has yet to reorganize the investment banking, corporate lending and international sectors into a single unit and to name a president and apparent successor to himself.  The president's job has been vacant for a year and a half, since John R. Torell resigned.  Those decisions are important and have introduced an unusual element of tension to the clubby, inbred world of Manufacturers senior management.  And then there remain the strategic questions of Manufacturers' future role in banking.  Already some analysts no longer speak of Manufacturers as a "money-center bank."  Asked how he would describe the new Manufacturers, Kidder's Mr. Peabody said, "Well, I'd say they're a tri-state community bank -- wait, I should say regional bank -- with strong market shares."  The semiconductor industry's leading indicator slipped again in August, reflecting sagging chip prices and continuing seasonal doldrums.  The Semiconductor Industry Association said the so-called book-to-bill ratio declined slightly to 0.94 from 0.95 in July; both are preliminary.  Billings surged to an all-time high for a four-week month, to $1.23 billion from $1.07 billion in July.  A ratio of 0.94 means that for every $100 of products shipped, semiconductor makers received $94 in new orders.  A ratio greater than 1.0 indicates industry expansion as new orders outstrip demand, while a lower ratio typically signals an industry contraction.  The month's ratio surprised few.  "The lower ratio isn't surprising," said Eli Sayegh, an analyst with S.G. Wargurg in San Francisco.  Indeed, some analysts, like Richard L. Whittington, with Kidder Peabody & Co., projected last month that the August ratio could fall to 0.90 or lower.  The higher billings total, analysts said, shows that semiconductor makers are burning off inventory and that levels at many chip makers are now very low.  The divergent paths of the bookings and billings reflect continued skittishness by chip buyers, who are satisfying their chip consumption with spot purchases.  Finevest Foods Inc., Greenwich, Conn., told institutional investors it would cut costs and jobs in its dairy operations, resulting in a third-quarter loss for the parent.  The company, which also distributes frozen foods, didn't disclose the cost of the restructuring or the size of the expected loss.  Mel P. Melsheimer, chief financial officer, declined to say how many of the parent's 2,500 positions would be eliminated.  The company doesn't break out data by segment, and Mr. Melsheimer thus declined to disclose the size of the dairy unit.  The parent expects a total of about $700 million of sales for 1989.  The dairy operations, based in Johnson City, Tenn., produce milk, ice cream and cottage cheese in the Carolinas, Florida, Georgia, Tennessee, Virginia and parts of West Virginia.  The company isn't discontinuing any dairy lines, Mr. Melsheimer said.  In the year-earlier third quarter, Finevest earned $1.1 million, or 11 cents a share, on sales of $158 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Finevest shares fell 25 cents to close at $8.75.  Tokyo stocks rebounded as the market's mood improved slightly because of a retreat in the dollar.  London shares were down a bit in slow trading.  The U.S. currency, which briefly surged above the 148-yen level in Tokyo Monday, fell back to the 146-yen level yesterday morning following intervention by the Bank of Japan.  The Tokyo market opened easier but gained later in the morning and the afternoon sessions to close at its highest level of the day helped by inflows of arbitrage buying and some trust fund investment money.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues, an 8.51-point loser Monday, was up 219.22 points to 34332.88.  In early trading in Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index fell 18.38 points to 34314.50.  Tuesday's volume on the First Section remained thin with an estimated 500 million shares changing hands, up from 420 million Monday.  Advancing issues outnumbered declining issues, 580 to 342, while 188 remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which fell 4.36 points Monday, was up 17.09 points, or 0.66%, at 2595.85.  The Second Section index, which lost 27.40 points Monday, was down 2.08 points, or 0.06%, to close at 3379.53.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 13 million shares, in line with 13.6 million Monday.  Kinju Nomura, director of the equity division at Taiheiyo Securities, said institutional investors remained on the sidelines ahead of the Friday release of a series of major U.S. economic indicators.  The market participants were anticipating an increase of about $1 billion in the U.S. trade deficit for July, he said.  Large-capitalization issues, which had been slumping for weeks, bounced back, receiving small-lot buy orders.  One trader said issues such as steels that last week marked the lowest prices since the beginning of this year had been "oversold," and Tuesday's gains were due to bargain hunting by investors who decided that these had already hit bottom.  Also, shipbuildings and constructions were up, providing some traders with hope that the market may have readied itself for a new development, he said.  Others pointed out, however, that as anticipation of higher domestic interest rates has grown recently, it is unlikely that interest-sensitive issues such as steels will go up further and lead the market.  Among steels, Nippon Steel was up 5 yen (3.4 cents) at 789 yen ($5.38) and NKK gained 16 to 765.  Shipbuildings drew investor interest following reports on an increasing number of orders for ships because of the growing popularity of luxury liners, traders said.  Mitsubishi Heavy Industries advanced 20 to 1,150.  Kawasaki Heavy Industries was up 30 to close at 1,060.  High-priced high-technologies rebounded from Monday's losses.  TDK surged 200 to 5,600.  Fanuc gained 160 to 6,770.  Pioneer was up 20 at 4,160 and Sony added 30 to 8,250.  London trading was dominated by expectations over U.K. corporate profit reports this week and concerns about the near-term direction on Wall Street.  After early weakness, the broad-market measure Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index rebounded about 11 points to close at 2397.6, down 3 points.  It hit a low of 2386.6, down 14, within the first few hours of trading and rose to a session high of 2399.0, down 1.6, within the last hour of dealings.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index closed lower at 1980.6, down 1.  Volume was 398.4 million shares, down from 464 million on Monday.  Dealers said activity generally was dull, with few prominent features or talking points.  Some dealers said Wall Street's triple-witching hour Friday, when stock futures, index futures and options expire, on top of expected U.S. trade and producer price index reports capped active interest in London.  U.K. dealers, however, said London appears to be waiting for signs of a broader Wall Street correction rather than committing to any one direction on its own.  For now, though, dealers said talk of testing the FT-SE 100's record closing high of 2443.4 has been shelved.  In corporate news, major British retailer Kingfisher reported a 58% jump in pretax profit for the latest six months to #111.4 million ($171.7 million), largely on the back of one-time gains claimed from refinancing and group reorganization.  Kingfisher closed at 349 pence ($5.38), up 11 pence (16.9 cents).  Some retailers rose in sympathy with Kingfisher, dealers said.  Of these, Great Universal Stores posted the biggest gain, closing 29 higher at #11.94.  Other retailers, however, rose in earlier dealings, but shed most of their gains to close unchanged to nominally lower on some late profit-taking.  Among them, Marks & Spencer fell 1 to 217, Boots eased 1 to 310, and Burton Group closed unchanged at 255.  Elsewhere, Siebe shares slumped 10 to 560 on what dealers described as profit-taking after its sharp run-up ahead of its debut this week on the FT-SE 100-share index.  Traders said portfolio managers aggressively bought the U.K. safety-controls maker before its introduction, largely to maintain certain weightings in all the FTSE stocks.  And on profit-related factors, BTR shares slid 6 to 459 and British Aerospace closed at 700.  Both companies are slated to publish interim earnings today.  Shares in B.A.T, subject of a hostile #13.4 billion bid from Hoylake tments Ltd., lost 8 to 795.  The U.K. Monopolies and Mergers Commission is scheduled to disclose its decision today on whether Hoylake can extend the timetable of its bid for B.A.T. Hoylake's Sir James Goldsmith has previously said that the bid has little chance of success without an extension.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Brussels, lower in Frankfurt, Stockholm and Zurich, and mixed in Amsterdam, Milan and Paris.  South African gold stocks closed mixed.  Share prices closed lower in Sydney, Wellington, Singapore and Manila, were mixed in Hong Kong and higher in Seoul.  Taipei was closed down by typhoon Sarah.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 11 Sep 8 Year  @ U.S. ....................... 320.0 320.8 + 25.0  @ Britain .................... 720.3 726.3 + 31.9  @ Canada ..................... 427.5 431.3 + 16.5  @ Japan ..................... 1511.4 1511.7 + 6.4  @ France ..................... 549.2 550.7 + 24.1  @ Germany .................... 259.8 262.0 + 24.9  @ Hong Kong ................. 1966.9 1971.5 - 3.1  @ Switzerland ................ 235.7 235.7 + 36.3  @ Australia .................. 349.9 350.9 + 20.5  @ World index ................ 525.9 528.4 + 6.4  Those of us who have graduated from professional school over the past 15 to 20 years and are not white travel a career path that is frequently bumpy with suspicions that we did not earn the right to be where we are.  We bristle when others raise what might be called the affirmative action question -- "Did you get into a school because of a special program?"  That prickly sensitivity reveals a rarely mentioned cost of racial preferences.  The cost I have in mind is to the psyches of the beneficiaries themselves, who simultaneously want racial preferences to be preserved and to force the world to pretend that no one benefits from them.  And therein hangs a tale.  For law students at the leading law schools, the autumn brings the recruiting season, the idyllic weeks when law firms from around the country compete to lavish lunches and dinners and other attentions upon them, all with the professed goal of obtaining the students' services -- perhaps for the summer, perhaps for a longer term.  This year, however, the nation's largest firm, Baker & McKenzie, has been banned from interviewing students at the University of Chicago Law School, and is on probation -- that is, enjoined to be on its best behavior -- at some others.  The immediate source of Baker & McKenzie's problems was a racially charged interview that a partner in the firm conducted last fall with a black third-year Chicago law student.  The interviewer evidently suggested that other lawyers might call her "nigger" or "black bitch," and wanted to know how she felt about that.  Perhaps surprised that she played golf, he observed that "there aren't too many golf courses in the ghetto."  He also made a comment suggesting that students admitted under a racially conscious affirmative action program were less qualified than students admitted in any other way.  The law school reacted swiftly, and the firm was banned from campus.  Because I am black myself, and teach in a law school, I suppose the easiest thing for me to do would be to clamor in solidarity for suspension or worse.  Yet I find myself strangely reluctant to applaud the school's action.  Instead, I am disturbed rather than excited by the vision of law schools' circling the wagons to defend their minority students against insensitive remarks.  The Chicago action is part of a trend on campuses across the nation to punish those who utter remarks deemed disparaging to racial and ethnic groups.  At the many schools that are considering forbidding such remarks, the comments are referred to as "harassment" (which in many cases they certainly are) -- evidently in an effort to show that it is conduct, not speech, for which punishment is proposed.  It strikes me as paradoxical that universities, traditionally bastions of free thought, should suddenly be taking the lead in punishing speech because they find it offensive.  But it is not my intention to defend the interviewer, most of whose reported questions and comments were inexplicable and inexcusable.  I am troubled, however, by my suspicion that there would still have been outrage -- not as much, but some -- had the interviewer asked only the affirmative action question.  I suspect this because in my own student days, something over a decade ago, when an interviewer from a major law firm in Washington addressed this very question to a Yale student who was not white, the student voices -- including my own -- howled in protest.  But with the passing years, I have come to wonder whether our anger might not have been misplaced.  To be sure, the question was boorish.  And because the interviewer had a grade record and resume right in front of him, it was probably irrelevant as well.  But lots of interviewers ask questions that meet the tests of boorishness and irrelevance.  At Yale a decade ago, we called the question racist.  I have heard it said that the Baker & McKenzie interviewer's question on affirmative action was racist.  I also understand that at least one university is considering a proposal that would deem it harassment per se for a (white?) student to question the qualifications of non-white classmates.  But we can't change either the truths or the myths about racial preferences by punishing those who speak them.  This clamor for protection from the affirmative action question is the best evidence of the terrible psychological pressure that racial preferences put on their beneficiaries.  Indeed, it sometimes seems as though the programs are not supposed to have any beneficiaries -- or at least, that no one is permitted to suggest that they have any.  And that's ridiculous.  If one supports racial preferences in professional school admissions, one must be prepared to treat them like any other preference in admissions.  One must believe that they make a difference, that is, that some students would not be admitted if the preferences did not exist.  This is not a racist observation.  It is not normative in any sense.  It is simply a fact.  A good deal of emotional underbrush might be cleared away were the fact simply conceded, and made the beginning, not the end, of any discussion of preferences.  For once it is conceded that the programs have beneficiaries, it follows that some of us who are professionals and are not white must be among them, and supporters of preferences must stop pretending otherwise.  Rather, some large segment of us must be willing to meet the affirmative action question head on, to say, "Yes, I got into law school because of racial preferences.  So what?" -- and, having said it, must be ready with a list of what we have accomplished with the opportunities that the preferences provided.  Now, this is a costly concession, because it carries all the baggage of the battle over the relationship between preferences and merit.  I take no position on that dispute here, but I do think that the bristling when the question is raised suggests a deep-seated fear that the dichotomy might be real.  In any case, it is not racism or harassment to point out that racial preferences make a difference.  And if admitting that preferences make a difference leaves a funny aftertaste in the mouths of proponents, they might be more comfortable fighting against preferences rather than for them.  For my part, the matter is simple: I got into law school because I'm black.  And I can prove it.  As a senior at Stanford, I applied to about a half dozen law schools.  Yale, where I would ultimately enroll, came through fairly early with an acceptance.  So did all but one of the others.  The last school, Harvard, dawdled and dawdled.  Finally, toward the end of the admission season, I received a letter of rejection.  Then, within days, two different Harvard officials and a professor contacted me by telephone to apologize.  They were quite frank in their explanation for the "error."  I was told by one official that the school had initially rejected me because "we assumed from your record that you were white." (The words have always stuck in my mind, a tantalizing reminder of what is expected of me.) Suddenly coy, he went on to say that the school had obtained "additional information that should have been counted in your favor" -- that is, Harvard had discovered the color of my skin.  And if I had already made a deposit to confirm my decision to go elsewhere, well, that, I was told, would "not be allowed" to stand in my way should I enroll at Harvard.  Naturally, I was insulted by this miracle.  Stephen Carter, the white male, was not good enough for the Harvard Law School; Stephen Carter, the black male, not only was good enough, but rated agonized telephone calls urging him to attend.  And Stephen Carter, color unknown, must have been white: How else would he have achieved what he did in college?  Except that my college achievements were obviously not sufficiently spectacular to merit acceptance had I been white.  In other words, my academic record was too good for a black Stanford undergraduate but not good enough for a white Harvard Law student.  Because I turned out to be black, however, Harvard was quite happy to scrape me from what it apparently considered the bottom of the barrel.  My objective is not to single out Harvard for special criticism; on the contrary, I make no claim that a white student with my record would have been admitted to any of the leading law schools.  The insult that I felt came from the pain of being reminded so forcefully that I was good enough for a top law school only because I happened to be black.  Naturally, I should not have been insulted at all; that is what racial preferences are for -- racial preference.  But I was insulted and went off to Yale instead, even though I have now and had then absolutely no reason to imagine that Yale's judgment was based on different criteria than Harvard's.  Because Yale is far more selective, the chances are very good that I was admitted at Yale for essentially the same reason that I was admitted at Harvard -- the color of my skin made up for evident deficiencies in my academic record.  So I am unable to fool myself: Without that leg up, the thumb on the scale, the extra points due to skin color -- choose your own metaphor -- I would not be where I am today.  And I too must be able to say, "So what?" and go on from there.  Whatever the pain it might cause, the affirmative action question, whether at Yale more than a decade ago or at Chicago last year, should come as no surprise.  And if those of us who have benefited from racial preferences are not prepared to treat the question in a serious manner, to admit to the advantage that we have been given, then we are not after all the beneficiaries of affirmative action: We are its victims.  ---  Mr. Carter, a professor at Yale Law School, is at work on a book to be entitled "Reflections of an Affirmative Action Baby."  American Western Corp. said it agreed in principle to be acquired by Carlisle Plastics Inc. for $13 a share, or about $72.8 million.  The plastic-packaging manufacturer said the agreement is subject to certain conditions, including shareholder approval, and a definitive agreement and financing arrangements.  The transaction is expected to be completed in November.  As reported, American Western, Sioux Falls, S.D., said it was holding talks with a group of senior managers, including Chairman John L. Mulligan, and the company's employee stock ownership plan over a possible $11.50-a-share leveraged buy-out.  That potential offer was valued at about $64.8 million.  Ted Enloe, president of Lomas Financial Corp., and James Wooten, head of its mortgage unit, sold substantial portions of their holdings in the company less than a month before it defaulted on $145 million of debt, filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission show.  In seven separate sales between Aug. 8 and Aug. 22, Mr. Enloe sold 120,352 shares, 84% of his holding in the Dallas-based real-estate and financial services concern, the SEC filings show.  Mr. Enloe received $6.63 to $8 a share for a total of $813,996.  SEC filings also show that Mr. Wooten, chairman of Lomas Mortgage USA, sold 22,000 shares, or 96% of his stake, for $139,391 Aug. 23 and Aug. 25.  On Sept. 1, the company defaulted on $145 million of debt, triggering a cross-default on $1.45 billion of senior debt.  Lomas Financial's closing stock price on the New York Stock Exchange averaged $6.63 a share in August.  In composite trading on the Big Board yesterday, Lomas Financial closed at $3.75, down 25 cents.  Mr. Enloe said that "at the time of the stock sales, the status of negotiations on the company's financial restructuring was exactly as had been set forth" in company news releases.  According to a company spokesman, Mr. Enloe sold the shares to meet margin calls and reduce debt.  The spokesman said Mr. Enloe still has options to purchase 121,292 shares.  Mr. Wooten, a Lomas director, said he sold the shares "because I had obligations I needed to meet, and that's one way to meet them."  Mr. Wooten said he doesn't have any knowledge of negotiations between Lomas and its banks, and he said he didn't have any way of predicting what the stock would do.  Although he sold most of his stock holdings, Mr. Wooten said he still owns some stock options.  As recently as Aug. 25, Lomas said its bank negotiations were proceeding satisfactorily.  The company has said that the talks began to break down Aug. 26 and 27, and the company wasn't able to reach an agreement when $145 million in debt came due Sept. 1.  Frank Anderson, an analyst with Little Rock, Ark.-based Stephens Inc., said that although Lomas reported serious financial difficulties throughout the summer, "until the very last, people didn't really expect the default."  Late last week, company officials said Lomas Financial has made "significant progress" in negotiating new agreements with its bank and insurance-company lenders.  According to the company, all but two of its 34 bank lenders have agreed in principle to a restructuring.  ---  MUTUAL SELLING: Seven executives at T. Rowe Price Associates Inc., including its economist and managers of some of the firm's equity mutual funds, sold company stock in the last week of July, according to SEC filings.  Clusters of insider selling aren't unusual at T. Rowe Price, which lists as insiders 112 employees, an unusually large proportion of its officers and vice presidents.  But the recent sales continued a pattern of fairly strong selling by T. Rowe Price insiders this year.  In the first six months of 1989, 33 of the firm's insiders have sold, compared with the 22 insiders who sold in all of 1988, according to SEC filings.  But company spokesman Steven Norwitz said the sales don't reflect bearishness about T. Rowe Price stock.  The insiders were just practicing good money management by diversifying their assets and capitalizing on the stock's big price run-up, he said.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, the stock of the Baltimore-based money-management firm rose 50 cents to $54.50 a share, compared with a price of $34 in January.  "You know how you look at your portfolio and say, 'Look how much I've got riding on one stock,'" said Paul Boltz, T. Rowe's economist.  Mr. Boltz sold 2,000 shares, or 9% of his holdings, for $96,000 July 31.  The proceeds from the sale "are in a money market fund while I mull things over," he added.  The other July sellers include Debra J. Diamond, manager of the firm's "New Frontier" limited-partnership fund.  She sold 10,500 shares, 58% of her stake in the company, for $504,000.  Edward Mathias, a member of the firm's six-member management committee and chairman of its "New Horizons" Fund, which invests in small-company stocks, sold 6,500 shares for $313,625, or 4% of his stake.  Ms. Diamond and Mr. Mathias weren't available to comment.  "People are taking advantage of the phenomenal run-up in the stock to diversify their holdings," said Mr. Norwitz, who sold 200 shares on July 31 for $9,650.  The pace of selling "is not unusual at these {price} levels."  While T. Rowe Price has a good reputation for managing other people's money, the insiders apparently could have used some help when it came to the timing of their own stock sales.  Although they got prices ranging from $47.31 to $48.25 a share, the price of T. Rowe stock has continued to rise.  ---  HOUSE RULES: Two executives of Forest Laboratories Inc. recently sold stock in the New York City-based prescription-drug manufacturer.  Chief Executive Officer Howard Solomon sold 260,000 shares, or 45% of his stake, on Aug. 28 for $9.2 million.  Joseph Schorr, the company's vice president of scientific affairs, sold 40,000 shares, or 66% of his stake, the same day.  Both executives continue to hold options to purchase a substantial number of shares -- 1.4 million for Mr. Solomon, and 209,000 for Dr. Schorr.  "We're in a period where if we don't sell now, we have to wait another year {under company rules} to sell," Mr. Solomon said.  The sales have "nothing to do with anything going on at the company." he said.  In the first quarter ended June 30, Forest Laboratories reported net income of 28 cents a share, up from the year-earlier 26 cents a share.  Both officers received $35.50 a share for their shares.  In composite trading yesterday on the American Stock Exchange, Forest Laboratories fell 37.5 cents to $35.875 a share.  The dollar finished narrowly mixed in quiet trading, with many participants already withdrawn to the sidelines awaiting U.S. economic data clustered at the end of the week.  Foreign-exchange traders remained divided on the outlook for the U.S. currency, some warning the U.S. indicators could easily cloud the recently sky-blue picture of the economy and others predicting a renewed rally that would carry the dollar to this year's high around 2.05 marks.  The lull in trading activity was the net effect of the opposing market opinions, traders said.  With participants hesitant to stake new positions ahead of a potentially volatile market response to the data, dealers predicted the dollar will hew to a fairly constricted trading range through most of the week.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9863 marks, almost unchanged from 1.9866 marks late Monday, and at 146.95 yen, up from 146.70 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5488, up from $1.5460.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 147.23 yen, up from Tuesday's Tokyo close of 146.73 yen.  After Monday's twice-frustrated attempt to penetrate the psychologically important two mark level, the dollar started Asian trading on a weak note.  The dollar sagged in early Tokyo action but was brought off its lows by comments from David Mulford, the U.S. Treasury's undersecretary for international affairs.  Mr. Mulford said it is politically impossible for finance ministers of the Group of Seven major industrial nations to agree on precise targets for currency-exchange rates.  Traders took the comments as indicating that there is some disagreement among G-7 nations over how high the dollar should be allowed to rise and, as a result, bought the U.S. currency.  But in the thin trading, the drive quickly withered.  Dealers said Mr. Mulford's comments proved too vague to justify a significant response.  A widely rumored Bank of Japan intervention in early Tokyo dealings also helped crimp enthusiasm for the dollar, dealers said.  The Japanese central bank's interventions have been a constant feature of the Tokyo market for the past week, traders noted, although the impact of the dollar sales seems to be minimal.  The dollar drifted lower in quiet European dealings and continued in the early New York morning until the currency met technically motivated buying interest at 1.98 marks.  The appearance of support relieved participants who thought the dollar might slide much further before generating buying interest.  The revived interest carried the dollar to its peak just below 1.99 marks in the New York afternoon.  Though the appearance of support for the dollar reassured traders that the currency hadn't overdone a recent rally, they predicted the uncertainty over the major U.S economic indicators will restrain any new buying.  Tomorrow, July retail sales figures are due for release.  Friday, the August producer price index, July merchandise trade balance and August industrial activity figures will be disclosed.  As long as the figures don't cast doubts on recent indications that economic activity has revived or on the durability of improvements in the U.S. trade deficit, the dollar should extend its rise, several traders predicted.  Good figures "will provide a continued solid background for investors looking at the U.S.," said Jim McGroarty, senior vice president of foreign exchange at Greenwich Capital Markets Inc. in Greenwich, Conn.  "And if we have that sort of a response, I'm not sure the authorities have the appetite to stand in the way" via aggressive intervention, Mr. McGroarty said.  He said the dollar is on a path to 160 yen and 2.05 marks to 2.10 marks before a round of coordinated interest rate increases in Europe and Japan caps the rally.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $359.50 an ounce, up 30 cents.  Estimated volume was a light 1.6 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was quoted at $358.55 an ounce.  Integrated Resources Corp. agreed to sell Integrated Resources Investment Centers Inc., a subsidiary that markets investment products to financial institutions, to Essex Corp.  Terms weren't disclosed, but Jay Chazanoff, senior executive vice president of the Integrated parent, said it is a "small transaction" outside its core businesses that would have "no impact at all" under Integrated's restructuring.  Integrated last month agreed to sell a group of its core financial-services businesses to Whitehall Financial Group for $310 million.  Integrated, which is trying to restructure debt in the face of a cash crisis, has been seeking to sell assets to pay creditors.  Essex, a closely held company that markets annuities and mutual funds through banks, said the purchase would create a company with total sales exceeding $750 million a year.  Kevin E. Crowe, chairman, president and chief executive of Essex, which is based here and has been operating since 1978, will remain chairman and chief executive.  Jerry Cunningham, president of the Integrated unit, will become president of Essex.  Beatrice Co., which went private in an $8.2 billion leveraged buy-out, one of the largest ever, may borrow again to help pay investors a dividend of as much as $983 million in preferred stock and debt securities.  Such a transaction, which has been used by other investors to wring more profit out of smaller leveraged buy-out targets, would be the largest of its sort, Wall Street observers estimated.  A big dividend at Beatrice could heat up the leveraged buy-out market by attracting more investors.  Typically, it takes investors five years to recoup their stake in a leveraged buy-out, in which they finance an acquisition largely with debt and repay it mainly by selling assets.  In April 1986, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., a New York investment concern that led the investor group, took Beatrice private.  A dividend of $983 million would enable Beatrice investors to more than double their original investment.  The return on the investors' original stake of about $417 million has fallen far short of expectations.  The proposed dividend may help save Kohlberg Kravis from possible investor criticism that it overpaid for Beatrice.  Two years ago, some Beatrice insiders boasted that by selling off the company's assets, including its lines of Wesson cooking oils and Hunt tomato products, investors would earn a pre-tax profit that could exceed $3 billion.  But the stock market crash of Oct. 19 quickly slashed such profit estimates.  For Beatrice, borrowing about $328 million -- the rest of the payout would be achieved by issuing preferred stock -- would increase its current debt level to about $1.8 billion.  When Kohlberg Kravis acquired Beatrice, it took on debt totaling $7.8 billion.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. criticized Beatrice's plan and said it will review $800 million of the company's debt ratings for possible downgrade.  The proposed payout to Beatrice investors would produce "prolonged pressure on operating expenses" and create "uncertainty" about the food concern's ability to generate profit, Moody's said.  Fred Rentschler, Beatrice's chief executive officer, defended the proposed move, saying, "What's the big deal if we cash out to shareholders?"  He added, "It's their company."  Moody's also said it's worried about the Beatrice proposal's "impact on capital resources necessary to maintain efficient production and support of Beatrice's consumer-brand franchises, on which rests the future of Beatrice's businesses."  Beatrice is operating several popular brands it couldn't sell, including Wesson Oil and Hunt tomato products.  Beatrice officials said the proposed payout to investors may not occur until 1990, if at all.  Separately, Beatrice said it filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission to sell $350 million of senior subordinated notes, in two offerings, both due in 1997.  Proceeds will be used to repay bank borrowings.  The offering is being managed by Salomon Brothers Inc.  The fight over the future of Public Service Co. of New Hampshire heated up as a higher bid for the beleaguered power company emerged and the company's management announced a proposed reorganization agreement with creditors and investors under which it would remain independent.  Westborough, Mass.-based New England Electric System increased its offer to acquire Public Service of New Hampshire to $2 billion.  Separately, under Public Service's proposed agreement with investor groups and creditors, the company was valued at $2.2 billion.  That plan presumes slightly higher annual rate increases for customers than the New England Electric plan.  The competing proposals emerged days before the Friday deadline set by a federal judge for submitting reorganization plans for the utility.  Burdened by debt incurred by its investment in the Seabrook nuclear power plant, Public Service sought protection from its creditors last year under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  The proposal by New England Electric "is now the clear front-runner as far as the state of New Hampshire is concerned," said Larry M. Smukler, senior assistant attorney general.  In a statement, New Hampshire Gov. Judd Gregg called the plan "clearly the best proposal on the table . . . from the consumer's point of view."  Northeast Utilities, Hartford Conn., also has proposed buying the company.  United Illuminating of New Haven also may make a bid.  These competing proposals will be evaluated by the bankruptcy court, which has set a hearing date of Nov. 15.  The court is then expected to rule on which proposals will be forwarded to creditors for a vote.  Further hearings by the court are expected, and participants in the case don't expect a resolution until July 1990.  An adviser to PS of New Hampshire's shareholders was outraged by the state's proposed plan with New England Electric.  Wilbur Ross Jr. of Rothschild Inc. said the state struck "a bad deal" and that New Hampshire "has been acting more like a banana republic than a pro-business state."  He said that under the New England Electric plan, PS of New Hampshire customers would get "bargain basement rates."  The New England Electric plan assumes 4.8% annual rate increases whether or not Seabrook operates.  The plan by Northeast Utilities provides for annual rate increases of 5.5% if Seabrook operates and 6.6% if it is canceled; and the company said its internal reorganization would result in similar increases.  The New England Electric proposal calls for it to pay $1.9 billion for PS of New Hampshire's non-Seabrook assets and an additional $100 million for the company's 35.6% stake in the troubled nuclear power plant if it begins commercial operation.  Under the proposal, if Seabrook is in operation, New England Electric will purchase PS of New Hampshire for $1.6 billion in cash and 11.25 million New England Electric common shares valued at about $300 million, and a New England Electric unit will assume $100 million of PS of New Hampshire's pollution control bonds.  Previously, New England Electric proposed acquiring the non-Seabrook assets of PS of New Hampshire for $1.4 billion, with Seabrook being spun off to a separate company owned by current PS of New Hampshire investors.  PS of New Hampshire currently owes its creditors about $1.72 billion.  The state says it has serious reservations about the internal reorganization plan, but the company contends its plan could be completed faster than other plans because it doesn't involve a change in ownership.  Strength in technology issues and some futures-related buying provided a lift to the stock market, where prices closed higher in sluggish trading.  Blue-chip issues trailed the broad market, reversing the recent pattern.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 2.85 to 2707.26, while advancing issues outnumbered decliners by about a 4-3 margin on the New York Stock Exchange.  But traders said anticipation of the round of U.S. economic reports due this week, along with Friday's "triple witching hour" expiration of stock index futures and options, continued to weigh on the market.  "There just doesn't seem to be enough players or people willing to do anything," said Jon Groveman, president of Ladenburg, Thalmann & Co.  "They're going to wait for a trend to develop, and then they're going to play."  Prices reached their highs at midmorning with the help of buy programs resulting from stock-index arbitrage.  When index futures prices reached relatively sharp premiums to the cash indexes, arbitrage traders sold futures contracts and bought some or all of the underlying stocks.  Later in the session, speculation that the monthly report from the semiconductor industry would prove favorable generated buying of chip producers and selected computer stocks, traders said.  Semiconductor stocks outpaced other Dow Jones industry groups by a wide margin.  Texas Instruments rose 7/8 to 41 1/8, Motorola gained 1 1/8 to 56 3/4, and Advanced Micro Devices went up 1/8 to 8 1/2.  National Semiconductor firmed 1/4 to 7 1/2 despite reporting a $21.9 million loss for its latest quarter, a larger loss than analysts generally expected.  As for computer issues, International Business Machines added 5/8 to 116 7/8, Digital Equipment rose 2 1/4 to 99 1/2, Compaq Computer climbed 1 3/8 to 91 7/8, NCR rose 5/8 to 64 1/2, and Tandem Computers gained 3/4 to 23 1/8.  There were 824 issues advancing in price on the Big Board, while 632 fell.  Among broader averages, the Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index went up 1.04 to 348.70, the Dow Jones Equity Market Index gained 1.14 to 327.62, and the Big Board Composite Index rose 0.58 to 193.88.  Volume totaled 142,140,000 shares, compared with 126,020,000 Monday, as activity remained relatively subdued.  "What we need is some kind of a trigger, something new to provide inspiration to this market," said A. Marshall Acuff Jr., a portfolio strategist at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  That inspiration isn't likely to come from the upturn in the technology sector, Mr. Acuff said, although those stocks have been left out of the market's rise in recent months.  "The question is whether that's another flash in the pan," he said, as previous rallies in the sector have come and gone quickly.  Oil stocks, which have been on the rise along with oil prices recently, continued to improve.  Exxon gained 3/4 to 45 3/8 on Big Board composite volume of 1.5 million shares, Chevron advanced 5/8 to 59 1/4, Mobil rose 7/8 to 57 3/4, and Amoco gained 5/8 to 49 7/8.  Unocal, which Oppenheimer & Co. called the industry's top takeover candidate, jumped 2 5/8 to 57 3/4.  On the other hand, the steel sector was among the market's poorest performers.  Armco eased 1/2 to 12 5/8, Bethlehem Steel lost 1/4 to 21 1/2, Inland Steel Industries dropped 3/8 to 43 5/8, and Allegheny Ludlum fell 3/8 to 38.  Bethlehem contributed to the sluggishness in the industrial average, as did Woolworth, which went down 1 1/2 to 69 1/2; Sears Roebuck, down 1/4 to 44 7/8; Philip Morris, down 1 to 160 3/8; Du Pont, down 5/8 to 117 5/8; and Goodyear Tire & Rubber, down 3/4 to 56 1/8.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average ended a four-session losing streak by rising 7.47 to 1477.06.  UAL, the parent of United Airlines, climbed 4 5/8 to 281 and accounted for most of the average's gain.  Datapoint topped the list of active Big Board issues on 2.7 million shares and fell 1/2 to 5 3/8.  New York investor Asher Edelman, the company's chairman, told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report a group he controls raised its stake to more than 40% by purchasing a total of about three million shares this week.  The buying followed the disclosure that another investor, Martin S. Ackerman, plans a proxy fight for control of Datapoint's board; Mr. Ackerman said he would file suit to block the Edelman group from carrying out the purchases.  Quantum Chemical dropped 3/8 to 44 5/8 in the wake of an explosion and fire at its Morris, Ill., plant.  Elsewhere in the chemical sector, Avery International advanced 1 to 28 3/4; Bear Stearns began analyst coverage of the company with a favorable rating.  Penn Central gained 7/8 to 27 1/2.  Kidder Peabody repeated its buy recommendation on the stock, and analyst Donald A. Zwyer said the company may be taken private through a management-led leveraged buyout.  Penn Central declined to comment.  Sealed Air tacked on 1 1/2 to 22 1/2.  Oppenheimer began its coverage of the company with a buy rating and placed the stock on its special research recommendation list.  Xtra, which agreed to sell its railroad fleet to Chrysler for $85 million, gained 3/4 to 31 7/8.  The company, which also agreed to sell its warehousing operations to an unidentified buyer, said it expects to post a slight pretax loss on the sales.  It didn't elaborate.  Businessland climbed 7/8 to 12 1/2.  The company's board approved plans to purchase as many as five million of its common shares, about 16% of the total outstanding.  The American Stock Exchange Index gained 2.11 to 384.54, just eclipsing its record of 384.53 set last Tuesday.  Volume totaled 11,910,000 shares, compared with 11,080,000 Monday.  There were 306 issues advancing, 269 declining and 275 unchanged.  Atari, the most active Amex issue, climbed 1 1/4 to 12 3/8 as 1.3 million shares changed hands in composite trading.  International Recovery added 5/8 to 15 7/8.  The company agreed to acquire the aviation-fuel marketing operations of JCO Energy Partners for about $6 million.  Bush administration officials may have more faith than the Soviet people do that Mikhail Gorbachev will survive politically.  Senior administration officials agree that the Soviet leader's problems with ethnic unrest and economic stagnation have grown deeper than they were several months ago.  But they think Mr. Gorbachev remains politically secure for now -- if only because he currently has no strong rivals for power.  As a result, the administration plans to move ahead on a full agenda of U.S.-Soviet issues, ranging from arms control to the Middle East, when Secretary of State James Baker meets his Soviet counterpart, Eduard Shevardnadze, in Wyoming later this month.  Administration officials even think they can lend Mr. Gorbachev a hand.  "We want to be fully engaged and actively working on the U.S.-Soviet relationship in a manner that will be beneficial to us and at the same time might be helpful to the success of perestroika," says a top Bush administration official, referring to Mr. Gorbachev's economic restructuring program.  While the Soviet people appear to have grown increasingly uneasy, the Bush administration has moved in the opposite direction.  Initially skeptical about whether Mr. Gorbachev was serious about overhauling his nation's politics and economy, U.S. officials now focus on how to bolster his efforts.  Some senior administration officials even have talked recently about how they might soften the outcry here if Mr. Gorbachev decides he has to crack down on growing unrest.  A senior U.S. official says that the administration expects to begin offering Moscow advice -- but not money -- on how to move toward a more open economic system.  For the first time, the issue of the Soviet economy and how to overhaul it will be discussed at a senior-level, U.S.-Soviet meeting when Mr. Baker meets Mr. Shevardnadze in Wyoming.  Later this year, Federal Reserve Board Chairman Alan Greenspan is scheduled to visit Moscow, underscoring the high level of interest within the administration in encouraging Soviet economic reform.  A top administration specialist on the Soviet Union says the best way to help Mr. Gorbachev would be to conclude by next spring a treaty reducing conventional arms in Europe.  That would give Mr. Gorbachev substantial, immediate economic relief by allowing him to reduce his swollen defense budget.  It also could shore up his popular support if he diverts money saved on defense to the consumer sector.  U.S. officials vigorously deny they are racing to strike deals with Mr. Gorbachev out of fear that he won't be around much longer.  And despite their newly cooperative attitude, they insist that until the Soviets actually adopt economic reforms -- such as allowing prices to be determined by market forces -- the U.S. will continue to oppose Soviet entry into such international organizations as the World Bank and the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, or GATT.  This attitude reflects the administration's view that Moscow must undertake a long, painful period of reform to reverse its economic slide, and that Washington's ability to influence the process is limited.  "We've recognized from day one that (reform) isn't going to happen overnight, and probably shouldn't happen overnight if it's going to succeed," says a top administration official.  In an interview earlier this week, another senior official illustrated the distance Mr. Gorbachev must move his nation by showing a Soviet pocket knife.  Its price was stamped into its plastic handle -- encapsulating, the official said, the ingrained rigidity of a centrally planned economy.  Major portions of the Bush administration's anti-drug program won initial approval within the Senate Appropriations Committee, but divisions remain over what share of the new spending can be financed by cuts in defense.  In a series of meetings, appropriations subcommittees overseeing the Justice Department, Pentagon, and Department of Housing and Urban Development approved significant increases for law enforcement and drug interdiction, but rejected offsetting cuts from domestic programs.  The White House signaled it would accept an across-the-board cut -- including the military -- to finance the president's share of the proposals.  But the administration is clearly reluctant to go further for fear of a wholesale diversion of resources from the Pentagon.  Defense Secretary Richard Cheney accompanied White House and budget officials at a meeting yesterday with Senate Republicans on the drug issue, and the administration stepped up its attacks on Democratic critics and warned it would veto a House-passed appropriations bill already cutting Mr. Bush's fiscal 1990 Pentagon budget.  Senate Democrats are scheduled to caucus this afternoon and, within the party, the issue has sparked divisions and old rivalries.  Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd surprised the White House on Monday by proposing a $3.9 billion amendment almost doubling the increases sought by the president.  But Mr. Byrd soon found himself at a disadvantage yesterday when a subcommittee within his own panel adopted a more modest $1.84 billion package.  In both cases, the plans depend upon across-the-board cuts to finance new spending.  But the second proposal confines itself to requests made by the administration within the Justice Department.  The measure would be attached to an $17.3 billion bill funding not only the Justice Department but also the State and Commerce Departments.  Its acceptance in the subcommittee was an implicit challenge to Mr. Byrd, and it prompted a testy and sometimes heated exchange with the subcommittee chairman, Sen. Ernest Hollings (D., S.C.).  Mr. Byrd had angered many Democrats earlier this year when he helped to undercut a House-passed amendment increasing funds for many of the same antidrug purposes.  Mr. Hollings, who supported the House effort, still carries memories of that fight.  "I'm not going to roll over for him," the South Carolina conservative said later.  The division leaves an opening for the administration, but the debate underscores, too, that the Pentagon can't escape further cuts.  In presenting its package last week, the administration identified potential savings of only $132 million from the military.  But Mr. Hollings's proposal, which has bipartisan support in his subcommittee, demands reductions of an estimated $675 million.  If the same method is used to finance the remainder of the president's proposals, the net reduction from the Pentagon could reach more than $800 million to $900 million.  These reductions are being discussed at a time when the military is also being tapped for a larger, direct role in the so-called drug war.  The Senate Appropriations defense subcommittee yesterday earmarked more than $1 billion in fiscal 1990 spending for anti-drug activities.  While some of these funds continue existing operations, the total represents a significant expansion beyond what the president anticipated.  Mr. Bush is assured of the $125 million requested to assist Andean countries, such as Colombia, in fighting drug traffic.  But in addition, the subcommittee provided an estimated $512 million for drug interdiction efforts within the U.S. military itself.  The National Guard would be promised $40 million in radar equipment for helicopters to assist local law-enforcement agencies and, separately, $300 million in transfers and operational support would go to the Coast Guard.  The net impact is to divert nearly $490 million more from the Pentagon than the administration requested, and this is before whatever across-the-board cut is finally negotiated.  Although the White House still hopes to win approval of some of the individual domestic cuts it proposed, the administration has been hurt by its failure to present a more complete and credible financing package in its initial presentation.  For example, the Senate appropriations subcommittee overseeing the HUD budget yesterday brushed aside a White House proposal to find savings by trimming back House-passed increases in federal subsidies for public housing.  Many of the nation's poorest tenants live in such housing.  The panel yesterday approved $50 million in new spending for HUD for anti-drug activities, but the bill would, in fact, increase operating subsidies above the House level.  Similarly, Mr. Hollings and the ranking Republican on his subcommittee, Sen. Warren Rudman (R., N.H.), have resisted cuts in Legal Services and the Economic Development Administration.  And in the absence of any support for new taxes, appropriators continue to devise fees to offset spending.  An estimated $30 million would be raised by having the Federal Bureau of Investigations charge for fingerprinting services in noncriminal matters, and one agency which is likely to have to pay heavily is the Pentagon.  Amid the increased funding for drugs, money isn't included in the Senate subcommittee bill for claims stemming from World War II.  The House had approved $50 million to begin paying reparations to Japanese-Americans held in camps during the war, but senators said discretionary funds aren't available this coming year.  Washington Public Power Supply System, famous for the biggest default in municipal bond history, returned to the market yesterday with a huge new tax-exempt issue.  But despite its past sins, WPPSS, a nuclear-power agency irreverently known as "Whoops," received what its investment bankers called a warm welcome.  Thanks to demand from insurance companies, bank trust departments, bond funds and trusts buying on behalf of individuals, the size of the offering was raised to about $721 million from $612 million earlier in the day -- and the $450 million originally planned.  The warmth of the reception was partly because the new WPPSS bonds offer higher yields than other bonds with similar credit ratings, several analysts and investment managers said.  They cited this "penalty" that WPPSS had to pay as one of the main reasons they are willing to buy the new bonds.  Yields on the new WPPSS bonds ranged from 6.25% on bonds due next July to as high as 7.70% on bonds due in about 26 years.  The issue also includes a large block of bonds due in 27 years, insured by Bond Investors Guaranty, and priced to yield 7.375%.  The WPPSS issue came on an exceptionally busy day in the municipal finance arena.  More than $1.5 billion of new issues, including the WPPSS issue, were offered to investors.  In the secondary, or resale, market, prices of municipal, corporate and U.S. Treasury notes and bonds were little changed.  Interest rates on short-term Treasury bills fell slightly.  Among those placing orders for the WPPSS bonds were several Fidelity bond funds.  "I think it's a very strong credit," said Maureen Newman, a bond analyst at Fidelity Investments in Boston.  She said the bonds' high yields compared with those of other similarly rated issues make them especially attractive.  The reason for those higher yields is "the Whoops name and because investors still have a bad taste in their mouths" from the 1983 default on $2.25 billion of WPPSS bonds for nuclear power projects Nos. 4 and 5, she added.  The new WPPSS bonds are being sold to refinance its projects Nos. 1 and 3, which didn't default.  Even so, investors badly burned by WPPSS's default six years ago are bitter.  "We're hoping the underwriters choke on this thing," said C. Richard Lehmann, a holder of the defaulted bonds and president of the Bond Investors Association.  WPPSS "has shown a lack of good faith" in the past, he says.  He added: "Why is there any reason to think it couldn't happen again if they got in a tight space?"  Some specialists said yesterday's offering represents a classic example of how short a memory many bond underwriters and professional investors have.  "The yields aren't sufficient on the uninsured bonds to justify an investment," especially in view of "its history of mismanagement and bad planning" contended Robert Boyden Lamb, professor of finance and management at New York University's Stern School of Business and co-author of a 1986 book entitled "WPP$$: Who Is to Blame for the WPPSS Disaster."  But the past no longer seems relevant to many investors.  "This issue received a warm reception.  We're seeing very broad and diversified investor demand," said Rick Kolman, a vice president at Goldman, Sachs & Co., the lead underwriter.  Frank Ingrassia of Goldman added that individual investors also are showing strong interest in the issue.  Several analysts and money managers said the new WPPSS bonds offer between 0.15 percentage point and 0.35 percentage point more than certain other bonds with similar ratings.  "The extra yield makes it especially interesting to us" in spite of "the taint of the Whoops name," said Ms. Newman of Fidelity.  Still, some strategists remain highly dubious of anything carrying the WPPSS name.  "I guess it's my suspicious nature, but I don't trust them {WPPSS} even though the management and other circumstances have changed," said Raymond F. DeVoe Jr., market strategist at Legg Mason Wood Walker Inc.  "My feeling is thanks a lot but no thanks.  Once fooled, shame on you.  Twice fooled, shame on me."  WPPSS officials have been cheered by the reception for the issue.  "We're very pleased with the way it's gone so far," says John Britton, a spokesman for WPPSS.  The WPPSS issue originally had been planned for sale in August.  But it was delayed after Chemical Bank, trustee for the defaulted bonds, claimed that holders of those bonds were entitled to part of the new offering's proceeds.  Chemical insisted that some costs for the WPPSS projects not in default were incorrectly billed to the Nos. 4 and 5 projects.  WPPSS and Chemical later reached an agreement paving the way for the new issue to proceed.  Chemical agreed it wouldn't pursue a claim against the bond proceeds in exchange for a pledge by Bonneville Power Administration that any final judgment for the misallocated costs would be paid out of other funds.  The new WPPSS bonds, unlike those in default, are indirectly backed by revenues from Bonneville, a federal power agency.  The new WPPSS bonds that are uninsured were rated double-A-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp., while Moody's Investors Service Inc. rated them single-A.  However, the bonds insured by Bond Investors Guaranty are rated triple-A by both these agencies.  First Boston Corp. was the financial adviser to WPPSS for this issue.  Municipals  Prices of actively traded municipal bonds finished slightly lower as a huge wave of new issues hit the market yesterday.  Some long-term issues declined 1/8 to 1/4 point in light trading.  For example, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue due 2018 closed 1/8 point lower at 98 1/8, yielding 7.35%.  While the WPPSS issue drew intense attention from investors, there were many other issuers yesterday.  These included Tennessee, the New Jersey Housing Finance Authority, and New York state's Mortgage Finance Agency.  The New York state agency offered $260 million of housing revenue bonds.  On the WPPSS issue, underwriters said demand from investors was strong enough to enable them to trim yields from levels tentatively set earlier in the day.  The issue originally totaled about $612 million of revenue bonds with yields starting at 6.30% in 1990.  Treasury, Agency Securities  U.S. Treasury notes and bonds ended mixed, with prices of some short-term notes little changed or slightly higher while long-term bonds edged lower.  The government's latest 30-year bonds were quoted late in the day at a price of 100 9/32, down about 1/4 point, or $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount, from late Monday.  The yield stood at 8.08%, up slightly from 8.06%.  Trading was sluggish, as many dealers are waiting for U.S. economic reports scheduled to be released Friday to get a clearer idea of where the economy and inflation are heading.  "We shouldn't read too much into the zigs and zags because investors are still on the sidelines," said Lawrence N. Leuzzi, a managing director at S.G. Warburg Securities & Co..  "The debt markets still appear to be on vacation.  Trading activity is very light."  Among short-term interest rates, the Treasury's latest three-month bills were quoted late yesterday by some dealers at a discount rate of 7.60% bid and a bond-equivalent yield of about 7.84%.  The bills were sold by the government Monday at an average rate of 7.64% and a bond-equivalent yield of 7.90%.  Separately, a new $885 million issue of Federal Home Loan Bank bonds was priced.  According to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report, it included $550 million of one-year securities priced to yield 8.30%.  There also was $335 million of three-year bonds priced to yield 8.25%.  Corporate Issues  The corporate new-issue bond market has come back from the Labor Day holiday.  Nearly $1 billion in new issues were brought to market this session, with the largest offering a $500 million underwritten debenture issue by the Federal National Mortgage Association.  Fannie Mae sells debt on a regular basis each month in the federal agency debt market; however, when the agency sees financing opportunities in the capital markets, it often makes unscheduled bond offerings such as this deal.  The seven-year debentures offered this session were priced to yield 8.823%, which represents a yield spread of .68 percentage point above the Treasury's seven-year note.  The debentures are noncallable for four years, and will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  In the secondary market, corporates closed flat to slightly higher.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities were strong for the second straight session amid increasing demand from institutional investors who think the sector is undervalued following heavy thrift sales this year.  Active mortgage issues gained 5/32 to 6/32, while intermediate Treasury securities were little changed.  Traders noted that current yields of about 9.50% on major mortgage issues are much higher than those on top-grade corporate bonds.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery ended at 97 3/4, up 6/32; Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities ended at 96 27/32, up 6/32.  The Ginnie Mae 9% securities are yielding 9.44% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the Treasury 10-year note narrowed .03 percentage point to 1.33 percentage points.  The 10-year note ended at 99 6/32, unchanged.  Foreign Bonds  Japanese government bonds rallied yesterday, but West German issues fell while British issues were little changed.  In Tokyo, Japan's benchmark issue, the No. 111, 4.6% bonds due 1998, rose 0.31 point to 95.63, near the high price of the day, to yield 5.330%.  Nevertheless, some traders still fear Japan will raise short-term interest rates soon in an effort to bolster the yen against the U.S. dollar.  In West Germany, prices of government bonds continued to tumble, this time by about 0.20 point.  Bonn's 6 3/4% issue of June 1999 declined 0.20 point to 98.80 to yield 6.92%.  The 6 3/4% notes of 1994 fell 0.15 point to 98.75 to yield 7.06%.  In London, prices of long-term British government issues fell slightly, while short-term issues were mixed.  Trading was quiet, as traders focused on economic statistics due later this week.  Britain's 11 3/4% issue due 2003/2007 fell 1/8 point to 113 22/32 to yield 9.87%.  But the 11 3/4% issue due 1991 rose 1/32 point to 99 15/32 to yield 12.12%.  Sentiment was buoyed by news reports that the U.K. government on Friday will report a drop in the inflation rate.  The U.S., seeking to even out its sugar imports, extended its current quota period by nine months and authorized imports of an additional 860,000 metric tons for that extended period.  The new 21-month calendar ending on Sept. 30, 1990, will allow only a slight average increase in foreign supplies, but U.S. authorities hope that it will induce timelier shipments from the 39 countries that share the quotas.  Normally the U.S. sets quotas by calendar year.  But U.S. sugar buyers have complained that suppliers sometimes withhold shipments until the quota is about to expire on Dec. 30.  This can cause shortages in the summer and early fall and a glut at year end when foreign supplies are augmented by the U.S. sugar harvest, Agriculture Department officials said.  The Sweetener Users Association, a trade body representing major industrial users, said it is "pleased" with the revised schedule.  "Industrial consumers asked for these changes in July to stem rising raw sugar prices resulting from tight supplies," said the association's president, Thomas Hammer.  This year's overall quota is 1,124,255 tons.  With the additional tonnages announced yesterday, the overall quota for the 21-month period will be more than 1,984,000 tons.  Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter said this rearrangement isn't related to an earlier General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade ruling questioning the legality of the U.S. sugar quotas.  Mr. Yeutter said the U.S. is still looking for "options for bringing these quotas into conformity with GATT."  GATT is the Geneva-based body that regulates international trade.  The U.S. also announced that Panama's initial allocation of 30,537 tons under the revised arrangement will be spread among the other quota holders.  The State Department linked this action to U.S. efforts to force Panama strongman Manuel Noriega to "respect the will of the Panamanian people."  Say goodbye to Eastern Europe.  As the world watches thousands of Western-looking young East Germans stream through Austria into West Germany, what so many have known for so long is finally manifest: The idea of "Eastern Europe" was a conceit, a fiction, a lie.  It is not our purpose here to turn over the tragedy of Yalta or the division of Germany.  The simple truth is that millions of Europeans found themselves after the war working within an utterly phony economic system created by Karl Marx and Lenin and imposed by Stalin.  These were people who before 1939 were centered in Budapest, Prague or Warsaw, contributing to the rise of the West, and struggling with the pitfalls and benefits of industrialization in the 20th century.  When after Hitler's war these same people discovered themselves led decade after decade by communist "leaders" named Gomulka, Kadar or Novotny, none forgot for a moment that their place in civilization's progress had been stolen from them.  As the late Polish emigre critic Leopold Tyrmand once told us, "You in the West simply have no idea what it is like to live every day of your life under something like communism, with no prospect of ever being able to say publicly what is on your mind or to fully realize whatever talents God gave you."  This week, Hungary held the door open and 10,000 East Germans poured through it.  They have deserted communism for capitalism.  They have rejoined the 20th century.  Life will change for them as quickly as it did when Alice emerged from the rabbit hole.  No such instant membership in capitalism's progress is available for those they left behind in East Germany, or even for the Hungarians who helped them, or for any of the other peoples still more or less affiliated with Moscow, the perpetrator of this grim 45-year hoax.  Still, the spectacle of this extraordinary rush to freedom and the forces that made it possible convince us that it is no longer appropriate to speak simply of "Eastern Europe."  That monolithic phrase described an artificial political geography of sputtering economies, false politics and sad people.  To save his nation from consequent collapse, Mikhail Gorbachev created "glasnost" and "perestroika".  What the Russians may do with this in the future is important; what some of their national partners already have accomplished with it is breathtaking.  Never before has the cleavage been more pronounced between those East European nations that have committed themselves to sweeping out communist absolutism and those that are insisting on its retention.  For the first time in their postwar existence, Poland and Hungary are practicing real politics.  Consider the course of Budapest's decision to help the fleeing East Germans, an independent act of foreign policy.  As dictated by a 1969 agreement between Hungary and East Germany, the Hungarian police until just a few weeks ago would stamp the passports of East Germans caught trying to escape, thereby identifying them as escapees when returned to East German authorities.  But Budapest's unrestrained press publicized this outrage, forcing the government to state that it would not compel East Germans to return home branded as escapees.  The flow of East Germans to Hungary swelled to a flood, and Hungarian border guards looked the other way as East Germans escaped to Austria.  East Berlin screamed at the behavior of its Warsaw Pact partner, so the Hungarians clamped down.  But they also began to seek a solution.  Hungarian Premier Miklos Nemeth and Foreign Minister Gyula Horn traveled to both Bonn and East Berlin.  They offered to send the would-be refugees home if East Germany guaranteed that they would be neither jailed nor lose their passports or jobs.  East Berlin only agreed not to incarcerate returnees.  That was not enough to satisfy Hungary, where the ruling communists will face Eastern Europe's first fully free multiparty elections no later than next June.  The decision followed to let the Germans begin their exodus.  Moreover, rather than seek permission from the Kremlin for its momentous decision, Hungary simply notified Moscow of it.  Moscow is tolerating the Hungarians' tactics, perhaps out of fear that their own subjects may be the next refugee flood headed for Hungary.  At the same time, the success of the remarkable and courageous steps Budapest has taken will have considerable bearing on the outcome of similar reforms in the Soviet Union and Poland.  Meanwhile, Hungary's relations with the East Germans, Romanians and Czechoslovaks -- Europe's three hard-line communist states -- are now at the lowest point since the war.  There is considerable risk that these three will try to sabotage its initiatives.  To compensate, Budapest's best chance lies with trying to consolidate its gains in the West.  In the short run, it can best accomplish this by ensuring that the coming elections are democratic and by pushing ahead with constitutional and legal reforms to transform the country into a market economy.  The time is at hand for the West to design a specific and creative response to these events.  The awful thing that we for so long called Eastern Europe may at last be dying, but the dramatic procession of East Germans through Hungary attests that much of what remains is vital.  Campeau Corp., facing pressure to meet debt-payment deadlines, said it reached an agreement in principle under which Olympia & York Developments Ltd., a major holder, will loan it $250 million.  The accord was expected.  Campeau said after a board meeting here that the loan is convertible and secured, but it didn't release terms of the loan.  Campeau said as much as $150 million of the loan will be provided to its Federated Department Stores unit, and as much as $100 million is slated for its Allied Stores Corp. subsidiary, to meet their "liquidity needs."  Campeau said the board also authorized, as part of financial restructuring, the retail and real estate concern's plan to sell its Bloomingdale's department store chain.  Campeau said there can be no assurance of securing the lender and creditor concurrences required to enter into the definitive agreements with Olympia & York.  The board also noted that there can be no assurance that the sale of Bloomingdale's will be completed.  A spokeswoman for Campeau said the company wouldn't be releasing terms of the loan agreement with Olympia & York until it was definitive.  Campeau previously said that it needed the loan to meet liquidity needs projected to begin tomorrow.  The spokeswoman said she didn't know if any further action was taken at the board meeting.  Olympia & York, owned by Toronto's Reichmann family, currently has a 24.5% stake, fully diluted, in Campeau Corp. Analysts speculate that the proposed loan could be convertible into about 10 million Campeau shares, which would raise Olympia & York's interest to about 35% and reduce Chairman Robert Campeau's stake to less than 50%, fully diluted.  Analysts and industry executives say Campeau has had to turn to the Reichmanns for help because his retailing units are facing considerable pressure on their working capital credit lines, just when they are buying critical Christmas inventory.  In addition, Campeau must by Friday secure financing commitments on $400 million of notes held by First Boston Corp. and two other investment bankers, or be forced to give up 7% of the equity in Federated.  Also, the company must by January refinance $800 million of bridge loans with a type of mortgage financing, but commitments from banks for that are seen to be long overdue.  And Allied must refinance about $350 million in working capital loans that come due in March.  Olympia & York lent Campeau $75 million in April, when Allied refinanced $1.2 billion in debt with a new banking syndicate.  That loan was secured against Campeau's 50% interest in its flagship office building, the 68-story Scotia Plaza in Toronto's financial district.  Olympia & York owns the other 50% of the building.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, Campeau stock dropped 25 Canadian cents to close at C$16.875 (US$14.20).  David Thomson, the publicity-shy heir to the Thomson media empire, is characteristically silent on why he cashed in about $95 million worth of stock in his family's flagship companies.  The family controls about 200 newspapers and scores of other information concerns.  David Thomson, aged 32, has never been interviewed by any of them.  But associates say the agreement Monday to sell all or most of his individual holdings in Thomson Corp. and Hudson's Bay Co. doesn't mean he is dropping out of the family businesses.  A source close to the family says he is still being groomed to be "custodian of the Thomson empire" when his father, Kenneth Thomson, steps down.  The elder Thomson has shown no signs of doing that, but he has given his son more responsibility in each of the past several years.  While the purpose of the younger Thomson in unloading his stakes is unclear, it is widely known he likes to dabble in the art and real-estate markets.  The family empire includes 116 U.S. dailies, Canada's biggest retail merchandiser, electronic-information services, a big British leisure-travel operation and publications such as Jane's Fighting Ships and Ward's Automotive Handbook.  The family's majority holdings in Thomson Corp. and Hudson's Bay have market value of about $6.3 billion.  David Thomson is in line to inherit the British title of Lord Thomson of Fleet from his father, who is 66.  After buying his son's shares, Kenneth Thomson or companies he controls will hold 68.4% of Thomson Corp. and 77.3% of Hudson's Bay.  The younger Thomson was brought into the family's retailing business in 1979 after he earned a history degree at England's Cambridge University.  One of his first management jobs was to head one of the main Toronto stores in The Bay department-store chain.  From there he became executive assistant to George Kosich, then Hudson's Bay's executive vice president, who is credited with reinvigorating what had been a money-losing company.  In mid-1987, David Thomson was vaulted to the post of president of Zeller's Inc., a discount department-store chain that has been Hudson's Bay's most profitable division.  At the same time, Mr. Kosich won a power struggle to become president and chief operating officer of Hudson's Bay.  Early this year, David Thomson became chairman and chief executive officer of Hudson's Bay's Simpson's Ltd. department-store chain.  Well into his apprenticeship at the Thomson's retailing operations, David Thomson also joined the boards of International Thomson Organisation Ltd. and Thomson Newspapers Ltd., which later merged to form Thomson Corp.  While remaining head of Simpson's, he moved his office about one year ago from the Simpson's building across the street to the Thomson building to devote more of his time to the family's other businesses.  He currently is working more closely with W. Michael Brown, the New York-based president of Thomson Corp.  The $95 million from his stock sale isn't as awe-inspiring to Mr. Thomson as it might be to other men of his age.  For several years he has bought in high-priced art and real estate, and is considered to be an astute investor in both.  "He was crazy about art, real estate and Zeller's," said a source familiar with the Thomsons.  In 1984, for example, he spent #6.7 million ($10.4 million at current exchange rates) to buy Seascape Folkestone, a painting by the British master J.M. Turner.  At the time, it was one of the highest prices ever paid for a painting in England.  Mr. Thomson drew headlines in Britain this year when the Turner was valued at #20 million and he applied for permission to export it to Canada.  In March 1988, he bought a stately mansion from the estate of a prominent Toronto stockbroker for about $2.6 million.  It is one of several expensive houses associates say he has purchased in Toronto's high-rent districts, where real-estate prices have skyrocketed.  Quantum Chemical Corp. temporarily shut down its Morris, Ill., plant because of a fire in the ethylene unit's acetylene converter area.  One person was killed and 17 others were injured.  The injured were transferred to local area and Chicago hospitals.  Of the 12 admitted to hospitals, five are in critical condition.  Five workers were released.  The person killed was an employee of a contractor doing work at the plant.  Late yesterday, officials of New York-based Quantum said they were still investigating the cause of the fire and had no estimate of the extent of the damage.  Taiwan plans to acquire a satellite-communications Earth station from a GTE Corp. subsidiary as part of the country's attempt to reduce its trade surplus with the U.S.  A trade group from Taiwan, including government and industry officials, will sign the $10.3 million contract this week with GTE Spacenet International Corp., a Waltham, Mass., group within GTE, the Stamford, Conn., telecommunications company.  The country's government and industry plan to spend nearly $4 billion in the U.S., mostly on U.S.-made products including light aircraft, high-technology electronics, and medical and environmental-protection equipment.  According to Taiwan's Coordinating Council for North American Affairs, based in Boston, the country's trade surplus with the U.S. totaled $10.4 billion for 1988 and $6.8 billion in the first seven months of 1989.  As the bus crosses the Orontes River into this city's old Moslem neighborhoods, the only sound from its Syrian passengers is an occasional muffled gasp.  There is rubble in every direction.  To the left, many of the buildings have been flattened by artillery fire.  Bulldozers now are clearing away the debris.  To the right are the empty shells of what until February were homes, shops, apartment buildings, offices and mosques.  This is how a once-bustling big commercial center looks three months after a revolt by militant Moslems was shelled into submission by government troops.  Up to 10,000 residents died in the confrontation, according to diplomatic sources, yet little news of the battle or its aftermath has reached the West.  That was the start of the chilling dispatch filed in 1982 by our Mideast correspondent at the time, David Ignatius, after a rare glimpse of Hama, the city that the Syrian dictator, Hafez al-Assad, destroyed to silence dissent.  The population of the Syrian city was reportedly reduced to a sixth of the 300,000 who lived there before the siege.  Some estimates put the number who died at 20,000.  Yet few seem to remember the fate of the people of Hama.  One group does remember -- the Christian community of Lebanon.  Since the days in August when the same Syrian dictator who murdered Hama's thousands began moving forward artillery and tanks to within range of Beirut, the Christians have been fleeing his savage artillery.  They know that Assad's army is preparing to do to Lebanon's Christian community what it did to the people of its own city of Hama.  It is preparing to commit a massacre -- in which untold thousands of Christians will die.  The scale of the looming disaster is defined by the fact that the besieged Christian enclave is home for one million people.  Western reaction has been pitiful.  Liberal pundits have gone out of their way to blame the Christians' military commander, General Michel Aoun, for provoking a Syrian assault.  It would be like blaming the Americans at Bastogne for the German encirclement.  In Washington, State Department spokesmen echo this line -- or feed it.  They seem to feel that by being crueler, bloodier and more determined than the next guy, President Assad has earned the right to dictate the fate of Lebanon.  The Bush administration's main policy initiative was to helicopter its few diplomats out of America's Beirut embassy after the embassy was besieged by resentful Lebanese Christians, egged on, no doubt, by a frustrated General Aoun.  By now it ought to be clear that in Lebanon disengagement is not a responsible option for America.  The Reagan administration tried to disengage in 1982, withdrawing the Marines.  Desperate Christian militiamen then moved in and, in search for Palestinian terrorists, massacred hundreds of civilians at Sabra and Chatilla.  The U.S. moved in again, but timidly, and its Marines were blown up in their barracks.  Secretary Shultz sought to negotiate honorably with Syria and succeeded only in having the Israelis withdrawn, though they had the one force on our side that was a match in that theater for Assad's troops.  Given the opprobrium that was heaped on them the last time they rode to the rescue of the Lebanese, it would be surprising to see the Israelis mount a new rescue.  Somehow the West has been content to leave General Aoun's own force of 20,000 soldiers to get their weapons from the Iraqis, who have their own hatred of Syria and, having disengaged with Iran, are searching for openings against Israel.  There will be a high political price to pay in the U.S. if the Syrians perpetrate a Hama-style massacre on Lebanon's Christians.  Perhaps the State Department is prepared to let this come to pass.  It would be preferable for President Bush to take charge of the administration's Lebanon policy before this curtain falls on Beirut.  Businessland Inc. said it plans to periodically purchase shares of its common stock, totaling as many as five million of common.  The San Jose, Calif., computer retailer said the purchases would be made on the open market or through privately negotiated transactions.  The company said it considers its stock a good value, particularly at current prices.  In trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, the company's stock rose 87.5 cents to close at $12.50 a share.  A company spokeswoman said no decision has been made on whether to retire the shares or designate them treasury stock.  As of June 30, Businessland had 34 million fully diluted common shares.  Texas Air Corp.'s Eastern Airlines unit can go through with its plan to sell gates, planes and two international routes to Midway Airlines Inc. for $210 million, a federal bankruptcy judge ruled.  Bankruptcy Judge Burton R. Lifland yesterday approved the sale to the Chicago-based regional airline.  Included in the sale are gates at the Philadelphia airport, 16 DC-9 airplanes, route authority from Philadephia to Toronto and Ontario and takeoff and landing slots at Washington and LaGuardia airports.  The unit of Texas Air, Houston, has been operating under Chapter 11 protection since March 9, five days after a strike by machinists and pilots nearly crippled the airline.  Since then, it has been selling off assets and slowly rebuilding its schedule as part of a plan to return to the air with about 60% of its former operation.  The state's holding in Iscor Ltd., South Africa's main iron and steel production facility, will be made available to the public in a historic share offer next month.  The offer marks the first privatization of a major state-owned facility in the government's current privatization program.  Iscor said that the 2.92 billion rand ($1.03 billion) offer will comprise the biggest offer to the general public since Sasol Ltd. -- the oil-from-coal production facility formerly owned by the state -- was converted to a public company 10 years ago.  Shares have been priced at 2 rand (70 cents) each, with 300 million rand in shares being offered to the general public.  Iscor is currently valued at 3.7 billion rand, of which the state-owned Industrial Development Corp. will retain a 16.22% shareholding of 600 million rand while Iscor's 58,000 employees have been offered 185 million rand of free and discounted shares.  The general public's portion will be 300 million rand, or 8.1% of the total, and institutions will be entitled to 2.430 billion rand, or 65.7%, with a further 185 million rand in shares offered to Iscor employees to purchase, bringing employees' total potential shareholding to 10%.  BellSouth shareholders could ring up handsome gains from the company's proposed cellular connection with LIN Broadcasting.  BellSouth shares, after surging 10 points to the 53 range between January and July, turned sluggish in recent weeks despite the summer bull market.  Wall Street yawned through meetings where Bell South executives struggled to convey to investors the potential importance of the company's cellular properties.  But now BellSouth has everybody's attention.  Analysts say this week's agreement to combine its cellular-phone operations with LIN's valuable properties will forge a formidable cellular empire, giving Atlanta-based BellSouth a much-needed shot in the arm.  "I've always believed that about $8 to $9 a share {of BellSouth's stock price} wasn't being recognized by the marketplace," says Robert Morris II, a research vice president at Goldman, Sachs & Co. "Now, in essence, that will be valued by the marketplace."  In the two days since BellSouth and LIN announced their pact, BellSouth shares have risen 1 1/2, including yesterday's gain of 3/4 to 52.  Many analysts expect the stock to keep climbing in the months ahead, assuming the transaction goes through.  The regional Bell companies have had a tough time getting the Street to assign top dollar to their cellular holdings.  In an effort to spotlight these values, Denver-based U S West took public a piece of its cellular company, U S West NewVector.  Similarly, Pacific Telesis Group in San Francisco adopted a practice of disclosing operating results of its cellular division.  Now such companies are hoping some of BellSouth's new recognition will rub off on them.  "BellSouth found a clever way to increase its {cellular subscribers} and a vehicle to show the true value of its cellular properties," says Kenneth Leon, a telecommunications analyst with Bear Stearns.  Of course, a higher bid for LIN by McCaw Cellular Communications or another suitor could still derail the BellSouth agreement.  Some analysts suspect the proposed merger could spur McCaw to boost its unsolicited $110-a-share tender offer for the 90% of LIN it doesn't already own.  New York-based LIN finished at 108 1/2 yesterday, up 1 3/4.  If all goes according to plan, BellSouth also could stand to benefit from economies of scale and lower capital costs per cellular subscriber.  The reason: BellSouth and LIN plan to pool cellular resources and personnel.  Geoffrey Johnson, a cellular analyst with Argus Research Corp., estimates that within three years, the resulting savings should help BellSouth post annual earnings increases of about 10%, compared with this year's growth rate of about 7%.  But the ultimate payoff for BellSouth investors could be complete ownership of the new cellular-telephone company.  Under terms of the tax-free merger plan, BellSouth has the option to increase its proposed 50% stake to 75% during the first six years and eventually buy the entire company, giving it one of the largest cellular operations in the industry.  "That's where the real deal is," says Joel D. Gross, a vice president at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities.  Had BellSouth sought to acquire LIN for cash, Mr. Gross figures the company's earnings would have suffered 20% dilution in the first year and the cellular operation would have needed 10 years just to break even.  In contrast, he says, the plan to create a new cellular company "allows BellSouth to practically double its cellular {holdings} and eventually own the company with very little dilution."  Charles W. Schelke, of Smith Barney, Harris Upham, isn't so enthusiastic.  Mr. Schelke fears the company will use any excess cash to bolster its stake in the new cellular concern, instead of returning it to shareholders, perhaps in the form of higher dividends.  What's more, he contends, the transaction will lessen BellSouth's growth potential because in one sense, its cellular stake has been reduced.  Under terms of the merger, LIN contributes 18 million potential customers, while BellSouth provides 28 million.  Even though BellSouth's contribution is larger, Mr. Schelke says, BellSouth gets only a 50% stake in the company, which will have 46 million potential customers.  "Shareholders have just given up five million {potential customers} that I valued at about $1.3 billion," he reasons.  "I think BellSouth paid too much."  BellSouth obviously doesn't agree.  A spokeswoman for the company explains that LIN's properties are in markets with potential for faster growth.  ---  BellSouth  (NYSE; Symbol: BLS)  Business: Telephone service  Year Ended Dec. 31, 1988: Revenue: $13.60 billion  Net Income: $1.67 billion; $3.51 a share  Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 87 cents vs. 83 cents  Average daily trading volume:  452,895 shares  Common shares outstanding: 481.3 million  Tandy Corp. said it signed a letter of intent to buy the Victor microcomputer unit from Datatronic AB of Stockholm, giving Tandy an inroad into the European business-computer market.  The big electronics maker and retailer estimated the purchase price at $100 million to $200 million for the personal-computer unit and Datatronic's Micronic handheld computers, which together had 1988 sales of more than $200 million.  The purchase will give Tandy a well-known European computer brand that includes 2,700 dealers and distributors marketing to medium-sized businesses and educational institutions.  Tandy said the hand-held computer unit, which currently is a small part of the total business, also will help expand its Grid Systems division product line, which is aimed for use in field operations.  A Tandy spokesman said the company plans to build on Victor's distribution base by establishing manufacturing facilities in Europe before 1992, when trade rules change substantially.  Further, Tandy may make Victor computers in the U.S. and sell them to markets where it wouldn't sell its Tandy brand or Grid computers.  Currently, Tandy brand machines are sold almost exclusively through the company's Radio Shack stores.  Victor makes a variety of desktop and laptop computers that are compatible with International Business Machines Corp. computers.  Its sales are strongest in Scandinavian countries and France, although it has sales offices throughout Europe.  The Micronic line primarily is used for gathering data in the field.  The companies said the transaction is subject to approval by Tandy's board, Datatronics' board and shareholders and to regulatory clearance.  Tandy said it hopes to complete the transaction by Dec. 1.  Tandon Corp. said it retained Bear, Stearns & Co. to help the Moorpark, Calif., firm explore ways to maximize shareholder value.  The personal computer maker has had a string of quarterly losses, resulting in a 20% reduction of its U.S. work force earlier this year.  A spokesman said it is premature to discuss options available to the company.  In a statement, Tandon said Bear Stearns would assist the company in "identifying and analyzing strategic financial alternatives, on a world-wide basis, in order to maximize shareholder value."  The firm has been hurt by a variety of factors, including a cost-heavy inventory buildup.  In the first half, Tandon had a loss of $1.9 million on sales of $97.7 million.  Sea Containers Ltd. said it acquired a 53% stake in the Copacabana Palace Hotel in Rio de Janeiro.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Sea Containers, a Hamilton, Bermuda, shipping concern, is the object of a $63-a-share, or $963 million, tender offer by Stena Holding AG in Gothenburg, Sweden, and Tiphook PLC in London.  Sea Containers' president, James B. Sherwood, said discussions to acquire the hotel in Rio de Janeiro were under way before Stena and Tiphook made their bid.  Mr. Sherwood said development of Sea Containers' property and leisure interests couldn't be stopped pending the outcome of the tender offer, which he said involved legal issues that could take time to resolve.  Sea Containers said it expects to acquire the hotel's minority interests "before long," but didn't elaborate.  The hotel, which will be refurbished and expanded to 300 rooms from 220 currently, will be managed by Orient-Express Hotels Inc.  The House voted to exclude the U.S. Postal Service's operating funds from the federal budget.  The measure, passed on a 405-11 vote, would reduce the budget deficit for the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1 by $1.8 billion, according to the Congressional Budget Office.  The move is part of the deficit-reduction agreement reached by congressional leaders and the Bush administration in April.  The agreement also calls for an additional $1.1 billion in savings resulting from changes in the Postal Service's pension system.  The House-passed measure doesn't include the pension changes, which are expected to be incorporated in a larger deficit-reduction measure that Congress must pass by Oct. 15 to avert automatic, across-the-board spending cuts dictated by the Gramm-Rudman law.  Under current law, the Treasury keeps a revolving fund of the Postal Service's receipts and borrowings; any surplus in the fund reduces the deficit and shortages add to the deficit.  Alaska Air Group Inc., Seattle, said it plans to buy six MD-60 aircraft for $180 million from McDonnell Douglas Corp.  The planes are scheduled for delivery between December 1992 and March 1993 and represent the final purchase in a 19-plane expansion by the airline-holding company, whose units include Alaska Airlines and Horizon Air.  The 19-plane expansion, with the lease of an additional plane in 1990, will double Alaska Air Group's MD-60 fleet to 40.  Xtra Corp., Boston, said it plans to sell its railroad rolling stock fleet, consisting of about 4,200 units, to Chrysler Rail Transportation Corp. a subsidiary of Chrysler Corp., for about $85 million.  The transportation-leasing concern will receive about $47 million in cash and will enter into an agreement with Chrysler requiring payments of about $38 million over the next seven years.  The transaction is scheduled to close by Sept. 30 and is subject to a final agreement between the two companies.  The company also announced the sale of its warehousing operations.  Further details of the transaction weren't immediately available.  Xtra said the two transactions will result "in a slight pretax loss."  Company officials weren't immediately available to elaborate.  Xtra said it plans to use proceeds from the two transactions to reduce debt.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Xtra closed at $31.875, up 75 cents.  Sikes Corp. said a foreign company has broached the idea of acquiring Sikes for about $190 million to $200 million.  Sikes, a Lakeland, Fla., maker of ceramic tiles, said it had received an informal and unsolicited "expression of interest" from the foreign company, which it didn't identify.  Sikes said a possible per-share price wasn't specified.  Sikes said it has appointed a special committee to consider the matter and to begin preliminary discussions with the foreign company.  Sikes said there was no guarantee that the discussions would lead to its acquisition.  In composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, Sikes Class A stock fell 50 cents yesterday to close at $13.75.  A New York investor offered to acquire the shares outstanding of H.H. Robertson Corp. for $13 each, or an indicated value of about $82 million.  Douglas A. Kass, who has a 3.7% stake in the maker of steel roofs, storefronts and other building parts, said in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that he discussed his offer with the company.  However, the filing said that the company responded with a request for a written offer, which Mr. Kass hasn't yet provided.  Mr. Kass, president and sole shareholder of the New York investment firm of DAK Securities Corp., said he's still interested in making a $13-a-share offer, but declined to say when or if he would make a written, formal bid.  In spite of his interest in acquiring the company, Mr. Kass has reduced his stake in Robertson to 3.7% from 5.18% in April, selling 102,800 shares in July and August for $11.50 to $12.625 a share.  Gregory Drahuschak, an analyst with Butcher & Singer Inc., said the $13 price appears low given its slight premium to the stock's traded value.  He said a more reasonable offer would be in the upper teens.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Robertson closed at $12, up 12.5 cents.  Mr. Kass said that his offer was subject to due diligence and that a higher price would be considered if warranted and if financing is available.  He said he has talked to financial backers about financing, but wouldn't elaborate.  In April, Mr. Kass said he was interested in buying at least 40% of Robertson and was talking to other shareholders about boosting his stake.  Mr. Kass said he has been in contact with other holders but declined to say whether they backed his offer.  James R. Douglass, Robertson's executive vice president, confirmed having a telephone conversation with Mr. Kass, but said he couldn't comment on the SEC filing until he receives a copy.  Robertson's largest shareholder, with a 25% position, is First City Financial Corp., of Vancouver, British Columbia, which is controlled by the Belzberg family.  A spokesman for the family said he couldn't comment on the filing.  The Belzbergs began accumulating Robertson shares at prices as high as $44 in late 1983.  Since that time, the company has been hurt by a strike, management turnover and four years of losses from continuing operations.  However, Robertson has made some improvements in recent years and indicated that it may be profitable in 1989.  In the second quarter, the company earned $1 million, or 16 cents a share, on revenue of $123.3 million.  Arvin Industries Inc., Columbus, Ind., said it reached a standstill agreement with Ismanto Wanandi, who holds a stake of about 5.6%.  Mr. Wanandi, an Indonesian businessman, had said in an earlier Securities and Exchange Commission filing that he might seek to take control of the company.  Arvin, a military contractor and auto-parts manufacturer, responded with a lawsuit that alleged that the filing didn't adequately disclose his family's links to the Indonesian military.  Under the agreement, Arvin said, neither Mr. Wanandi nor any of his affiliates will take any steps toward acquiring Arvin or toward "influencing, controlling or disrupting the management and direction" of the company.  Under the pact, Mr. Wanandi is "free to remain a passive and supportive shareholder of Arvin," the company said.  EAST BERLIN DEMANDED that Hungary halt a mass migration of refugees.  As thousands of East Germans crowded resettlement camps in West Germany, the Communist government of East Germany issued a sharp formal protest to Warsaw Pact ally Hungary for permitting this week's mass exodus.  It said Budapest had "unilaterally suspended" agreements regulating travel across borders.  The move came amid indications that East Berlin had begun clamping down on trips to Hungary.  More than 10,000 East Germans have fled to the West since early Monday.  Officials in Budapest said thousands of refugees continued arriving in Hungary, and authorities expected the flood of emigres to exceed 15,000.  ---  POLAND INSTALLED the East bloc's only non-Communist government.  Lawmakers in Warsaw approved Prime Minister Mazowiecki's cabinet after the Solidarity official urged the Parliament to change almost every aspect of Polish life.  The vote was 402 in favor of Mazowiecki's 22-member cabinet, none against and 13 abstentions.  Apart from the prime minister, who called for immediate action to improve Poland's economy, there are 11 Solidarity representatives.  The Communists have four posts, including the defense and interior ministries.  The U.S. pledged support for the new government in Warsaw, and the Soviet Union said it was prepared to "develop our relations with Poland."  ---  U.S. anti-drug officials said four Colombian groups control wholesale cocaine trafficking in the U.S. and are moving toward global operations.  Separately, portions of Bush's anti-drug initiative won backing within a Senate panel, but divisions remain over what share of spending can come from defense cuts.  Bush addressed millions of schoolchildren, saying that refusing drugs "won't make you a nerd."  The president, in the televised appeal, also urged youngsters to help others stay away from narcotics.  ---  Bush met at the White House with Yeltsin and told the Soviet official that the U.S. enjoys a "very positive relationship" with Gorbachev.  Yeltsin, an outspoken critic of some of the Soviet leader's policies, urged Bush to help "rescue" Gorbachev's political and economic restructuring program.  Yeltsin is on a two-week tour of the U.S.  ---  The House approved a statute designed to circumvent a Supreme Court ruling and restore criminal penalties for burning the U.S. flag as a political protest.  The bill was passed 380-38.  Action on a constitutional amendment barring flag desecration is expected this year.  ---  New York Democrats dealt Mayor Koch a defeat, voting for Manhattan Borough President Dinkins in the city's primary election, according to projections.  Ex-U.S. attorney Giuliani easily won the GOP primary.  In Fort Worth, Texas, Democrat Geren won the race to succeed former House Speaker Wright.  ---  Police in Namibia said a gunman assassinated Anton Lubowski, the only white to hold a leadership post in the South-West African People's Organization guerrilla movement.  The 37-year-old Lubowski, a lawyer, had been considered as a possible choice for justice minister when Namibia becomes independent from South Africa next year.  ---  The House Ethics Committee voted to conduct a preliminary inquiry of Democratic Rep. Frank of Massachusetts, who has acknowledged employing a male prostitute as a personal aide after initially hiring him for sex.  Frank welcomed the panel's action and pledged to "cooperate fully."  ---  Senate panels rejected any new procurement funding for the Navy's Trident D-5 missile.  The appropriations subcommittees also cut all of Bush's request to continue development of a national aerospace plane in fiscal 1990.  ---  The Smithsonian Institution agreed to return the remains of native Americans to their tribes for burial.  The accord reverses a longstanding museum policy that made return of Indian remains rare.  The agreement was added to a bill before the House that would establish a National Museum of the American Indian in Washington.  ---  The White House plans to propose to Congress that the U.S. accept 50,000 Soviet refugees next year, plus 6,500 more from Eastern Europe, a U.S. official said.  Overall, 125,000 refugees would be admitted, an increase of less than 8% from this year.  ---  Salvadoran peace talks opened in Mexico City, the first such meeting between the rebels and President Cristiani's government.  Officials expressed doubt that the two sides could end the 10-year-old civil war.  ---  Tens of thousands of people staged a rally in Hong Kong to mark the 100th day of China's suppression of the pro-democracy student movement.  Several leaders of the protests last spring who escaped Beijing's crackdown addressed the crowd.  Similar rallies were held in London, Taiwan and Macao.  New York Democrats dumped noisy, colorful Edward Koch, the nation's best-known mayor, for a quiet, unassuming black man, David Dinkins, in a hotly contested, racially divisive primary, according to analyses by TV networks.  Mr. Dinkins, the 62-year-old Manhattan borough president, will face Rudolph Giuliani, 45-year-old crime-buster, in the Nov. 7 general election, which observers expect to be a close contest.  Mr. Giuliani, the former U.S. attorney in Manhattan, easily defeated big-spending Ronald Lauder, heir to a cosmetics fortune, in the Republican primary.  The NBC, ABC and CBS outlets projected Mr. Dinkins as the winner shortly after the polls closed at 9 p.m. Mr. Giuliani, the TV stations said, would easily defeat Mr. Lauder.  Mr. Dinkins won almost all of the black vote, in what was a good but not a spectacular turnout.  He won the contest by picking up as much as one-third of the white vote, most of them young, liberal voters, according to Newsday/WNBC exit polls.  They were seen as voting strictly against Mr. Koch.  Meanwhile, in Fort Worth, Texas, in a special election to choose a successor for former House Speaker James Wright, Democrat Pete Geren narrowly defeated Republican Bob Lanier 51% to 49%.  And in Detroit, in a 13-candidate, nonpartisan primary, Mayor Coleman Young easily outpolled the rest of the field.  His opponent in a November runoff will be accountant Tom Barrow, who finished ahead of U.S. Rep. John Conyers.  For the 64-year-old Mr. Koch, it was the end of a 12-year roller-coaster ride as the chief executive of the nation's biggest and most cantankerous city.  For years, he cried out to crowds, "How'm I doing?" and for years, the crowds responded, "Just fine."  But yesterday, voters worried about mounting racial tensions, the decline of the city's schools, mounting drug-related crime and widespread homelessness and said "enough."  Mr. Koch ruled the city triumphantly in his first two terms, becoming the embodiment of the Big Apple's rambunctious way of life.  He pulled the city through a financial crisis and presided over a downtown economic boom.  But, starting in his third term, the good times began to unravel, as one by one many of Mr. Koch's closest political allies were indicted for bribery and extortion, and as the city became to many of its residents a meaner and tougher place in which to live.  Last night, Mr. Koch stood almost alone, deserted by the city's labor movement, spurned by most party professionals, roundly condemned by 90% or more of the city's black population.  He was supported, in the end, by conservative white Catholics and by Jews who worried about Mr. Dinkins's connections to black leaders like Jesse Jackson and Al Sharpton, who they feared might be anti-Semitic.  The primary was played out against the backdrop of two highly publicized incidents -- the rape of a white woman jogger by black youths in Central Park in April and the killing of a black youth by whites last month in Brooklyn.  Mr. Koch was seeking to become the city's first four-term mayor.  If Mr. Dinkins is elected in November, he would become New York's first black mayor.  AMR Eagle Inc., the commuter airline unit of AMR Corp., said it will acquire Executive Air Holdings Inc., which operates commuter flights in the Caribbean.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Executive Air, based in St. Croix, was founded in 1980 as a charter company.  It currently flies 125 daily flights under the AMR Eagle logo, feeding passenger traffic to another AMR unit, American Airlines, through American's San Juan hub.  Separately, AMR said it issued a notice of redemption for 200,000 warrants outstanding first issued in 1986 to buy common stock.  Each warrant may be exercised until Oct. 12 for 16.19 shares of AMR common for $61.766 for each share.  The price may be paid in cash or by tendering 6.25% subordinated debt of American Airlines due March 1, 1996.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, AMR common closed at $82.75, down $1.  If the warrants aren't exercised by Oct. 12, they will be redeemed at $43.75 each.  Coffee futures prices plunged more than six cents a pound on indications that the U.S. won't press for the restoration of global quotas on exports of green coffee.  The heavily traded December contract fell 6.62 cents a pound to 80.03 cents.  The soonest-to-expire September delivery was off 6.68 cents to 81.40 cents.  All other contracts were down their daily permissible limit of six cents a pound.  Since Sept. 4, when Colombian President Virgilio Barco wrote a letter to President Bush appealing for help in restoring the important quota and price provisions of the International Coffee Agreement, there has been hope that the U.S. might respond favorably.  The current strong relations the two nations have right now in fighting the Colombian drug cartel helped buoy these hopes, analysts said.  As a result, the December contract, for example, rose about 10 cents a pound between mid-August and early September.  "Now, the feeling is that there won't be a prompt restoration of the export quotas," said Arthur Stevenson, an analyst for Prudential-Bache Securities, New York.  President Barco's letter estimated the loss to Colombia at $400 million a year because of the decline of coffee prices since the suspension of coffee quotas in July.  The letter reportedly stated that the loss of coffee income was making the war on cocaine more difficult.  "If no action is taken, {coffee} prices will fall even further," according to the National Coffee Association, an industry organization.  News reports circulated that President Bush, in his expected reply to President Barco, will praise Colombia for its fight against drugs and express a willingness to continue talks on the International Coffee Agreement if there is a prospect that the problems the U.S. has with the pact can be corrected, analysts said.  These problems are a two-tier export market, in which there have been sales of coffee to countries that aren't members of the agreement at prices as much as 50% below what member consuming countries were paying, and a rigidity of quotas that has prevented increased shipments of higher-quality, milder coffees to meet rising demand.  However, the news reports said, President Bush is expected to indicate he won't push for a return to the agreement as it existed before July, according to analysts.  Analysts said there have been growing signs that President Bush wouldn't acquiesce to President Barco's request.  They noted that U.S. Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter last week said that Colombia would probably be better off without an international coffee agreement over a 20-or-30-year period, although he didn't say how.  Sen. Richard Luger (R., Ind.), a senior member of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, stated that he blamed Brazil and Colombia for the breakup of the coffee pact, analysts said.  They also cited a news report that said U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills in Paris said Colombia should be helped to develop alternative crops so its farmers would be encouraged to stop growing cocaine.  Analysts interpreted these comments as meaning the U.S. wasn't likely to support restoration of the rescinded economic provisions of the coffee agreement, the analysts said.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Although spot prices of North Sea crudes rose 10 cents to 20 cents a barrel in European markets, futures prices of the U.S. benchmark crude fell in relatively light trading.  On the New York Mercantile Exchange, West Texas Intermediate crude for October delivery declined six cents to settle at $19.70 a barrel.  There was little news to account for the drop, although statistics on U.S. oil inventories reported by the American Petroleum Institute were considered moderately bearish.  The figures, released after the close of trading, showed increases in U.S. oil inventories for the latest week.  Petroleum products also were weaker in futures trading, with unleaded gasoline for October delivery down fractionally at 56.89 cents a gallon.  Strength in the U.S. gasoline market had helped support crude prices in recent days.  Oil prices improved moderately but briefly on the basis of an interview with Indonesia's oil minister by Dow Jones International Petroleum Report.  The Indonesian official, Ginandjar Kartasasmita, held out the possibility that the Sept. 23 meeting of OPEC's ministerial monitoring committee still could result in a rise in the production ceiling to 20 million barrels a day from 19.5 million.  But he predicted the meeting is unlikely to result in any formal changes in policy of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  SUGAR: Futures prices rose on news that the U.S. had increased its sugar import quota.  Traders bought contracts because the move would draw supplies from the world market, in which supplies and demand are in close balance at the moment, an analyst said.  The October contract advanced 0.52 cent a pound to 13.95 cents.  Agriculture Secretary Yeutter announced that the import quota for sugar was increased by slightly more than 860,000 metric tons, or about 950,000 short tons, to 1,986,950 metric tons.  A metric ton is equal to 1.1 U.S. short tons, or 2,204.6 pounds.  He also announced that the 1989 quota period is extended by nine months covering the period from Jan. 1, 1989, through Sept. 30, 1990.  "This change puts quota shipments for the new 21-month quota period at a somewhat higher level on a 12-month equivalent basis than the previously announced quota of 1,125,000 metric tons," he said.  While the announcement created an immediate surge in futures prices, analysts through the day came up with varying estimates of how much sugar imports would actually change as a result.  One calculated that imports on a monthly basis would actually be slightly lower, while another said they would be slightly higher.  Analysts agreed that the discrepancies resulted from different methods of computation and an incomplete understanding of the government's action.  One analyst said the futures market response was so sharp because "with the somewhat tight supply situation, the world market is sensitive to any sign" that unsold supplies would be reduced.  Another analyst said the quota was increased because domestic prices had risen strongly and there was the possibility that industrial sugar users could face a shortage of the sweetener.  COPPER: Futures prices were slightly higher as labor problems continued in some producing areas.  The December contract rose 0.10 cent a pound to $1.2570.  Negotiations in the Highland Valley mine strike in British Columbia, which began July 8, aren't much closer to settlement, an analyst said.  News reports said the president of the company commented that the negotiations weren't making much progress, and the chief negotiator for the company was quoted as saying both sides are still far apart on an agreement, the analyst said.  The company negotiator was also reported to have said that if an agreement isn't reached this week, the talks might be recessed indefinitely, according to the analyst.  In Chile, labor leaders were reportedly getting together to discuss a new strategy concerning the strike at the El Salvador mine, the analyst said, but he added that an agreement could follow soon.  The recent vote among miners not to return to work was very close, he said.  Chairman Dan Rostenkowski of the House Ways and Means Committee, reversing his previous stand, said he supports repealing the tax law that compels companies to give their top executives and rank-and-file workers comparable fringe benefits.  The switch by the Illinois Democrat, who is the top tax-writer in the House, gives the many business and labor forces that have been fighting for repeal of the law a much-improved chance of success this year.  The employee-benefits rule, known as Section 89, was a little-noticed provision of the mammoth tax-overhaul legislation enacted in 1986, but it since has become one of the most controversial sections of the tax code.  Designed to encourage employers to give rank-and-file workers the same benefits that the top brass get, it says tax-free fringe benefits should be taxable unless they are available to most lower-paid employees.  Section 89 requires companies to do complicated tests of their benefit plans to determine whether they discriminated against lower-paid employees.  Both business and labor groups complained that the requirements of the provision were too complex, and businesses claimed they would have to pay large sums to consultants, accountants and attorneys to understand the mechanics of the law.  Small businesses, in particular, complained the testing process and fines for violating the law would be extremely costly, and many said it would force businesses to stop offering health insurance.  After consulting with small-business trade associations yesterday, Rep. Rostenkowski said in a statement, "I have come to the conclusion that Section 89 should be repealed."  He added, however, that he would support a proposal by Rep. Byron Dorgan (D., N.D.) that would continue to impose non-discrimination rules on the health plans of "executive only" and professional service organizations.  In a separate issue that affects small businesses, Mr. Rostenkowski said he would reverse another earlier stand and support the extension of the 25% deduction for health insurance plans purchased by the self-employed.  Previously, he had omitted extension of that tax benefit from his tax proposals -- a position that representatives of small businesses complained he took largely to punish them for continuing to fight against him to repeal Section 89.  Rep. Rostenkowski earlier had sponsored proposals that would have severely curtailed Section 89.  But labor and business groups continued to wage a strong campaign to repeal the law altogether.  "I think he's trying to put an issue to rest and move a package out of the House and Senate and get on with the tax bill," said John Paul Galles, president of the National Small Business United, a lobby group.  "There was still tremendous misunderstanding of what Section 89 was intended to do and how it would be applied."  John Satagaj, executive director of the Small Business Legislative Council, said he believes Mr. Rostenkowski simply decided that the revisions of Section 89 wouldn't solve the problem he was trying to address: discrimination arising when a company offers special fringe benefit plans to highly paid employees but not to most of its workers.  ---  Jeanne Saddler contributed to this article.  Datapoint Corp. Chairman Asher B. Edelman said he purchased 30% of the company's stock over two days, apparently in an attempt to prevent a shareholder from trying to oust Mr. Edelman and the company's board.  But while the purchases give Mr. Edelman a 40% stake in Datapoint, a computer products maker, his detractor isn't discouraged.  New York lawyer Martin Ackerman, who last week began a consent solicitation to replace Mr. Edelman and six directors with his five nominees, said, "I'm not giving up.  We're going forward."  In an interview from his Paris home, Mr. Edelman said he bought about three million shares through Bear, Stearns & Co. on Monday and yesterday at prices of around $6 a share.  He wouldn't comment on the reason for the move, saying he can't yet elaborate on the purchases because of securities regulations.  Datapoint is preparing a document to challenge the consent solicitation.  Mr. Edelman didn't say where the funds for the purchases came from, but he said, "It wasn't a problem."  He also declined to comment on who sold their stakes to him.  Mr. Ackerman, whose group owns about 4.6% of Datapoint's approximately 10 million shares outstanding, accused Mr. Edelman of "going out and trying to buy votes" to block the consent solicitation.  Mr. Ackerman has two months to get holders of more than half of Datapoint's shares to support his slate of five new directors.  Mr. Ackerman also charged that Mr. Edelman offered a premium to shareholders who would sell their proxies along with their shares, and the lawyer said he is considering a legal challenge to those purchases, among other options.  It wasn't clear whether Mr. Edelman will be able to vote his new shares.  Mr. Ackerman said he set a record date of Sept. 7 for his solicitation.  But a Datapoint lawyer said last week that the company's bylaws allow the board to set the record date.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Datapoint fell 50 cents to close at $5.375 a share on volume of about 2.7 million shares.  Newmark & Lewis Inc. said it reported a 5.4% increase in earnings for its second quarter ended July 31, despite a cool and rainy summer.  The company, a retailing chain of consumer electronics and appliances with stores in New York, Connecticut and Massachusetts, said net income rose to $1,426,000, or 23 cents a share, from $1,353,000, or 22 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 5.8%, to $69.2 million from $65.3 million.  Warren Hyman, chairman of the Hicksville, N.Y., concern said the company was pleased with the results.  Mr. Hyman said air conditioner sales were up in the second quarter despite the relatively cool and rainy summer.  He said the quarter was affected by "something that was beyond our control -- the weather," and noted that last summer was one of the hottest on record.  The Treasury plans to pay down about $4.63 billion on the federal debt with the sale on Monday of about $14.4 billion in short-term bills.  Maturing bills outstanding total $19.03 billion.  The offering, which will be divided evenly between 13-week and 26-week bills, will be dated Sept. 21 and mature Dec. 21 and March 22, 1990, respectively.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum $10,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT on Monday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  A group including Gabelli Group Inc. and Gamco Investors Inc., both New York investment concerns, said it boosted its stake in Lincoln Telecommunications Co. to 9.7% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the group said it holds 800,104 Lincoln common shares, including net purchases of 86,404 Aug. 9 to Sept. 8 for $59.93 to $69 each.  Officials of the Lincoln, Neb., company couldn't immediately be reached.  But Lincoln's board last week tightened the company's anti-takeover provisions, citing the Gabelli Group's "continued accumulation," of its shares, and calling the buildup "potentially disruptive."  The Sacramento, Calif., Municipal Utility District, owner of the troubled Rancho Seco nuclear power plant, rejected a bid from a partnership led by Quadrex Corp. to buy the plant.  The district said it was concerned about the partnership's ability to buy and operate the 15-year-old plant, which has had a series of operating and management problems.  Quadrex, a Campbell, Calif., provider of services and equipment for the nuclear industry, said it doesn't plan to pursue the bidding.  The concern offered $50 million and said it would establish a $130 million reserve to help defray the utility's cost of decommissioning the plant.  After a refusal to make the plant ready for operation, Quadrex said, it reduced its offer to $25 million.  A district spokesman said the district may consider other bids for the plant.  DD Acquisition Corp. said Dunkin' Donuts Inc. agreed to give it confidential financial and operating information that could pave the way for merger discussions following DD Acquisition's long and hostile courtship of the doughnut-shop franchiser.  Monday, Dunkin' Donuts, based in Randolph, Mass., rejected DD Acquisition's $45-a-share, or $268 million, offer as "inadequate".  The company instructed Goldman, Sachs & Co., its financial adviser, to explore ways to maximize shareholder value, including its possible acquisition.  DD Acquisition is jointly owned by Unicorp Canada Corp. and Cara Operations Ltd., both of Toronto.  Cara Operations is a food-services franchiser.  Unicorp Canada controls operations in the gas utility, merchant banking and financial-services industries.  Earl Rotman, president of Kingsbridge Capital Group, the merchant banking arm of Unicorp Canada, said: "We look forward to sitting down with the management and board of Dunkin' Donuts to engage in friendly merger discussions, which has always been our objective."  Under the confidentiality agreement, DD Acquisition said it will extend its $45-a-share offer to Oct. 2 from Friday and intends to extend the offer every few weeks to ensure that it doesn't expire before Nov. 1.  It said it won't take up any additional Dunkin' Donut common shares other than under its tender offer before Nov. 1.  The agreement is conditional on various factors, including there not being a competing tender offer that would expire before Nov. 1, DD Acquisition said.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Dunkin' Donuts rose 12.5 cents to close at $45.375.  At the close of business yesterday, 1,488,244 common shares of Dunkin' Donuts had been tendered under the offer, representing about 25.9% of Dunkin' Donuts shares, the Canadian company said.  Together with 15% already held by Unicorp, DD Acquisition has 40.9% of the common shares, or about 34.3% on a fully diluted basis.  For the 39 weeks ended July 29, Dunkin' Donuts, which has about 1,455 retail outlets, posted net income of $7.6 million, or $1.08 a share, on revenue of $89.7 million.  First Executive Corp. said I.C.H. Corp., which holds a 20% stake in the company, has indicated it may sell the rights it receives as part of First Executive's current rights offering.  The rights package, which was announced in July, has been termed a defensive move by some analysts.  The rights became effective on Monday and began trading over the counter yesterday.  I.C.H. officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Last month, I.C.H. said it may explore the possible sale of its First Executive stake.  I.C.H., based in Louisville, Ky., also said it believes the rights package represents a violation of a standstill pact between the two insurance holding concerns.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing in August, I.C.H. said it may consider buying additional First Executive shares, but may also consider selling its stake in part because of a recent drop in First Executive's stock price.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, First Executive shares closed at $12, down 37.5 cents.  First Executive said I.C.H. asked to be included in the registration statement First Executive filed with the SEC for the rights offering in order to be able to sell its rights.  The rights package calls for First Executive shareholders to get one right for every five shares of common stock.  The rights would entitle the holder to buy for $15 a package of securities including one depositary share of a new convertible preferred stock and two warrants, each for the purchase of half a share of common stock.  On Monday, the company said the price of the warrants won't be less than $12.75 a share or more than $15 a share.  President Bush nominated William Tattersall to be assistant secretary of labor in charge of the Mine Safety and Health Administration.  Mr. Tattersall has been deputy secretary general of the International Iron and Steel Institute in Brussels since 1979, serving as the U.S. steel industry representative.  Previously, the nominee worked 23 years for Bethlehem Steel Corp., including labor counsel and assistant to the vice president for mining, and senior labor attorney in the industrial relations department.  Mr. Tattersall was labor counsel for the coal industry's wage negotiations with the United Mine Workers from 1970 through 1973, a steel industry bargaining spokesman in 1974, and has been executive vice president of the Bituminous Coal Operators Association.  National Semiconductor Corp., hurt by the continuing slump in demand for semiconductors and pricing pressure, posted a fiscal first-quarter loss of $21.9 million.  The maker of semiconductor chips said the loss was in line with estimates by industry analysts, who have endorsed the company's year-long restructuring efforts to cut costs by trimming the work force and closing plants, among other things.  In the year-earlier quarter, the company had profit from continuing operations of $13.6 million.  A $44.1 million loss from discontinued operations resulted in a net loss of $30.5 million.  Revenue for the quarter ended Aug. 27 fell 11% to $397.6 million from $444.9 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, National Semiconductor closed at $7.50 a share, up 25 cents.  The company's results also were affected by the traditionally slow summer months, analysts said, but the biggest reason continues to be a slowdown in chip purchases by volume buyers.  Economic jitters have big chip buyers in the computer, auto and military industries holding back on new purchases and keeping their own inventories to a minimum.  The nearly flat chip sales, together with falling prices, are producing lower profits and losses at several semiconductor makers.  At National Semiconductor, slack demand in the quarter pressured prices on certain products, including the company's EPROMs, a memory device, and its standard logic product, a volume chip.  Although the company has moved in several areas to control costs, some analysts wonder whether the effort is enough to boost the company's earnings in the intermediate term.  Richard L. Whittington, a semiconductor analyst at Kidder, Peabody & Co., is pessimistic about the company's performance and has said he believes it will have trouble breaking even for the fiscal year ending next May.  The analyst has adopted a wait-and-see attitude toward the company, which said it expects to be profitable in the second quarter.  For fiscal 1989, the company had a net loss of $23.2 million on sales of $1.6 billion.  Siemens AG will receive a bigger chunk of U.K's Plessey Co. than its takeover partner, General Electric Co. of Britain, a top Siemens executive told a West German daily newspaper.  In an interview, to be published today in Die Welt, Karl-Hermann Baumann, finance chief of West Germany's electronics and electricals group, said that, as a result of the finally successful takeover, Siemens will end up owning or having a great impact on more parts of Plessey, the defense and electronics company, than Britain's General Electric.  That company isn't related to the U.S. concern.  Some sectors, such as radar systems and transportation technology, will go exclusively to Siemens, Mr. Baumann said.  In others, such as GPT, a former joint venture between General Electric and Plessey, Siemens will have a 40% stake.  Mr. Baumann wouldn't provide more detailed data on the cost of Plessey's purchase to Siemens, saying only the West German company "financially was heavier involved than" General Electric.  Vitro S.A. said it wouldn't rule out the possibility of lowering its $20-a-share tender offer for Anchor Glass Container Corp.  Vitro, a Monterrey, Mexico-based conglomerate, reiterated in a letter to Anchor's board that there are no "superior alternatives" to its $251.4 million offer, which Anchor rejected in late August.  At the time, Anchor, a maker of bottles and other glass containers based in Tampa, Fla., said it had held preliminary talks with third parties about a possible transaction.  In the letter to Anchor, Ernesto Martens, Vitro's president and chief executive officer, also said that Anchor's advisers had offered to provide Vitro with confidential information that Anchor has provided to third parties on the condition that Vitro not lower its bid.  Mr. Martens said Vitro wasn't prepared to agree to that condition.  He said: "Apparently Anchor is concerned that the information it is offering to provide will give Vitro a basis for lowering the price.  Indeed, the actions taken by Anchor give Vitro a basis" to lower the bid.  A spokesman for Anchor would say only that attorneys from both sides are discussing the possibility of providing Vitro with the information that Anchor has provided to third parties "while upholding adequate safeguards for both companies."  The spokesman added that the information wouldn't justify "in any way whatsoever a price below Vitro's $20-a-share bid."  The conditions were ripe for a regulatory disaster at the Food and Drug Administration.  The agency, which regulates a hefty 25% of the nation's consumer economy -- from kumquats to cosmetics -- has been lurching from one crisis to another in recent years, trying to meet mounting demands with a shrinking staff.  There were product tamperings to contend with, a blood-bank emergency triggered by fears of AIDS contamination, a panic over cyanide-laced grapes from Chile and ever-increasing pressure to speed new life-saving drugs through the approval process.  So it was that disaster followed.  In the last two months, a drumbeat of disclosures has revealed a widening scandal involving the agency's generic drug program -- a five-year effort to bring to market cheap alternatives to brand-name drugs.  Three FDA employees already have pleaded guilty to taking illegal gratuities from generic-drug makers.  Two generics companies have admitted duping the agency with falsified data.  And the FDA has found manufacturing and record-keeping problems at nearly all of the 12 generic-drug makers it has investigated so far.  "I would hang them if I could," says FDA Commissioner Frank Young.  But the generic-drug scandal, unlike the grape scare or the epidemic of acquired immune deficiency syndrome, is a crisis largely of the FDA's own making -- and a crisis in which many feel Dr. Young played a prominent role.  "He was in his own world, whether it was chasing grapes or problems concerning Social Security programs," contends Roy McKnight of Pittsburgh-based Mylan Laboratories Inc., a generic-drug maker.  It was Mylan's complaints about the FDA's generic-drug practices that spurred investigations of the agency by the House Energy and Commerce Committee's investigative panel and the U.S. attorney in Baltimore.  And it was these investigations that brought to light the FDA's raft of troubles.  There were policy issues, too, that led to the scandal.  The FDA's current problems are a legacy of the Reagan administration's push to deregulate.  By scaling back their enforcement actions while publicly embracing the generic-drug industry as a "partner" rather than an adversary, the FDA created "an atmosphere of lawlessness," says Sidney Wolfe, head of the Public Citizen Health Research Group.  "It isn't surprising that the generics companies pulled these shenanigans."  Some notable shortcomings within the agency aided in the scandal.  Five years after Congress ordered the FDA to speed the approval of generic drugs -- as part of the 1984 Waxman-Hatch Act -- the agency has yet to issue specific rules for the process.  Indeed, officials are still soliciting public comments on the proposed package of regulations.  In the meantime, the agency has been operating under guidelines that have fostered arbitrary, case-by-case decisions on generic-drug applications, creating opportunities for favoritism and fraud.  Petty internal squabbles have worsened things.  FDA policy forbids the approval of a new generic drug if inspectors have found manufacturing problems at the drug company's plant.  Yet officials in the plant-inspection office have refused to provide inspection reports to other FDA officials reviewing new-drug applications; instead, the new-drug department has had to file for the reports under the Freedom of Information Act -- an almost unheard of practice.  And when the documents were turned over, much of the information had been blanked out.  The generic-drug division is also severely prone to losing paper work -- so much so that some industry officials fear they are the victims of deliberate sabotage.  For instance, the disappearance of documents filed by Biocraft Laboratories Inc. delayed a new-drug application by that company for at least a year.  Internal investigators from the Health and Human Services Department, of which the FDA is a part, are looking into the possibility that an FDA drug reviewer intentionally mislaid the documents as a favor to a rival company.  After presiding over, from a regulatory standpoint, the rise of generic drugs from a cottage industry to a multibillion-dollar business, Dr. Young generally defends his agency's actions.  But he admits that the scandal may devastate the industry he befriended: "There's a real possibility that the generic-drug industry may be totally discredited," he says.  That, in turn, would deal a severe blow to the government's efforts to bring down health costs with generics.  Specific generic-drug regulations still haven't been issued, leading one senior FDA official to conclude: "If we find out many more things that are wrong, we will have to reevaluate" the agency's pending generic drug regulations.  The generic-drug scandal is far from the only problem plaguing the agency.  Consumer advocates complain that food safety -- in particular, the growing problem of bacterial food poisoning -- has been given short shrift.  The FDA inspects only a dribble of the swelling tide of food imported into the U.S. Critics fault the agency for relying too heavily on state authorities to ensure the safety of shellfish and milk supplies.  At the same time, the agency is being faulted for not cracking down on medical-device manufacturers for failing to report malfunctions that result in deaths and injuries.  Some manufacturers see disturbing parallels between regulation of this area and the generic-drug mess.  In a lawsuit, closely held Clark Research & Development Inc., which makes dialysis-related devices, accuses the agency of losing documents and of pursuing a "pattern of harassment" after Clark complained about a competitor being allowed to make misleading claims.  "We want that company subject to the same regulations we're subject to," says Michael Pearl, a Clark officer.  "We want a level playing field."  The FDA's defenders, while not playing down the seriousness of such allegations, say the current controversy obscures the agency's positive accomplishments.  "Don't focus on the glitches that occur periodically," says Sanford Miller, a former FDA official, who is dean of the University of Texas Graduate School of Biomedical Sciences.  "Take a look at the overall health of the American people.  "Doing everything people want the FDA to do would require an FDA the size of the Defense Department," he says.  But over the last decade the agency has instead shrunk -- to 7,400 employees from 8,100.  The Bush administration is seeking a budget authorization of $570 million for the next fiscal year, a 5% increase.  Although some AIDS activists depict him as an uncaring paymaster of a sluggish bureaucracy, Dr. Young insists he has made new drugs for the desperately ill a top priority: The average time to approve such critical drugs is 4.2 years; the average for most other drugs is 7.8 years.  The FDA approved an anti-viral drug, AZT, in 107 days -- a record.  The new medication slows the progression of AIDS in individuals showing early symptoms.  The generics scandal, in Dr. Young's view, is the fault of an unrealistic Congress, which five years ago saw generics as a way of reducing prescription-drug costs for constituents.  The Waxman-Hatch Act generated thousands of applications to market generic duplicates of brand-name drugs on which 17-year patents had expired.  The law spared companies the cost of time-consuming clinical tests to prove the safety and effectiveness of their copycat products.  Instead, the companies merely had to show the FDA that their products were "bio-equivalent" to the brand-names they mimicked -- that they performed in the bloodstream in about the same way.  As patents expired, companies scrambled to be the first to win FDA approval for their products.  Typically, the first on the market could count on capturing a lucrative share of total sales by undercutting the brand-name price.  In view of the high stakes -- and the FDA's practice of accepting bio-equivalency test results on faith -- the scandal shouldn't have caught the agency completely off-guard.  As early as December 1985, middle management at the FDA began receiving reports of drug reviewers favoring one company over others in return for "some quid pro quo," according to a Congressional investigation.  There was even a tip telephoned to the FDA about a romantic entanglement between an agency drug reviewer and a woman executive from a drug company that was seeking his approval of its product.  The tip wasn't acted on.  At the very least, critics say, officials should have been suspicious of the phenomenal success of two small generic-drug makers in beating their competitors to market.  Par Pharmaceutical Inc. and its Quad Pharmaceuticals Inc. subsidiary received a stunning 77 drug approvals in 1986, almost twice as many as any other company.  The companies pleaded guilty earlier this year to dispensing illicit gratuities to speed their drug applications through the FDA bureaucracy.  In time, other companies complained about bureaucrats deviating from the FDA's first-come, first-served policy on new generic-drug applications.  The FDA "engages in nothing short of market manipulation" as it decides on applications, H. Lawrence Fox, an attorney for Barr Laboratories Inc., asserted in Congressional testimony, adding: "The FDA has told us, "We screwed you on this one, so we'll take care of you on the next one."  The untimely disappearance and destruction of documents at the FDA further fueled suspicions of favoritism.  At the same hearing, a Congressional panel embarrassed the FDA by producing the original copy of a generic-drug application that had been found, torn in half, in the trash of Charles Y. Chang, a former FDA branch chief, who pleaded guilty in a federal court in Baltimore to two counts of interstate travel in aid of racketeering.  Specifically, the charges involve his accepting a paid, round-the-world trip totaling more than $3,000 that a drug industry consultant offered him at the direction of the president of American Therapeutics Inc., a generics maker based in Bohemia, N.Y.  The president of American Therapeutics also purchased furniture and computer equipment for Mr. Chang totaling almost $8,000.  In return, Mr. Chang allegedly took steps to get American Therapeutics drug applications through the process more quickly by assigning the applications to speedy reviewers, among other things.  Neither American Therapeutics nor its officers have been charged with a crime.  The company denies any wrongdoing.  Harold Snyder, chief executive officer of Biocraft, says he "went into orbit" when he learned that part of his company's application had been mysteriously misplaced.  "They lose samples, they lose this, and they lose that," he says.  But out of fear of retaliation, Mr. Snyder won't accuse the agency of playing favorites.  Taking most of the flak for the agency's failings is Dr. Young, a Bible-quoting biotechnology specialist who previously served as dean of the University of Rochester medical school.  Many in industry doubt that he will survive the scandal as head of the FDA.  One view is that the 58-year-old Dr. Young is exhausted after five years in the job and about to resign.  The other is that his ouster is imminent.  But Dr. Young, seemingly upbeat, says he "has the best job in town," while administration insiders say he still has the confidence of the White House and Health and Human Services Secretary Louis Sullivan.  There are doubts, too, whether Dr. Young is tough enough for the battle ahead.  Says one industry executive: "He's not a street fighter; he's a pussy cat."  But Dr. Young, decked out in the summer whites of the U.S. Public Health Service's officer corps, aggressively defends his agency's performance.  "Here you've got an industry," he says, "that would stoop to giving gratuities to federal employees, that would stoop to falsifying data and submitting false data to the FDA.  "Could we have designed the system (to catch) that?  Yes, we could have."  But, he adds, "What was Congress telling us to do? 'We need to get generic drugs on the market.  We're going to give you four months, agency, to get your act in order.'" The solution: to use "the procedures that were tried and true in the past."  Although there is no evidence yet that shoddily made generic drugs have gravely injured anyone, Dr. Young vows that within three months he will be able to conclusively answer every consumer's question: "Doc, are the drugs safe and do they work?"  FDA officials are conducting top-to-bottom inspections at more than 30 generic-drug makers, and scrutinizing the paper work and pre-marketing test results on some 200 generic drugs to see if there are more instances of companies falsifying data and, as was the case with some companies, substituting brand-name products as their own to win approval for their generic copies.  So far, the inspections have resulted in 128 product recalls and suspensions.  FDA chemists are also testing the potency of the 30 top-selling generics on the market.  The agency, asserts Mr. McKnight of Pittsburgh-based Mylan Laboratories, "is doing what they should have been doing five years ago -- they're now off their derrieres."  The FDA's efforts to get to the bottom of the generic-drug scandal further overextends an agency long on mandate and short on money and manpower.  "The bottom line is, routine work doesn't get done," says a senior FDA official.  "Surveillance inspections of other drug and food companies don't get done."  Gavin Meerdink, a veterinary toxicologist at the University of Arizona, for example, says he recently tipped off a local FDA official to illegal over-the-counter sales of oxytocin, a prescription drug for livestock.  "He just didn't have the manpower to do anything about it," says Dr. Meerdink.  Though he got blind-sided by the generic-drug crisis, Dr. Young runs the FDA bureaucracy like a chief executive officer specializing in crisis management; he plans for emergencies.  But sometimes the challenges may simply be too overwhelming for the FDA. Take the grape scare.  At its peak, the FDA threw 650 investigators and lab technicans into the fray.  Though they worked night and day, they managed to inspect less than 5% of the fruit unloaded off nine freighters.  ---  Sue Shellenbarger in Chicago contributed to this article.  Four dairy companies agreed to pay $1.5 million to the state and to public schools in 20 north Florida counties as part of a settlement of charges of price-fixing in milk contracts.  The settlements, said Attorney General Bob Butterworth, mark the end of a long state investigation, in which defendants were accused of fixing milk prices in sales to schools.  In total, more than $33.7 million was recovered from milk companies in the South.  "These conspiracies were so complex it would have been next to impossible for an individual {school} board to spot them," Mr. Butterworth said.  The companies and their payments in the most recent settlement are: Barber Dairies Inc. in Birmingham, Ala., $834,263; Dairy-Fresh Corp. of Greensboro, Ala., $500,000; Kinnett Dairies Inc. of Columbus, Ga., $150,000; and Bassett Dairy Products Inc. of Live Oak, Fla., $50,000.  Company officials were unavailable for comment.  Par Pharmaceutical Inc. said that R.K. Patel resigned as senior vice president and a director of the troubled generic-drug maker.  The company declined to give a reason for the resignation and didn't name an immediate successor.  The resignation adds to the recent management turmoil at Par, which has been under investigation by the Food and Drug Administration as part of the agency's probe of the generic drug industry.  Par and its Quad unit recently pleaded guilty to one count of providing an unlawful gratuity to an FDA employee.  Ashok Patel, a former Par senior vice president, and Dilip P. Shah, former president of Quad, each pleaded guilty to a related charge.  They each face up to two years in jail and a $250,000 fine.  Ashok Patel and R.K. Patel are not related.  Par's 68-year-old president, Perry Levine, said last month that he planned to retire because of poor health when the company finds a successor.  His son, Jeffrey, who remains executive vice president, took a voluntary leave of absence from his responsibilities as a director.  Lifeline Healthcare Group Ltd. said it sued the National Association of Securities Dealers, the Securities and Exchange Commission's former enforcement director and another SEC official, charging that they failed to properly investigate short selling in the company's stock.  The lawsuit, filed in U.S. District Court in Washington, says that the company wrote the SEC and the NASD in April to tell the agencies that the company's stock price was rising as traders scrambled to cover short positions.  The company charges that neither the SEC officials nor the NASD properly investigated its charges and helped contribute to the stock plunge that followed.  As a result, Lifeline charges, "the company and its shareholders have been irretrievably damaged."  The SEC halted trading in Lifeline's stock in July, citing concerns about Lifeline's assets, operations and news releases.  An investigation apparently is continuing.  In August, the NASD continued the trading halt over the same issues raised by the SEC.  The healthcare-services concern said it is seeking $45 million in damages from Gary Lynch, the SEC's former enforcement chief and Kenneth Simon, an assistant director in the enforcement division.  The company also is asking that a NASD-imposed trading ban on the company's stock be enjoined and that an SEC investigation into the company's disclosure be enjoined until the short selling is investigated.  A short sale amounts to a bet that a stock's price will decline.  A short seller sells borrowed shares in the hope of being able to replace them later with shares bought for a lower price.  An SEC spokeswoman said the commission hasn't yet seen a copy of the lawsuit and couldn't comment.  Messrs.  Lynch and Simon couldn't be reached for comment.  An official for the NASD, which is the self-regulating organization that oversees trading on the Nasdaq over-the-counter market, said nobody was available for comment.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. downgraded Price Communications Corp.'s existing subordinated debt, to Caa from single-B-3.  The rating concern also assigned a Caa rating to Price's proposed convertible senior subordinated debentures.  Regarding the downgrade, Moody's said that Price's operating cash flow was insufficent to meet its debt-service costs and that the gap between them would widen significantly over the near term.  Moody's said Price's pending sales of broadcast-television properties would cut into cash flow because it would require Price to take back notes and securities in companies whose risk rivals its own.  At the same time, Price's $50 million offering of convertible debentures would increase its debt-service expense, said Craig Fitt, assistant vice president at Moody's.  About $350 million in long-term debt is affected by the downgrade and the rating for the proposed issue, Moody's said.  Price's high debt levels have been incurred partly as a result of its strategy of acquiring undervalued media properties in the expectation of reselling them at higher prices.  Price Communications officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Price is a New York-based company engaged in television and radio broadcasting, publishing, outdoor advertising and cellular telephones.  Fuji Bank Ltd. said it plans to buy the 75.1% that it already doesn't own in Kleinwort Benson Group PLC's Chicago-based primary dealer in U.S. Treasury securities.  The price is $44 million.  Fuji had been expected for some time to increase its holding in the primary dealer, Kleinwort Benson Government Securities Inc., although it hadn't been clear whether Fuji would seek to raise its stake to 80% or move to full ownership.  Fuji bought a 24.9% stake in Kleinwort Benson Government Securities under a May 1988 agreement that became final last January.  Fuji paid $14.5 million and assumed $25 million in subordinated debt under that accord, which included an option for Fuji to raise its stake in the Kleinwort Benson unit to 80%.  The purchase agreement is subject to approval by the Federal Reserve Board.  Fuji's move follows the Fed's decision last month to allow four big Japanese securities firms to maintain their primary dealer units in the U.S., but called on Tokyo to further open its government bond market to U.S. companies.  Three Japanese commercial banks, Industrial Bank of Japan Ltd., Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan Ltd. and Sanwa Bank Ltd., each own a U.S. primary dealer already.  Other Japanese banks, such as Mitsui Bank Ltd. and Bank of Tokyo Ltd., are known to be interested in developing or acquiring primary dealers in the U.S.  There are 42 primary dealers that are empowered to deal directly with the Federal Reserve Bank of New York when it buys and sells Treasury securities as part of its open-market operations.  Primary-dealer status can be an important source of business because some U.S. institutional investors will only trade with primary dealers.  Kleinwort Benson, based in London, has owned the U.S. primary dealer unit since 1984.  Mitchell Shivers, president of Kleinwort Benson Government Securities, said no changes in operations or personnel were expected as a result of Fuji's plan.  A stand-up comedian is one thing.  But a stand-up anchorman?  That's just what Dan Rather may soon become on the "CBS Evening News."  Mr. Rather, in the latest attempt to distinguish his half-hour newscast from those of his competitors, plans to start reading the news standing up instead of while sitting behind a desk, the traditional position.  Mr. Rather won't comment, but CBS News officials acknowledge that Mr. Rather is preparing to trade his desk for a blue or gray podium.  While he's reading the news, a CBS spokeswoman says, "the viewer won't notice any change."  But when he interviews news subjects or other CBS correspondents, he'll shift his stance to showcase a large TV screen on which they'll appear, and he'll talk to them standing up.  Other CBS correspondents may follow suit; Bob Schieffer, who anchors the Saturday edition of the "CBS Evening News" also has rehearsed his newscast standing up, although sources close to Mr. Schieffer's broadcast say he hasn't any current plans to stand and deliver the news.  This won't be the first time Mr. Rather, whose broadcast finished No. 1 in the ratings for the 1988-89 television season, will have tried a different approach to delivering the news.  When he succeeded Walter Cronkite, in March 1981, Mr. Rather made his debut perched in front of the anchor desk -- not quite sitting, but not quite standing, either.  But that lasted only one night, because CBS News officials thought it looked a bit silly.  So far, Mr. Rather's two chief rivals aren't ready to follow in his latest footsteps.  An NBC News spokeswoman says there are no plans to alter "NBC Nightly News with Tom Brokaw," adding, "Tom will remain sitting for the time being."  And at ABC News, a spokeswoman says there are no plans to change "World News Tonight with Peter Jennings."  Associates of Mr. Rather say he feels more comfortable standing.  Moreover, medical specialists say it's better to stand while speaking.  "Your lung and breathing capacity is better standing up," says Robert Pincus, director of the voice laboratory at the New York Eye and Ear Infirmary.  "You can't take that deep of a breath while sitting down.  What Rather is doing is a good idea, considering his line of work."  DNA PLANT TECHNOLOGY Corp. (Cinnaminson, N.J.) extended the expiration of its common stock warrants to 5 p.m. EST, Jan. 17, 1991, from Jan. 17, 1990.  The warrants allow the holders to buy 1.32 DNA shares at $7.95 each.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, DNA Plant Technology closed unchanged at $4.  WEIRTON STEEL Corp., Weirton, W.Va., announced the early redemption of two issues of tax-exempt pollution control revenue bonds issued on behalf of its predecessor, National Steel Corp. Weirton also said early redemption is contingent upon the closing of a public offering of approximately $300 million of senior notes.  The steelmaker said it would file shortly a registration statement regarding the senior notes with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The two pollution control issues have a total principal amount of $56.3 million.  DILLARD DEPARTMENT STORES Inc., Little Rock, Ark., raised its quarterly dividend to five cents a share from four cents.  The payment will be made Nov. 1 to stock of record Sept. 30.  Additionally, the department-store chain said its board will ask shareholders to approve an increase in authorized shares of its Class A common to 144.5 million from 76.8 million, and an increase in authorized Class B common to 5.5 million from 3.2 million.  Chairman Lloyd Bentsen of the Senate Finance Committee moved to block burgeoning efforts to reduce the capital gains tax, even as negotiations to provide the tax break continued in the House.  The Texas Democrat, a long-time advocate of preferential treatment for capital gains, said he wouldn't support a reduction in the tax this year.  He said that he would prefer to expand the deduction for contributions to individual retirement accounts and that there wouldn't be enough money to do both.  The move places a major obstacle in the way of what has been a growing movement to cut the capital gains tax -- a movement that has been giving Democrats fits for the past two months.  The IRA proposal gives senators cover for opposing the capital gains tax cut by providing another, less controversial tax break that they can support.  Sen. Bentsen unveiled his two-pronged strategy yesterday at a luncheon meeting of Senate Democrats.  He said the IRA change would provide more of a benefit to the economy and also would help more people.  Sen. Bentsen's pitch was followed by a statement of support by Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell (D., Maine), and, according to Sen. Bentsen, both were received enthusiastically by their colleagues.  Top Democrats have derided the capital gains cut as a boon to the richest 1% of Americans and have questioned whether reducing that tax would help economic growth, as its advocates -- mostly Republicans such as President Bush -- have asserted.  By proposing a plan involving IRAs instead of capital gains, Sens.  Bentsen and Mitchell have formulated what amounts to a Democratic Party response to the Republicans.  There is always a chance, however, that Congress will find both irresistible.  Sen. Bentsen said expanding the deduction for IRA contributions would boost the lagging savings rate and provide a tax break to more middle and upper-middle income individuals than a cut in the capital gains tax rate would.  Appealing to the middle class is politically important to Mr. Bentsen.  He was the Democrats' 1988 vice presidential candidate and is leaving open the option of running for president in 1992.  Under the Bentsen IRA plan, those people who aren't currently eligible for deductible contributions to IRAs would be allowed to deduct from their taxes 50% of future contributions of as much as $2,000 a year.  Those who are now eligible for fully deductible IRA contributions, which include people who don't have employer-provided pensions, would continue to be allowed to get the full deduction.  The plan would allow individuals to withdraw funds from the IRAs without penalty to pay for higher education, first-home purchases and, as under current law, retirement.  The Bush administration is looking at ways to revive the IRA, but it is concentrating on proposals that wouldn't widen the budget deficit substantially.  Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady called the Bentsen plan "enormously expensive," estimating that it would cost the Treasury $15 billion over five years.  One alternative under consideration is to prevent taxpayers from deducting contributions to IRAs, but to allow them to escape taxes on the interest those contributions earn.  Sen. Bentsen said he intended to meet deficit-reduction obligations and extend, for a short period, expiring tax provisions -- a package that would amount to about $8 billion in fiscal 1990 -- without resorting to a capital gains tax cut.  The capital gains tax cut actually increases revenue in the short run by stimulating asset sales.  But he added that he expected Finance Committee members to propose a capital gains tax reduction during drafting sessions over the next few weeks.  Sen. Bentsen declined to say what tax increases he would recommend to meet his revenue-raising goals.  In the House, a new capital gains tax proposal by Chairman Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.) of the House Ways and Means Committee was given a frosty reception by fellow Democrats.  The plan was meant to draw support away from another proposal by Rep. Ed Jenkins (D., Ga.), which holds a one-vote majority on the tax-writing panel.  In the House, Rep. Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.), chairman of the Ways and Means Committee, floated a capital gains plan that would give preferential treatment to the sale of many currently held assets that were left out of an earlier proposal of his.  The plan was meant to draw support away from a capital gains cut proposed by Rep. Ed Jenkins (D., Ga.), which holds a one-vote majority on the tax-writing panel.  The chairman's plan got a frosty reception from most of the panel's 23 Democrats, but it did attract private support from the members who favor the Jenkins plan-six Democrats and all the committee's 13 Republicans.  These members wouldn't endorse it publicly, however, and it remains to be seen whether Mr. Rostenkowski will actually put it to a vote when drafting sessions are scheduled to begin today.  "I have more of a problem with my Democrats than my Republicans," he said.  "I'm going to talk to the speaker."  Canada's asbestos industry, with the support of the Canadian government, said it filed a motion in U.S. Appeals Court here, seeking to reverse the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency's plan to ban asbestos.  The motion was filed by eight Canadian asbestos companies and the Asbestos Institute, according to an attorney for the industry.  The institute is two-thirds funded by Canada's federal government and the province of the Quebec.  Several Canadian government officials said at a news conference in Montreal that they would support the motion.  In July, the EPA imposed a gradual ban on virtually all uses of asbestos, which was once commonly used in building materials.  More than 100,000 workers in the U.S. have died from inhaling cancer-causing asbestos fibers, according to some estimates.  The ban sparked an immediate outcry in Canada, which produces more asbestos than any country except the Soviet Union.  In the motion, the industry asks that the ban be overturned because asbestos products don't pose a "reasonable risk," according to Tim Hardy, an attorney for the institute and the eight companies.  In Washington, an EPA spokesman said the agency hadn't seen the motion and hadn't any comment.  The Dial Soap people are irritated, so they're initiating a little germ warfare.  Greyhound Corp.'s Dial unit filed suit against the Softsoap subsidiary of Colgate Palmolive Co., charging the liquid-soap manufacturer with false advertising.  Dial singles out a brochure, aimed at the retail trade, that depicted three red hands and the words, "We've caught Liquid Dial red-handed."  Retailers were also told by Softsoap that its germ-killing properties were "unsurpassed," according to Dial.  Dial says Softsoap can't prove this.  Dial says Softsoap also is bringing this message directly to consumers: the package containing Softsoap's dispenser calls the product "significantly less irritating than other antibacterial liquid soaps."  Dial says this is an obvious reference to their company, which it says leads the overall liquid-soap category with 27% of the market to Softsoap's 24%.  Though Softsoap entered the liquid-soap market 10 years ago, Dial was the first to come out with an antibacterial liquid soap last year, and it made quick inroads into the market.  Softsoap began shipping its own product in July, and a TV campaign is expected this fall.  Dial clearly intends to be ready for the onslaught and hang onto its market share, and the lawsuit is a shot off Softsoap's bow: a lengthy news release announced the lawsuit, saying, "A competitor has made untrue statements regarding our product to the trade and to the consumer.  Our company will fight that every time."  "It's part of the game," says marketing strategist Jack Trout of Trout & Ries of Greenwich, Conn., and co-author of "Marketing Warfare."  "It's vicious out there, and you don't want someone to take your business away.  A lawsuit can help raise doubts about your competitor's product," says Mr. Trout.  Softsoap Enterprises Inc., based in Chaska, Minn., hasn't commented.  "We haven't had time to study the suit," says Larry Wilhelm, vice president of sales and marketing.  Softsoap isn't taking this lying down, though: Mr. Wilhelm says the company will have a statement later this week.  In the lawsuit, Dial objects to the "methodology" it says Softsoap used in tests purportedly proving Softsoap is less irritating.  In the Softsoap irritancy test, soap is applied to subjects' backs for 21 days without rinsing it off, Dial says.  This is "not clinically meaningful," Dial continues.  It is not "indicative of normal use" of hand soap.  Dial says its own irritancy test, which it said came to a tie, is much better because it used "repeated hand-washing methodology."  The suit asks that Softsoap be blocked from distributing the advertising and promotional material, be ordered to issue "corrective" materials and be forced to tell retailers to pull the offending packages off the shelves.  BCE Inc., a Montreal-based holding company, will buy about 4.6 million shares of SHL Systemhouse Inc., Ottawa, as part of a 117.6 million Canadian dollar (US$99.1 million) rights offering by the computer systems integration company, Systemhouse said.  BCE's purchase will represent 12.4% of Systemhouse's shares outstanding after the rights issue.  BCE agreed to buy all common shares not purchased by the public under the offering of 10,724,364 shares at a price of C$11 a share.  BCE is the parent of Canada's largest telephone company, Bell Canada.  It also has major interests in telecommunications equipment manufacturing and in gas pipelines.  Systemhouse is a unit of closely held Kinburn Technology Corp., an Ottawa-based holding company.  Public shareholders purchased 701,000 shares under the rights offering.  Kinburn Technology exercised all of its rights, buying 5,373,393 shares, to maintain its 50.1% stake in Systemhouse.  Proceeds of the issue will be used to retire long-term debt, Systemhouse said.  W.R. Grace & Co. named another executive to the group of vice chairmen considered contenders for the chief executive officer's post at this chemical company.  J. Murfree Butler, 46 years old and formerly a senior vice president, was named a vice chairman to succeed Terrence D. Daniels, who resigned.  Mr. Butler will also have responsibility for Grace Specialty Chemicals Co., the parent's core business and one in which he has acted as an operations officer.  Robert W. Samuels, president of the specialty chemicals company, is retiring in January 1990.  Selections of new vice chairmen at Grace are watched closely, since the company has indicated the successor to its 76-year-old chief executive and chairman, J. Peter Grace, will come from those positions.  In addition to Mr. Butler, the vice chairmen are J.P. Bolduc and Joseph R. Wright Jr., both 50.  Mr. Daniels, 46, couldn't be reached for comment on his departure.  Asked about it, Mr. Grace said, "He had already accomplished a lot of the restructuring around here.  He is a restless person."  He added that Mr. Daniels had recently acquired a residence in Virginia.  But Mr. Grace, who has occupied the top post at the company since 1945, remained circumspect about when he may step down.  "Only the good Lord can tell how long your health will last," he said.  H&M Group, a Dallas investment company formed by Haas & Partners and James N. Mills of St. Louis, said it has agreed to acquire Jackson Products Inc., a unit of Airgas Inc.  The agreement would represent Robert B. Haas's first participation in a major acquisition since forming his own investment firm, Haas & Partners, and parting ways with former investment partner Thomas Hicks.  H&M said the purchase price was "about $70 million"; about 90% of that would be cash, and 10% the assumption of debt.  More exact numbers weren't available.  Jackson Products makes safety equipment for construction, welding and other industrial concerns.  Mr. Haas said his partnership would own about 70% of Jackson Products and Thermadyne Holdings will hold about 30%.  Mr. Mills is Thermadyne's chairman.  A spokesman for Airgas, based in Radnor, Pa., said the sale of Jackson is part of its strategy to shed its manufacturing operations in order to concentrate on industrial gas distribution businesses.  The longest-serving Securities and Exchange Commission member resigned, creating an opportunity for President Bush to create his own commission unusually early in his term.  Charles Cox, 44 years old, said in a letter to the White House that he will resign by Sept. 30.  Mr. Cox was expected to resign because of his already long tenure and because of waning White House support.  He has been a commissioner since 1983 and was renominated for another term last year but never confirmed.  The opening will allow Mr. Bush to quickly name a majority of the SEC's five slots.  Richard Breeden, a White House insider who was a main architect of the thrift-bailout legislation, is expected to be confirmed as SEC chairman by the Senate after hearings that begin tomorrow.  In addition to Mr. Cox, Chairman David Ruder will leave the agency after Mr. Breeden is confirmed.  Moreover, a third commissioner, Joseph Grundfest, is expected to leave within six months for a professor's job at Stanford University.  Of the two remaining commissioners, Mary Schapiro hasn't been renominated after a recess appointment, although insiders at the agency say she would like to stay.  The fifth commissioner, Edward Fleischman, isn't expected by commission staffers to stay for more than a year.  Mr. Breeden, if confirmed, probably would have some say on White House nominees for the other commission openings.  That would allow him to avoid some of the cantankerous internal squabbles that have plagued Mr. Ruder during the past few years.  For example, Mr. Ruder was vehemently opposed by Messrs.  Grundfest and Fleischman when the chairman tried to wrest control of stock-futures trading from the Commodities Futures Trading Commission.  At a meeting last year, Mr. Grundfest accused Mr. Ruder of succumbing to "regulatory imperialism," and Mr. Fleischman called the move "folly."  One individual at the commission said that Mr. Ruder recently told the White House that whoever becomes chairman should have more control over filling other slots on the commission.  Mr. Breeden's close ties to the White House are expected to bolster the agency's standing, people at the SEC said.  They argued that the link should help Mr. Breeden push through staff and budget increases that staffers contend are badly needed to battle such time-consuming issues as penny-stock fraud.  Moreover, support for the executive branch might help the agency stand up to Rep. John Dingell (D., Mich.), the powerful chairman of the House Energy and Commerce Committee.  Mr. Dingell and his large staff have paid consistently close attention to the commission.  Earlier this year, Mr. Dingell told The Wall Street Journal: "I will tell you that any document they've got in that damn place is something that this body has a full right to."  Mr. Cox will become senior vice president at Lexecon Inc., a Chicago-based economic consulting firm.  Mr. Cox said he will specialize in securities law.  Referring to the agency, Mr. Cox said that "there are a lot of problems.  Of course, there are always a lot of problems."  The important issues facing the SEC, he contended, center on keeping the U.S. competitive in world securities markets.  Mr. Bush's choice on how to fill the agency's opening will be crucial, Mr. Cox said in an interview.  "The replacements will be very important in the direction the commission takes in the next few years," he said, adding: "If Mr. Breeden has a particular program and gets commissioners who are in tune with that program, that will facilitate what {the chairman} does."  Occidental Petroleum Corp. said a federal appellate court reversed all but $8 million of a $412 million judgment against the company in a breach-of-contract dispute with a unit of Houston-based Coastal Corp.  In October 1986, a jury in Cheyenne, Wyo., found that Natural Gas Pipeline Co., a unit of Occidental's MidCon Corp. subsidiary, had broken a 1982 long-term contract to buy gas from Coastal's Colorado Interstate Gas Co. unit, as part of an attempt to build a natural-gas monopoly in parts of the West and upper Midwest.  In July 1983, after gas prices had been declining, Natural Gas Pipeline began refusing to accept deliveries from Colorado Interstate or to pay for them.  Occidental has contended throughout that its actions were permitted under a ruling from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission that abolished minimum provisions in gas-supply contracts.  Sources close to the company say Occidental was confident enough that it would prevail in the case that it avoided settling with Coastal early on.  Damages in the case were initially estimated at $724 million, but were reduced by the court twice, first to $549 million, then to $412 million.  In both instances, the judge found the jury had miscalculated the damage awards.  In its decision, the appeals court in Denver let stand only an $8 million damage award against the Occidental unit.  "I am pleased that our judicial system has corrected the lower court's erroneous rulings and vindicated our positions in this case," said Armand Hammer, chairman and chief executive officer of Occidental.  The appellate court ruling will have little effect on Occidental's earnings because the company hadn't taken reserves earlier to cover any losses from the case.  But the ruling is nonetheless a "very significant decision for Oxy," said Eugene Nowak, oil analyst for Dean Witter Reynolds.  "When all is said and done, this eliminates a potential sizable liability for the company."  In Houston, a Coastal spokesman said the fight isn't over.  "We anticipate asking for a rehearing or appealing to the Supreme Court," the spokesman said.  He added, "We were quite surprised by the reversal.  We thought we had a solid case."  In addition, Coastal differs with Occidental on its interpretation of the reversal.  Coastal said that based on the documents it received, the amount of the sustained verdict was about $24 million, plus interest, rather than the $8 million Occidental said it now owes.  Besides operating a large natural gas pipeline system, Coastal is a sizable oil and gas exploration and refining and marketing company.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Occidental shares closed at 29 7/8, up 1/2.  Coastal shares closed at 42 7/8, up 1/4.  A sharp rise in imports helped Japan's trade surplus narrow for the fourth consecutive month in August.  But economists cautioned that the strong dollar may cause exports to accelerate later this year, reversing the trend.  Japan's overall trade surplus, measured on a customs-cleared basis, fell 30.8% in August from the year before to $3.44 billion from $4.97 billion, the Finance Ministry said.  The trade surplus with the U.S. fell for the second month in a row.  Imports in August soared 15.7% from a year earlier to $18.38 billion from $15.88 billion, while exports rose 4.7% to $21.82 billion from $20.85 billion.  Analysts said strong Japanese domestic demand kept the rate of import growth much higher than the rate of growth for exports.  Moreover, the recent appreciation of the U.S. currency caused dollar-denominated import prices to rise, further increasing import value.  The acceleration of imports is important to the Japanese government, which is trying to reduce trade tensions with the U.S.  "The growth in demand for imports will continue to be large," said a Finance Ministry official.  Tax reforms implemented April 1 have led to an increase in liquor imports, especially from Europe, while an increase in the government's quota on beef imports has spurred consumption of U.S. meat.  But some special factors also added to August's import growth, analysts said.  Aircraft imports, which fluctuate widely from month to month, were up 597.2% to $336.3 million, reflecting the purchase of five airplanes from the U.S. Oil imports jumped 39% to $1.86 billion from a year earlier, when a newly imposed tax on imported oil temporarily discouraged demand.  Taking seasonal factors into account, the August trade surplus stood at $4.43 billion, down 12.3% from $5.05 billion in July.  Adjusted exports rose 5.1% to $23.42 billion from $22.29 billion, while imports rose 10.2% to $18.99 billion from $17.24 billion.  The surplus with the U.S. fell 6.8% from a year earlier to $3.03 billion from $3.25 billion.  Exports to the U.S. rose 5% to $7.33 billion, while imports from the U.S. surged 15.1% to $4.3 billion.  Economists said Japan's surplus with the U.S. represented a much higher portion of Japan's global surplus, reaching 88% compared with the average so far this year of 76%.  "It's an increasingly polarized imbalance," said Kenneth Courtis, an economist with Deutsche Bank (Asia) Ltd.  The strong dollar has continued to help reduce the overall surplus.  In August, the dollar averaged 140.27 yen, up from 133.13 yen a year earlier.  That difference accentuated the magnitude of the decline in the surplus, particularly on a year-to-year basis.  But if the dollar retains its strength, Japanese exports will soon become less expensive in dollar terms, and companies will be able to profit more by shipping goods abroad, analysts said.  That may encourage an increase in exports.  The higher dollar would also make imported goods more expensive in Japan, possibly discouraging domestic demand, although so far higher import prices have had little impact on consumer preferences.  This is contributing to the Japanese government's decision to push for a weaker dollar at the meeting of the Group of Seven industrialized nations at the end of this month.  "It's very clear that Japan will press very hard . . . particularly with the U.S., that the dollar go no higher," said Eric Rasmussen, an economist with Jardine Fleming Securities Ltd.  Japan's trade surplus with the European Community continued to narrow in August.  Exports to the EC countries grew 7.2% to $3.85 billion, while imports increased 18.2% to $2.46 billion.  Japan's trade surplus with Asia, including China, declined 35.2% from a year ago to $888 million.  Exports to Asian countries rose 4.8% to $6.55 billion, while imports surged 16% to $5.67 billion.  With China alone, Japan's imports rose 20% to $1.04 billion.  But exports dropped for the third month in a row, declining 14.5% to $632 million.  The drop clearly showed the impact of the Chinese government's bloody crackdown in June on its pro-democracy movement, analysts said.  Nationwide Health Properties Inc. said it named R. Bruce Andrews, 49 years old, president and chief executive officer.  Mr. Andrews will continue as chairman of Armstrong Kitchens, a closely held kitchen-installation company in which he holds a 60% stake.  Mr. Andrews is a former chief financial officer and chief operating officer of American Medical International Inc., a health-care-services concern.  As Nationwide's president and chief executive, he succeeds Milton J. Brock Jr., 74, who was named chairman.  In that post, Mr. Brock succeeds Sam A. Brooks Jr., 52, who will continue as a director.  Nationwide, formerly Beverly Investment Properties, is a real-estate investment trust that specializes in health-care properties.  Mr. Andrews said Mr. Brock is a "retired person putting in a small percentage of his time.  It was a matter of bringing in full-time leadership."  Mr. Brock couldn't be reached for comment, but in a prepared statement, he said Mr. Andrews's full-time commitment will allow Nationwide to grow.  Mr. Andrews said he expects Nationwide to "create substantial growth" during the next five to 10-year period by acquiring health-care facilities.  He said he doesn't yet know how many additional facilities the company may acquire.  Airbus Industrie said it received a purchase agreement covering four of its A-310-300 widebody commercial jets that will be operated by the newly formed Mexican charter carrier Aerocancun.  The European aircraft consortium said the planes will be acquired by Jersey-based Oasis International Group PLC and operated by Aerocancun under a commercial agreement.  Airbus didn't give details on the accord between Oasis and Aerocancun, and Airbus officials weren't available to comment.  Delivery of the planes has been scheduled for November 1991 to May 1993.  The choice of engines remains open.  Airbus didn't disclose the amount of the order, although industry sources estimated that the price of one A-310-300 is slightly more than $60 million.  Airbus is a consortium among Aerospatiale of France, Messerschmitt-Boelkow Blohm G.m.b.H. of West Germany, British Aerospace PLC and Construcciones Aeronauticas S.A of Spain.  Time Warner Inc., in its latest effort to mesh the related businesses of Time Inc. and Warner Communications Inc., created a new cable-TV group and named a longtime Time executive to run it.  The move is the second by Time Warner that lumps together related operations but doesn't involve any consolidation or cost savings.  Earlier this month, the company said it created a new publishing division, Time Trade Books, that would include Time's Little, Brown subsidiary and Warner's Warner Books.  Time's other major book-publishing subsidiary, Scott Foresman & Co., isn't included in the group; publishing industry sources say it is being shopped around by Time's investment bankers at Wasserstein, Perella & Co.  Time and Wasserstein declined to comment on Scott Foresman, which has long been considered a candidate for divestiture after the merger of Time and Warner is completed.  Speculation has focused on foreign buyers that include two British companies, Reed International PLC and Robert Maxwell's Maxwell Communication Corp. Neither could be reached for comment late yesterday.  Time said the Time Warner Cable Group will be overseen by Joseph Collins, who is currently head of Time's 82%-owned American Television & Communications Corp. subsidiary.  ATC, which is based in Stamford, Conn., will remain a separate company under Mr. Collins and its current president, James H. Doolittle, while Warner Cable, Columbus, Ohio, will remain under the helm of its president, James Gray.  An ATC spokesman said that the companies' operations don't overlap in most markets and that the corporate staffs of both have already been pared considerably.  For example, ATC had nearly 600 corporate staff members in 1985; last year, after a series of consolidations, it was moved to Stamford from Denver and now has a corporate staff of less than 200.  During the negotiations leading up to the merger, Time and Warner executives stressed that no major asset sales of core businesses were planned and that no employees would lose their jobs as a result of the merger.  Sharon Armbrust, an analyst at Paul Kagan Associates, predicted that Time Warner eventually would find cost savings, however.  "There's no question they will consolidate these things further, but they are very sensitive to public opinion now, and the merger isn't closed yet," she said.  "Once it is and the appropriate efficiencies are recognized, the hatchet will probably come down."  Time also made some changes in its New York City operations.  It replaced John F. Gault, who has headed the ATC operations in Manhattan for several years, with Richard Aurelio, who heads Warner's BQ Cable unit in the boroughs of Manhattan and Queens.  Mr. Aurelio, who oversaw Warner's participation of the decade-long battle to bring cable TV to the city's outer boroughs, will run both the ATC and Warner operations in the city.  Mr. Gault, meanwhile, has been given responsibility for nine ATC operating divisions in cities that include Raleigh, N.C., and San Diego, Calif.  Time changed its name to Time Warner Inc. as part of its merger with Warner, which it is in the process of completing.  Time Warner currently owns 59.3% of Warner's common stock outstanding.  Sears, Roebuck & Co. has hit a major snag in its negotiations to sell the Sears Tower in Chicago, the world's tallest building, to Olympia & York Developments Ltd.  O&Y, based in Toronto, and Chicago-based Sears failed to come to an agreement on who would bear the considerable tax costs of a reappraisal that would follow the sale, according to individuals familiar with the negotiations.  All other elements of the transaction, including a price of about $1 billion, had been agreed on, the individuals said, and the reappraisal issue only became a factor last week.  Yesterday morning, a team of almost 20 O&Y executives left Chicago, where they had been poised to sign a deal, after the two sides failed to reach an agreement.  "Last week was the killer week," said one individual close to the talks.  An O&Y spokesman confirmed that talks with Sears had broken down but declined to elaborate.  A Sears spokesman refused to comment.  The move was said to be unrelated to O&Y's involvement with Campeau Corp., the troubled Canadian retailer that announced it would seek a $250 million finance package from O&Y.  The fact that neither side in the Sears Tower negotiations issued a news release concerning the collapse of talks appeared to indicate that there was some hope that the agreement could be salvaged.  But that was seen as unlikely by people close to the negotiations.  The breakdown means that Sears, which announced plans to sell the tower as part of an anti-takeover defense late last year, must scramble to find a new buyer.  Apparently, the company was so certain it had a deal with O&Y that it had ceased dealing with other bidders, that included JMB Realty, LaSalle Partners and Aldrich Eastman & Waltch Inc., all of which specialize in investing money from pension funds.  Japanese buyers had shied away from bidding on the tower after Japan's Ministry of Finance discouraged firms from purchasing the Chicago landmark.  The ministry was understood to be concerned that Japanese ownership of such a prominent property would engender anti-Japanese bias.  When Sears announced plans to sell the building last October, some real-estate analysts predicted the tower would fetch as much as $1.4 billion.  Subsequent bids came in closer to $850 million, however, and the retailer was known to be scrambling to get the price above the symbolically significant $1 billion mark.  People close to the negotiations say O&Y had agreed to pay slightly over $1 billion in return for Sears's agreeing to continue to pay rent for six years on the space it was planning to vacate as part of the relocation of its merchandise group.  O&Y was apparently concerned that the sale would trigger a substantial reappraisal of the property by the city, leading to a higher property tax and making it more expensive to rent the building.  During the past year, Chicago homeowners have made property taxes a major issue, and O&Y officials didn't welcome the political fallout that could have followed their $1 billion purchase.  After Sears was said to be unwilling to shoulder the increased taxes, a standoff ensued, and the deal fell apart late Monday.  This is the second major transaction in as many months that O&Y backed out of late in the negotiations.  Last month, the company allowed a $593 million tender offer for BCE Inc.'s unprofitable real-estate unit to expire.  If the talks between the two parties aren't revived, Sears could either reopen the bidding or seek an agreement with one of the previous bidders.  It also could decide not to sell the tower, but that appears unlikely in light of the company's plans to vacate it.  In any new attempt to sell the building, Sears is expected to be able to get roughly the same-priced bids as it obtained prior to the O&Y negotiations.  Although the real-estate market in Chicago has been soft lately, brokers say long-term prospects are unchanged from 11 months ago, when Sears said it would sell the tower.  Trading in the financial markets was library quiet.  For the record, stock prices rose slightly, the dollar was mixed and bond prices edged lower.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 2.85 points to close at 2707.26.  But broader market measures showed bigger gains; Standard & Poor's Index of 500 stocks advanced 1.04, to 348.70.  The dollar, following rumors that central banks were selling on the sly, rose slightly against the yen, but had a small drop against the mark.  The financial markets appear to be in the grip of "data paralysis" as traders and investors await a deluge of economic reports Friday.  They are hoping to get a better idea of where the economy is headed after seeing reports on the July trade deficit, August producer-price index and three statistics on how the manufacturing sector is faring.  Institutional investors, although wary about losing the impressive gains many have accumulated so far this year, are standing fast or adding modestly to their positions.  Some selling pressure is coming from traders who are unwinding stock-index-futures positions ahead of the "triple-witching hour" expiration of stock-index futures and options Friday.  In the bond market, speculation grew that the strong dollar may prompt the Federal Reserve to ease short-term interest rates.  That would boost bond prices, but damp enthusiasm of foreign investors for U.S. securities.  In major market activity:  Stock prices rose in thin trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 142.1 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners, 824 to 632.  Bond prices slipped.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue fell a little more than one-eighth of a point, or more than $1.25 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The yield on the issue rose to 8.08%.  The dollar was mixed.  In late afternoon New York trading the currency was at 1.9863 marks and 146.95 yen compared to 1.9866 marks and 146.70 yen.  Tambrands Inc.'s chairman and chief executive officer, Martin F.C. Emmett, has a vision of the personal-care products company's future that is almost directly opposed to the diversification effort that failed his predecessor.  In an interview prior to a planned meeting with securities analysts, Mr. Emmett outlined plans to "sharpen the focus" around the Lake Success, N.Y., company's core business, Tampax tampons, and to continue streamlining the company, which already has a debt-free balance sheet, through sales of units and continued reductions in management.  Mr. Emmett, a former investment banker and consumer products executive, became Tambrands chairman and chief executive in April.  His predecessor, Edwin H. Shutt Jr., had been expected to diversify the company away from its focus on Tampax tampons, but the bulk of the company's earnings continue to come from tampons.  Mr. Shutt resigned in February.  And Tambrands President John F. Bard resigned in late August amid a management reorganization.  Other executive changes are likely, Mr. Emmett said.  In the past few weeks, Tambrands stock has run up near its 52-week high of $76.50 on speculation about a possible takeover.  Mr. Emmett wouldn't comment on the rumors, and reiterated Tambrands' wish to remain independent.  "We have a full line of defenses in place should someone surface," he says.  The executive attributes the stock price rise largely to takeover speculation and, to a lesser extent, to underlying forces recognizing the recent streamlining efforts.  The shares closed yesterday at $72, off $2.375, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Observers say an offer by Johnson & Johnson, which has denied rumors it is interested, would face antitrust difficulties, and Tambrands, trading very close to what analysts say is its break-up value, wouldn't come cheap to an outside leveraged buy-out firm lacking distribution and marketing outlets.  Mr. Emmett characterized 1989 as a "transition year" and declined to make specific projections on earnings.  For the second quarter, Tambrands earned $26.2 million, or $1.17 a share, on sales of $166.1 million.  Over the next five years, Mr. Emmett expects the overall $1.6 billion sanitary protection industry market to increase 1% a year in volume and 5% a year in dollars.  In the same period, Mr. Emmett expects the tampon share of the sanitary protection market, the focus of his long-term plan, to increase to about 40% from its current 36.4%, and to increase the Tampax share of the U.S. tampon market 1% a year over the next five years, to 65% from the current 60%.  Tampons had a loss of market share following the toxic shock scare almost a decade ago.  Although he hopes to cut advertising, research and development and administrative expenses 15% to 20%, Mr. Emmett plans to take a much more aggressive marketing stance, aimed at "a better definition of the product" on the shelf.  He says confusion exists in distinguishing between various types of tampons, and the company wants "to correct it without taking away from the flagship" brand.  The finance ministry said Jordan's commercial lenders agreed in principle to reschedule $575 million in debts due over a 30-month period.  The agreement, announced by state-run Jordan Radio, is part of a series of steps taken by the government to overcome a balance of payments crisis largely triggered by mounting obligations on Jordan's $8.3 billion debt.  The agreement followed two days of talks between six banks representing the London Club of commercial lenders and Jordanian officials led by Finance Minister Bassel Jardaneh and Central Bank Gov. Mohammed Said Nabulsi.  The commercial banks grouped under the club hold about $1.1 billion of Jordan's debt.  The statement quoted a Finance Ministry official, who wasn't identified, as saying commercial-bank representatives had agreed to reschedule the $575 million in debts due from the start of this year through mid-1991.  After a five-year grace period, the money would be paid during an 11-year period.  It also said Jordan had pledged to pay interest due on the debt amounting to $82 million this year.  Bankers earlier said Jordan hadn't made any payments this year on its commercial obligations.  Jordan has also reached agreements for relief from the Paris Club of governmental lenders, the Soviet Union, the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund, and won more than $350 million worth of grant aid from Arab oil states in the Gulf.  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ Sep. 8, Sep. 1,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.82 7.90  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.72 8.69  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.78 8.79  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 8.96 8.96  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.86 8.85  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 8.27 8.32  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 8.29 8.37  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 8.18 8.26  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 8.17 8.25  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 8.11 8.20  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, September 6, 1989 and Wednesday August 30, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  McDermott International Inc. said it received a $30 million contract from the Ultrasystems Engineers & Constructors division of Hadson Power Systems Co., Irvine, Calif., to build eight coal-fired stoker boilers.  MEXICO'S INDUSTRIAL EXPORTS accounted for 60% of the nation's total exports in 1988, up from 17% in 1981-82.  Yesterday's edition incorrectly said that these figures applied to Latin America.  (See: "Latin Nations' Export Earnings Are Up But Problems Offset Gains, IADB Says" -- WSJ Sept. 11, 1989)  Hong Kong's July trade surplus with the U.S. surged 50% to 10.5 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$1.34 billion) from HK$7 billion a year earlier, according to government data.  The surplus also represented a jump of 33% from June's HK$7.86 billion.  Hong Kong's total exports to the U.S. climbed 27% to HK$14.23 billion from HK$11.24 billion a year ago and rose 13% from June's HK$12.57 billion.  Imports from the U.S. dropped 12% to HK$3.73 billion from HK$4.25 billion the previous year and fell 21% from HK$4.71 billion in June.  Mesaba Aviation Inc. said August traffic more than doubled to 18.7 million revenue passenger miles from 8.9 million a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor, the percentage of seats occupied, rose to 60.2% from 57.2%.  RPM Inc. said it agreed to buy Kop-Coat Inc., a specialty coatings concern based in Pittsburgh.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Kop-Coat, which has annual sales of $55 million, was purchased by a management group in 1988 from Koppers Co.  RPM, a maker of waterproofing and other specialty chemical products for the do-it-yourself market, said the acquisition wouldn't materially affect its estimated earnings for the year ending May 31, 1990.  The sale is expected to be completed by November, pending a definitive agreement and government filings, RPM said.  Sundstrand Corp. said its Sullair Corp. unit agreed to increase its stake in Maco-Meudon of France to at least 75%.  The aerospace and industrial equipment concern said Sullair is currently a minority stockholder of Maco-Meudon, a Saint Priest, France-based construction tool and compressor supplier, holding a 13.5% interest.  Maco-Meudon had 1988 sales of $48.4 million, Sundstrand said.  Tandem Computers Inc. said it reached an agreement with DMR Group Inc. to develop software for financial institutions, allowing them to streamline various transactions.  Terms of the agreement weren't disclosed.  Tandem, a computer maker, and DMR, information and technology management consultants based in Montreal, said the software will allow banks and securities firms to consolidate credit and customer information.  At the moment, Tandem said, various departments within many institutions are forced to exchange credit and customer information by hand because of incompatible computer systems.  Tandem said it expects the software to be available by the 1990 third quarter.  General Motors Corp. said its GMC truck division increased to $1,000 the rebate it is offering on its 1988 and 1989 S-15 pickups and raised to $1,250 its rebate on 1988 and 1989 S-15 Jimmy compact sport utility trucks.  The rebates had ranged between $500 and $750 on the affected models.  The increase, which GMC truck dealers may offer at their option, began Sept. 6 and will run indefinitely, GM said.  Buyers can choose between the higher rebates and GM's cut-rate financing which ranges from 2.9% to 10.9%, depending on the length of contract.  Great American Management & Investment Inc. said it received 98.5%, or about 18.2 million shares, of Jepson Corp. common stock outstanding under its tender offer that expired yesterday.  The financial-services concern agreed to acquire Jepson for about $222 million, or $12 a share.  Jepson, also based in Chicago, is a holding company with interests in consumer, commercial and industrial products.  A spokeswoman for Great American said a merger of the two companies is expected to be completed shortly.  Carl C. Icahn, chairman of Trans World Airlines and ACF Industries Inc., has been nominated to serve as a director of this supplier of aviation and aerospace products and services.  Mr. Icahn would succeed William Hunt, a senior vice president of the company, who isn't seeking re-election to the 13-member board.  Lee A. Mills has been named to the additional post of chief operating officer of this retail marketing concern.  Mr. Mills will retain the positions of executive vice president, senior general counsel and director.  The post of chief operating officer has been vacant since last spring.  Robert N. Burt, executive vice president, and Larry D. Brady, newly elected executive vice president, of this machinery and chemicals concern, were named directors, increasing board membership to 12.  Previously, Mr. Brady served as vice president, corporate development.  Diane M. Balcom, a consultant to this maker of electronic security parts, was named a director, filling a vacancy.  Metro Airlines said August traffic rose 23.4% to 47.9 million revenue passenger miles from 38 million revenue passenger miles flown a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying customer flown one mile.  Load factor, or the percentage of seats filled, rose to 55.6% from 53.5%.  In the year to date, Metro's traffic climbed 10.1% to 302.3 million revenue passenger miles from 274.5 million in the year-earlier period.  Load factor fell to 52.1% from 53.1%.  Separately, America West Airlines, Phoenix, said its August traffic increased 12.9% to 725.9 million revenue passenger miles from 642.1 million revenue passenger miles a year earlier.  Load factor fell to 62.2% from 65.3% last August.  For the first eight months of the year, the carrier flew about five billion miles, up roughly 6.9% from about 4.58 billion revenue passenger miles flown last year.  Load factor was 57.8%, compared with 58.2%.  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills decreased 0.6% last week to 1,695,000 tons from 1,706,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output fell 11.8% from the 1,921,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 76.3% of its capability last week, compared with 76.8% the previous week and 90.1% a year ago.  The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to Sept. 9 ............ 1,695,000 76.3%  @ Week to Sept. 2 ............ 1,706,000 76.8%  @ Year to date ............... 69,240,000 86.5%  @ Year earlier to date ....... 69,282,000 89.5%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  Ferranti International Signal PLC said it is reviewing the value of some overseas contracts, prompting market speculation that the troubled British company plans a big write-off.  Ferranti, the United Kingdom's third-biggest defense electronics company, halted trading of its stock yesterday to announce the unusual contract review.  It called the questioned contracts "of a material size."  It said it plans to adjourn its annual shareholders meeting, scheduled for today, until after the internal audit is completed.  The news added to Ferranti's rapidly mounting woes.  A subject of takeover rumors for months, the company recently posted an 18% slump in pretax earnings, to #55.8 million ($85.8 million) in the year ended last March 31.  It cited mounting contract costs, competition and high interest rates.  Also in recent weeks, it lost an important British military radar contract.  And contracting delays by four European governments building a common fighter plane have frustrated Ferranti's hopes for an #800 million-plus contract to supply radar for those planes.  The contract audit may temporarily chase away any potential bidder for Ferranti, valued at #550 million based on yesterday's pre-suspension price of 73.5 pence ($1.13) a share on London's Stock Exchange.  "Most people will stay clear of Ferranti" until the extent of the contracting problem is known, said London-based analyst Martin Mabbutt of Nomura Research Institute.  The news, he added, confirms recent market fears that a number of Ferranti contracts and contract bids may be running into trouble.  The questioned contracts appeared to be among a handful of large weapons orders received by a unit of the former International Signal & Control Group PLC, an international weapons and electronics contractor with which Ferranti merged last year.  The unit, ISC Technologies Ltd. in Hanworth, England, had booked substantial military contracts with Nigeria, the United Arab Emirates, Iraq and China in recent years.  London analysts speculated the review focuses on an approximately $450 million ISC contract to supply missiles to the United Arab Emirates.  A Ferranti spokesman confirmed the contract review centers on ISC Technologies, but declined to comment further.  Typically, contractors book much of the estimated value of such contracts as an asset, and then credit a portion each year to their earnings -- even though actual cash payments on the contract may lag behind.  An earnings charge would result if a company discovered it had overestimated a contract's value and credited too much profit.  With Ferranti mum, London analysts guessed wildly at the size of any earnings charges that might result from the review.  Their estimates started at #15 million and exceeded #100 million.  Salomon Brothers Inc. appointed Ronald M. Freeman to head its European investment banking operations.  An announcement is expected later this week.  Salomon thus becomes the latest U.S. investment bank to name a senior person to head European operations, with a view to capitalizing on the brisk merger activity in Britain and on the Continent.  Mr. Freeman, 50 years old, had headed international mergers and acquisition operations in New York.  In his new London-based job, he will be responsible for all European corporate finance and mergers and acquisitions.  The position has been vacant since C. Daniel Tyree was transferred to New York earlier this summer to head a new high-yield department.  In an interview, Mr. Freeman said that the European mergers market "feels like it's moving up," whereas the U.S. market "feels flattish."  The European market, he added, should continue strong "because it isn't as dependent on junk bonds and precarious financing as the U.S. market is."  Mr. Freeman, who joined the firm in 1973, is known on Wall Street as a Salomon loyalist unafraid to speak his mind when he feels the firm is taking a wrong tack.  He opposed Salomon's rapid expansion in the mid-1980s and its plans for an expensive new headquarters in New York.  The expansion proved too ambitious in the light of the 1987 market crash, and Salomon underwent a broad retrenchment, which included scrapping plans for a new building.  "Nobody likes a Cassandra," he quipped.  "I try not to overuse that privilege."  BERRY PETROLEUM Co., Taft, Calif., increased its semiannual dividend to 55 cents a share from 50 cents and declared a 2-for-1 stock split.  The oil and natural gas production and exploration concern said the cash dividend is payable Sept. 29 to stock of record Sept. 18.  The split is payable Oct. 27 to stock of record Oct. 6.  Edmund H. Fording Jr., 52 years old, was named president of the U.S. dye division of this specialty chemicals and equipment maker, a new position.  He had been general manager of the dyes division of Hilton-Davis Co.  Jack Listanowsky was named to the newly created post of executive vice president of manufacturing and operations at this apparel company.  He had been senior vice president of operations in knitwear and woven wear.  General Dynamics Corp. won a $149.9 million Air Force contract for aircraft parts.  Phoenix Petroleum Co. was given a $38.7 million Defense Logistics agency contract for jet fuel, and Laketon Refining Corp. won a $10.1 million contract for jet fuel.  The Air Force awarded contracts for command control communications and intelligence systems to: Sumaria Systems Inc., $32.9 million; Dynamics Research Corp., $30.5 million; Systems Resources Corp., $29.4 million; Analytical Systems Engineering Corp., $27.7 million; and Horizons Technology Inc., $26.3 million.  Link Flight Simulation Corp. was given a $13.4 million Navy contract for UH-60 Desert Hawk flight simulator equipment.  M.A. Mortenson Co. got a $12 million Army contract for construction of B-2 aircraft support facilities.  Charles A. Heimbold Jr., Michael E. Autera and Wayne A. Davidson were elected executive vice presidents of this health-care products company.  Each had been a senior vice president.  Mr. Heimbold remains responsible for the consumer products and health-care groups, in addition to the planning and development divisions.  Mr. Autera remains in charge of administration and takes the added responsibility of chief financial officer.  Mr. Davidson keeps his current responsibilities for the U.S. pharmaceutical and nutritional groups and the international and science and technology groups.  "Sometimes we look at each other going up on stage, and I count off everyone -- there's Mick, there's Charlie, Bill, there's Ronnie, there's me -- you mean it all rests on this tiny bunch of guys?" says Keith Richards, sitting in the depths of a sold-out Exhibition Stadium an hour before showtime.  Even if you didn't see him smoking the ever-present Marlboro, downing the ever-present bourbon, the deeply lined face would testify to more than a typical 45 years' mileage.  Smaller than he appears on stage, Richards comes across as more vulnerable, much warmer than his paint-it-black reputation.  "We're just ordinary guys that do our stuff," he continues earnestly, "but put us together and for some reason or other it becomes a force on its own, a magnetic attraction."  A quarter-century since Richards, his childhood mate and future songwriting partner Mick Jagger and some other British R&B fanciers first made music together, the force is still with them.  Between now and New Year's three million people will pack stadiums in the U.S. and Canada to see their band, the Rolling Stones, for the first time since 1981 -- and possibly the last.  Not bad for a bunch of guys who, in Jagger's words, "still make the same noises as they did 20 years ago."  But if the sound of the band that helped put the sex and drugs into rock 'n' roll hasn't changed, other things have, as Jagger observed earlier in a non-smoking suite at the Stones' elegant hotel.  On this tour, for example, a reserved seating policy is in effect for the first time, so fans don't have to stampede hours before showtime to stake out their places in the stadium.  "I think it's going to get to the point where they'll have tables with tablecloths and waitresses serving," Jagger deadpans.  "I mean they do stand on the seats, but it's very different playing to reserved seating, it's getting rock and roll's just become so civilized."  Well, as somebody once said, you can't always get what you want.  But the band does seem to have had its way with Toronto-based promoter Michael Cohl, whose contract with them includes marketing an extensive Rolling Stones fashion collection -- and a guarantee Jagger describes as "in the region of" $65 million.  Despite such high stakes, as recently as last year a Stones reunion seemed extremely improbable.  Jagger's decision to go solo instead of touring with the band following the release of its 1986 album, "Dirty Work," created a very public rift between him and Richards.  The acrimony increased when Jagger and his backup group did a lucrative Japanese and Australian tour -- playing mostly Stones songs.  "We were doing stadiums, and if you don't play old songs in stadiums, witness as you'll see tonight, forget it," Jagger drawls, resting one foot in its creamy Moroccan-style slipper on the marble coffee table.  "The larger the place, the more you've got to play what people know." (Indeed of the 27 songs the Stones perform during a two-hour-plus set, only three are from their new album.)  The split kicked Richards into action.  First the guitarist organized a band for a documentary saluting Chuck Berry, his inspiration.  Then last year he and members of that group including his new collaborator Steve Jordan released a hard-rocking album, "Talk Is Cheap" (Virgin), and successfully toured as the X-Pensive Winos.  Critics, who'd given a polite reception to Jagger's two technopop efforts, did cartwheels over "Talk Is Cheap."  Whether or not this was a catalyst, by January the reconciled "Glimmer Twins" had decided to tour.  Which meant that in order to have "product," a group that routinely took 18 months per album was going to have to crank one out in a third the time.  "Steel Wheels" (Columbia) is that album.  It's like an aging locomotive straining to meet a timetable -- you can hear the haste.  Not in the performances, but in the lazy songwriting -- particularly the forced bridges with their crude, abrupt changes -- and the even sloppier lyrics.  The album is not without its moments.  One of them is "Slipping Away," the ballad with intimations of mortality Richards huskily sings.  The other is the bittersweet "Almost Hear You Sigh."  Here everything fits together -- the edge in Jagger's voice, the wavelike question-and-answer pattern of both vocals and instrumentation, the repeated rhythmic figures that create the kind of seductive groove that characterizes the Stones' best work.  But the bulk of "Steel Wheels" is derivative.  The rocker "Hold on to Your Hat" sounds like second-rate Aerosmith.  The most interesting feature of "Break the Spell" is a descending bass line that could have been lifted from "These Boots Are Made for Walkin'."  Even the most unexpected cut, "Continental Drift," with its vortex of North African pipes and drums, uses the same group of Moroccan musicians recorded in 1969 by the late, founding Stone Brian Jones.  Guitar-driven chargers like "Sad Sad Sad" give you the sound of late-sixties Stones, the band's creative climax, with none of the fury that came from Jagger's lyrics.  It's hard to believe that the same man who penned "Sympathy for the Devil" or "Street Fighting Man" wrote: "Now you're sad sad sad/Mad mad mad/Sad sad sad/But you're gonna be fine."  But it's not "Steel Wheels" that's brought 60,000 people here on a balmy Sunday night.  As Jagger well knows, they want satisfaction of another sort.  Around 8:45 a tape of the pulse-quickening drums from "Continental Drift" brings the fans up on top of their chairs.  Flash pots explode.  Orange smoke billows.  It clears to reveal -- poof] -- the Rolling Stones.  The set is gargantuan, four stories of corroded scaffolding, orange girders and steam vents representing an abandoned steel mill that might easily dwarf any group of less mythic proportions.  Though the image is one of decay, the Stones make it clear by the ferocity with which they rip through the opener, "Start Me Up," that there's no rust on their wheels.  At 46 Jagger, in Joker-evoking green tails and tight black pants, still gyrates enough to do his father the phys-ed instructor proud. (Because of the bad sightlines, even as close as the 26th row you have to watch the two giant video screens flanking the stage to see.) While the stationary Stones, drummer Charlie Watts and statuelike bassist Bill Wyman, hold down the bottom, Richards is also a man in motion.  He ambles among the band members like a cocktail-party host eager to see that his guests are having a good time.  Early on when Richards nods Ron Wood forward for a solo, it becomes apparent he's letting his fellow guitarist take the spotlight tonight.  It's a treat to hear the often-overlooked Wood's crisp, phrased breaks, but disappointing there's little of the fluid give-and-take between the two guitarists that can make this band smoke.  And much of Richards's rhythmic crunch is swallowed in the murky sound mix.  Strong-voiced ringmaster Jagger keeps the show going, from the bluesy strut of "Harlem Shuffle," in which he bumps and grinds with the three backup vocalists, to the stadium-wide singalong "Ruby Tuesday."  He knows just which buttons to push to animate the crowd.  "To-ron-to," he intones woodenly, to massive applause.  Referring to the band's encounter with Margaret Trudeau the last time they toured these parts -- a stay which also saw the heroin bust that led to Richards conquering that addiction -- Jagger continues: "I was a bit worried when I saw Mrs. Mulroney backstage, but everything's cool."  The cheers might have carried all the way to Quebec, where Canada's First Lady really was.  The program is heavy on the hits, which is fitting for a band justly celebrated for its singles.  But the wild cards, like the rousing neocountry "Dead Flowers" or the spookily psychedelic "2000 Light Years From Home," show the Stones weren't always "only rock and roll."  And that wasn't all.  True to Jagger's philosophy that "you can't go into a stadium with just a tent and a couple of speakers, you've got to make as much of a splash as possible," this is a three-ring circus of a show.  During an incendiary "Honky Tonk Women," the stadium explodes as two 55-foot-tall babes inflate on either side of the stage.  Then, toward the end of the concert, a beam spotlights the very top of the set, 130 feet high.  Amid a cloud of steam emerges Jagger, now in a devil-red jacket.  "Please allow me to introduce myself," he begins to sing, "I'm a man of wealth and taste . . ."  Jay M. Haft was named chairman of the executive committee of this maker of consumer electronics.  Mr. Haft, a senior partner in the New York law firm of Parker, Duryee, Rosoff and Haft, remains an Emerson director.  He will assist in developing long-range strategy, including acquisition and merger opportunities, and will work on special projects.  Landmark Savings Association said it has purchased a $135 million mortgage loan servicing portfolio from Mellon Bank Corp. Terms weren't disclosed.  The purchase includes more than 3,000 first mortgage loans.  The two concerns are based here.  Richard I. Tanaka was elected chairman and chief executive officer of this data-entry systems maker.  He fills the posts left vacant by the February resignation of Jean M. Belhumeur Jr. Mr. Tanaka was president of Lundy Electronics & Systems Inc., a subsidiary of TransTechnology Corp.  Vincent Tan, a Malaysian investor, acquired a 7.8% stake in Heilig-Meyers Co. and said he may seek to acquire the operator retail furniture stores.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Mr. Tan said he holds 828,000 Heilig-Meyers common shares purchased between July 11 and Sept. 1 at $18.50 to $22.38 a share.  According to the filing, Tan purchased the shares in anticipation of discussing the possibility of acquiring Heilig-Meyers, which is based in Richmond, Va.  Mr. Tan added that he may seek to buy additional shares from time to time.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Heilig-Meyers closed at $24.875, up 12.5 cents.  Richard Daddario was named senior vice president and corporate controller, a new post at this insurance and financial services firm.  He had been vice president and corporate controller of Primerica Corp. Louis J. LaFontaine was named senior vice president for human resources and corporate communications.  He had been executive vice president of administration at Mack Trucks Inc.  And K. Rone Baldwin was named to the new post of vice president of corporate development.  He had been a vice president in the mergers and acquisitions department of Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Entrants in a beauty contest here won't run out of steam while blowing their own horns.  But will their tooting qualify as singing for the talent category?  That's one of the hullish problems facing Bert Parks.  The longtime prince of pulchritude will play host tomorrow as 12 prettily decked-out tugboats test the waters at Jersey City's answer to the Miss America pageant.  "I've been judging tugboats for years," jokes the chipper 74-year-old entertainer. ("That's not true, but I couldn't resist," he adds.)  The war of tugs, sponsored by area developers, is part of festivities celebrating the modernization of a station on the commuter rail line linking New Jersey and New York City.  The winner will receive $2,500 and a special nautical flag.  "Beauty" contest tugs will be judged from stem to stern, but it will be shipshape, not shape, that will turn heads on the Hudson.  Rich Pittner, of Eklof Marine Corp., which is entering the tug Scandia, says, "You have to take into account colors, general appearance and conditioning."  Janet Poling Mahland, owner and president of Poling Transportation Corp. and something of an anomaly in a male-dominated industry, is entering the Rebecca P., a tug painted blue, yellow and white.  "I never heard a tug called pretty until I brought her out," says Mrs. Mahland.  "I was the first one in the harbor to have a crazy paint job."  Others, once skeptical, followed suit.  Among other factors to be considered by the judges, who will include the mayor of Jersey City and a Coast Guard captain, are "decorations, cleanliness, maneuverability and charm," says Laurie Masur of Harborside Financial Center, a sponsor.  Charm?  "I guess it's just something you have to see," says Ms. Masur.  Mr. Parks, who has played host to everything from mother-daughter beauty pageants to cat contests, says the timing of the tugboat contest, just days before the Miss America pageant that he emceed for 25 years, doesn't bother him.  "Nothing is strange for me anymore," says Mr. Parks.  He adds that he turned down an "awful lot of money" to emcee a bikini contest on the same night as the Miss America pageant.  "I have my reputation to think of, you know."  When he began his rescue mission at Kloeckner Humboldt-Deutz AG in August 1987, Kajo Neukirchen found the world's first four-stroke engine in the company's museum and a time bomb in its balance sheet.  "It was a company without financial substance and many of the assets were dogs," the KHD chairman says.  "I've never seen the like."  The machinery and engineering group was tapping rainy-day assets to plug operating losses.  Short-term bank debt was piling up while sales and employee morale slumped.  When KHD closed the 1987 year with a loss of 285 million German marks ($143 million), a number of competitors were rumored to be circling, waiting to pick through the pieces.  The newly arrived Mr. Neukirchen couldn't even find a reliable consolidated balance sheet because one didn't exist.  He figured he had only a few months to begin making changes before banks started pulling in credit lines.  Today, although many problems remain, Mr. Neukirchen's painful overhaul has begun to pay off.  By last May, a leaner KHD had reversed years of operating losses, and the company expects to post modest net income this year.  Sales have stabilized at around 4.5 billion marks, helped by incentives for sales people and motivation courses for managers.  Staffers give Mr. Neukirchen most of the credit for the turnaround.  "We now have a concept," says one KHD manager.  "For the first time in years, people here sense they're being led."  Harald Schmidt, an analyst for Commerzbank AG in Frankfurt, praises the KHD chief's performance so far but cautions it is too early to declare his efforts a success.  "Neukirchen has been making the right changes," Mr. Schmidt says.  "But four or five years will tell whether {KHD} can sustain a good profit level."  Mr. Neukirchen was the chairman of SKF G.m.b.H., the West German unit of Sweden's SKF AB ball-bearing maker, when KHD recruited him as deputy chairman in August 1987.  Five months later, then-chairman Bodo Liebe was gone, in one of the more startling management shake-ups seen at a large West German industrial company.  Of KHD's eight-man board, only one -- the personnel officer -- survived the purge.  Mr. Neukirchen, 47 years old, often is described as a standout among the nation's new generation of senior managers.  A West German business magazine recently described him as a "West German Iacocca," referring to the Chrysler Corp. chairman who led the U.S. auto maker's turnaround earlier in the decade.  KHD's work force bore the brunt of the reforms, falling to a projected 18,000 by the end of this year from a peak of 30,000 in 1985.  The cuts have resulted in annual savings of about 740 million marks.  KHD's housecleaning, which dominated the company's 1988 business year, has included the following:  Divestitures: Last year KHD gained 192 million marks from property sales and the discovery of hidden reserves at its Spanish units.  The group also sold several unprofitable units.  Write-downs in the U.S.: KHD's extensive U.S. operations have been posting losses since the company acquired Allis Chalmers Corp.'s farm-equipment group in 1985, one of KHD's investments now criticized by Mr. Neukirchen as a chronic loss maker.  Last year, KHD wrote down the book value of KHD Deutz of America Corp. and provided additional funds to restructure the unit.  Low-cost procurement: KHD switched its purchases of materials and parts in West Germany to lower-cost countries.  In 1988, for example, the company began buying piston rings from Brazil, ball-bearings from Poland, fuel pumps from Spain and cast iron from Yugoslavia.  Tighter finances: KHD's cash flow, at a deficit of 174 million marks in 1987, swung to a surplus of 92 million marks in 1988, and the trend is expected to continue this year as costs and debt servicing shrink.  In 1988, KHD reported consolidated earnings for the first time.  The group's loss narrowed to 75 million marks from 285 million marks a year earlier on unchanged sales of 4.5 billion marks.  The loss for the first half of this year shrank by two-thirds to 30 million marks from 90 million marks a year earlier.  Despite the improving fortunes, the outlook for the company remains clouded.  Securities experts are wary of medium-term prospects.  "The long series of losses has weakened KHD's financial foundation, which increases risks if the economy begins to slow down," said Mr. Schmidt, the Commerzbank analyst.  Mr. Neukirchen himself speaks of frustrations.  "Too many past investments were made in retreating markets such as farm equipment or iron forges, instead of new products," he says.  Moreover, even as demand for capital goods is booming in West Germany, and competitors such as MAN AG are reporting record sales and earnings, KHD is struggling through its recovery program.  "It would have been preferable if our restructuring had been done four years ago," Mr. Neukirchen says.  Still, the market seems optimistic about KHD. Though the company hasn't issued a dividend since 1986 and isn't expected to resume payments for years, KHD stock has climbed above 200 marks from as low as 82 marks early last year. (It fell 11 marks yesterday to 203 marks on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange.)  Deutsche Bank AG has held at least a 30% stake in KHD since it took over Kloeckner & Co. in a rescue move in October 1988.  The bank retained its stake after agreeing this year to sell Kloeckner to Viag AG, but has indicated that it plans to sell the holding, presumably when KHD is back on its feet.  Analysts note KHD's problem areas such as farm equipment, which still accounts for a third of group sales, and the smaller industrial-plant division, which last year posted a 34% drop in sales.  On the brighter side, the largest of KHD's three major divisions, its engines-and-turbine unit with 2.38 billion marks in sales, looks promising.  Management is stressing new product development in the division, particularly environmental safeguards, and recently introduced a series of air-cooled engines.  First Carolina Investors Inc. lowered its stake in United Financial Corp. of South Carolina Inc. to 5.1% of its common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, First Carolina said it sold 89,000 shares of United Financial from Aug. 4 to Sept. 6 at $14.25 to $14.75 a share.  First Carolina now holds 100,000 shares of United Financial common.  First Carolina didn't give a reason in the filing for reducing its United Financial holdings.  First Carolina is based in Charlotte, N.C., and United Financial is based in Greenwood, S.C.  Joseph J. Grano Jr. was elected to the board of this marketer of oil and natural gas partnerships, increasing board membership to 11.  Mr. Grano is president of retail sales and marketing for PaineWebber Inc.  Florida Progress Corp. signed a definitive agreement to sell its Better Business Forms Inc. unit to an Irish printing company.  The price wasn't disclosed.  The utility holding company said it expects to close the transaction with a subsidiary of Clondalkin Group PLC prior to Sept. 30.  The after-tax gain on the sale will add about $6 million, or 12 cents a share, to third-quarter profit, a Florida Progress spokesman added.  A year earlier the company earned $60 million, or $1.18 a share, after a one-time charge of eight cents a share.  Jack B. Critchfield, president of Florida Progress, said Better Business Forms, which manufactures and distributes business forms throughout the Southeast, "isn't part of our future diversification strategy."  A documentary about the workings of a classical music quartet sounds a little like eating oatmeal for breakfast: nourishing, virtuous and maybe even tasty (with enough raisins and brown sugar) -- but you know you'd have a better time with pancakes.  So Allan Miller's latest music documentary, "High Fidelity: The Adventures of the Guarneri Quartet," may have the mixed appeal of oatmeal (so good for you, but . . .). Yet this delightful peek into the musical and personal dynamics of a spirited foursome turns out to be just great fun, not the least bit fusty.  Mr. Miller, who has been a conductor and the musical director of New York's public television station, has spent much of his professional life figuring out the best way to get across on film the experience of listening to music, and playing it.  He's made several television features to that end over the years, never trying to re-create concerts but, rather, attempting to convey both the way musicians approach their work and the way audiences receive it.  He's best known for his Academy Award winning treatment of Isaac Stern's 1979 China tour, "From Mao to Mozart: Isaac Stern in China."  For a study of chamber music dynamics he couldn't have picked a better subject than the Guarneri Quartet, the Grateful Dead of the classical music world.  The quartet has been together for 25 years, and its concerts still sell out around the world.  It has been the subject of television and radio shows, and of three books.  The quartet's musicianship is impeccable, intimate and ecstatic.  But what makes it so eminently watchable on film are the members' personalities.  These men are true showmen, when playing to their audiences and when playing to the camera (and one senses the offstage show continues even when the camera isn't watching).  Mr. Miller doesn't waste a lot of time forcing the Guarneris to woodenly postulate their theories of musicology.  Instead, he shows them in action -- rehearsing, traveling, socializing, checking into hotels, concertizing and, most frequently, complaining.  Jackie Mason could learn a thing or two from these "kvetchmeisters."  During a postmortem on a televised concert in Germany, they complain about the glaring lights ("If I was in the audience I would have left," snorts cellist David Soyer).  They save their big needles for each other.  Mr. Soyer chides two of his colleagues for talking about the Mets when they're gliding through Venice on a gondola.  Mostly, however, they argue about music.  "Arnold, you're making a glissando that isn't very nice," says viola player Michael Tree, who later explains: "All of us have felt leaned on or persecuted."  These four urbane men have very distinctive personalities, which emerge forcefully.  First violinist Arnold Steinhardt has the handsome high-strung quality of an overbred racehorse; one thinks of him as Prince Arnold.  He's the one who seems most at home during the required socializing, nobly playing with toy guns at a sponsor's Southern barbecue, receiving medals from government officials in Prague.  Mr. Soyer, the cellist, is rumpled and wry.  Long ago he took a crack at the secular music world, playing backup to Frank Sinatra, Nat King Cole and Billie Holiday.  Mr. Tree, on viola, passes for the group scholar, with his penchant for argumentative fine-tuning.  Cutest and most elusive is violinist John Dalley, a twinkling elf who amuses himself by keeping his whereabouts on tour secret until just before showtime.  Mr. Miller doesn't dwell on the quartet's extra-Guarneri life.  However, his cameras pop in on the musicians' attractive families and their extremely comfortable homes.  Clearly the money isn't bad.  The director also interviews their manager, who describes his clients as a "major force in the marketplace."  He seems sad that they are "reluctant" to play more than 100 concerts a year.  Don't think that the music plays second fiddle to the personality probe of these engaging and amusing fellows.  It's always there, in both background and foreground, resonating so perfectly you'd like to think of yet another documentary, celebrating the Guarneris' 50th year together.  Dunkin' Donuts Inc. rejected a $45-a-share, or $268 million, hostile bid from a partnership led by Unicorp Canada Corp. and said it is exploring alternatives, including a possible sale to a third party.  Richard N. Hart, vice president and treasurer, said that a leveraged buy-out is among the options under consideration.  He added that the company has not started talks with potential buyers.  Dunkin' Donuts shares rose sharply following the statement.  The stock closed at $45.25, up $4.25, in national over-the-counter trading.  In its statement, Dunkin' Donuts called the offer "inadequate" and said that it would, together with financial adviser Goldman, Sachs & Co., "explore whether or not shareholder values would be maximized by remaining independent or by any alternatives which may become available to the company, including an acquisition of the company by a third party."  No potential buyers were identified.  Efforts to reach a spokesman for the Unicorp partnership were unavailing.  The hostile bid was launched by Toronto-based Unicorp and Cara Operations Ltd. in June.  The initial bid of $43 a share was raised to $45 last month.  In a statement, Robert M. Rosenberg, Dunkin' Donuts' chairman and chief executive, said the $45-a-share offer "does not reflect the maximum value achievable for our stockholders."  He said the company's advisers were directed to explore all alternatives "including remaining independent or the possible sale of Dunkin' Donuts, on terms that will realize value for all of our stockholders in excess of that currently offered" by the Unicorp partnership.  Myron A. Roeder was named vice president of the Tropicana Products Inc. division and president of its newly formed international division, based in Tropicana's Bradenton, Fla., headquarters.  Mr. Roeder has been president of Seagram Europe since 1984.  Joseph E. Seagram & Sons is a unit of Seagram Co. of Canada, and has interests in distilled spirits, wines and soft drinks.  Appearing often in Harper's, The Atlantic Monthly and other national magazines, Annie Dillard contributes to a literary genre with a very long history in America: nature writing.  Like Gretel Ehrlich and Barry Lopez, Ms. Dillard has modernized this genre, once dominated by the spirit of Thoreau, which expresses itself in a freeform series of philosophical observations provoked by what might be called the unbuilt environment.  She writes other kinds of books as well, including poetry, memoirs and literary criticism, but Ms. Dillard's nature writing in her 1974 book, "Pilgrim at Tinker Creek," is what made her a book-world luminary.  "Pilgrim" is the record of the time Ms. Dillard spent in Virginia observing the plant and animal life surrounding her house at Tinker Creek.  This book has charmed even the most skeptical of readers; it is both mystical and rooted in reality, both extremely odd and quite beautiful.  It works because Ms. Dillard manages to go from epiphany to epiphany without exhausting her prose, and because her fictional "pilgrim" self seems genuine: The book never pretends to be about anything other than the natural world and what Annie Dillard makes of it.  It cannot be said that Ms. Dillard has carried this energy, or this integrity, into her latest book, "The Writing Life" (Harper & Row, 111 pages, $15.95).  Ms. Dillard asserts on the jacket, in a bit of self-advertising, "This book recounts what the actual process of writing feels like -- feels like inside the mind at work.  It tells a complex story.  It offers bits of technical information.  It shows the writer teetering at the tip of the line of words.  This is not a meditation -- God save us from meditations -- but a dispatch from the desk.  It is about work."  We may assume from this auto-blurb, then, that "The Writing Life" is a handbook for writers, full of practical advice and encouragement.  But rather than "telling a complex story" while offering "bits of technical information," "The Writing Life" seems to be mostly about the various offices and study rooms Ms. Dillard has occupied during her career as a writer.  In a rustic cabin with a stunning view of Puget Sound and in a computerized shed on Cape Cod, she has awaited her muse.  "Like a plane's cockpit, it is crammed bulkhead to bulkhead with high-tech equipment," Ms. Dillard says of her Cape Cod retreat.  It is difficult to persevere in such environments, she tells us quite a few times.  "Every morning," writes Ms. Dillard in her favorite second-person point of view, "you climb several flights of stairs, enter your study, open the French doors, and slide your desk chair out into the middle of the air."  Ms. Dillard's use of the second person in this quotation is most unfortunate, assuming her "you" means me.  As it happens, I am writing this review on my bed in my one-room apartment in Hoboken, N.J., trying to block out the noise of jackhammers in the street below, and I cannot for the life of me imagine what happened to those French doors she claims I must open.  Fortunately, it doesn't seem to matter after all: "Appealing workplaces are to be avoided.  One wants a room with no view. . . ."  Saved by writerly contradiction, I sigh with relief.  My point here is not to call attention to myself, but to suggest that a writer who is not as illustrious as Ms. Dillard -- a writer, that is, who would most benefit from a handbook about writing -- is not going to be greatly aided in her literary efforts by extended descriptions of cabins on windswept islands or by being urged to open, metaphorically or literally, her French doors.  It seems clear that a more beneficial handbook would offer as "technical information" something other than a description of the author's home furnishings.  It would treat a writer as a person, rather than drawing analogies between a writer and an inchworm "leading its dimwit life."  It would present, by way of "a dispatch from the desk," something more than dimwitted illuminations.  Of these, there are many in this book: "When you write, you lay out a line of words"; "Putting a book together is interesting and exhilarating"; "How we spend our days is, of course, how we spend our lives.  What we do with this hour, and that one, is what we are doing."  In pretending that "The Writing Life" was composed to help other writers, Annie Dillard has perpetrated a counterfeit.  And it is a counterfeit, moreover, issued by a poor forger, because all one needs to do to identify the fake is to hold it up against the genuine effort of "Pilgrim at Tinker Creek."  Where "Pilgrim" gave us a series of personal discoveries, "The Writing Life" reels off false ones.  Where "Pilgrim" used descriptions of natural phenomena -- sycamore trees or horsehair worms -- in a way that gave nature a powerful, often brutal dignity, "The Writing Life" makes comparisons between writers' lives and those of honey bees, butterflies and starfish in a manner that belittles every link in the food chain.  Where Ms. Dillard's "Pilgrim" persona was a generous intermediary between the reader and the outside world, the lone character in "The Writing Life" gingerly emits a series of banalities that, for all her bold intentions, are strangely beside the point.  "Pilgrim at Tinker Creek" revealed profound secrets within everyday observations.  "The Writing Life" has precious little to offer in spite of its grandiloquence.  ---  Ms. Rifkind is assistant managing editor of The New Criterion magazine.  These are lean times on the Tokyo Stock Exchange, but many stock analysts here couldn't be happier.  For while share turnover and sales have shrunk recently, analysts are ascendant.  "Research is suddenly the order of the day," boasts Paul Heaton, a banking and financial analyst at W.I. Carr (Overseas) Ltd.  And many of the top analysts work for foreign firms, which say research is boosting their business.  Nowadays, instead of just pouring money into big-name stocks and riding the world's biggest market, Japan's major institutional investors are scouting for sound, smaller stocks that promise to outperform the now-sluggish mainstays.  Finding such stocks in an equity market bursting with thousands of issues takes some careful bloodhound work.  And that's where analysts come in.  "We're in a fundamental market," says an analyst at Daiwa Securities Co.  By looking at the growth prospects and explaining the business of many of Japan's less-well-known companies, analysts can bring a stock to the attention of investors.  This might seem mundane to American investors, but it's a bit of a revelation in Tokyo.  Evidence of just how much attention investors pay to analysts is visible in the footprints stock analysts' recommendations leave on some share prices.  On July 31, Salomon Brothers Asia Inc. issued an internal buy recommendation to its brokers on a small pharmaceutical company with strong growth prospects, Hokuriku Seiyaku Co. Shortly before the recommendation came out, Hokuriku's share price was steady at about 2,900 yen ($19.73).  By Sept. 1, it had rocketed to 4,000 yen.  Salomon doesn't claim all the credit for the rise, but the firm's head of research, Jeffrey D. Hanna, admits that bringing a company's virtues to light can help.  "You have to have a story to tell," he says.  A key factor behind investors' mounting interest in research is the shrinking volume on the stock exchange.  Time was when the sheer weight of money in the market was enough to ensure higher stock prices.  The major Japanese brokerage houses would simply channel the heavy flows of retail and institutional money into the big stocks they wanted to promote, and the key market indexes would rise.  "For the past three years, liquidity was so big you didn't have to think about the stocks themselves," says Yoichiro Asakura, a fund manager at Mitsui Mutual Life Insurance Co.  "You just bought the big ones."  It's not the first time analysts have been in vogue here.  Five years ago, during a long slowdown in the market, analysts enjoyed modest attention but were overshadowed ultimately by the stock market's ensuing powerful rally.  Now, their renaissance seems to have arrived.  In April, Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Japan's biggest daily business newspaper, printed its first-ever rating of top analysts.  Although Japan's major brokerage houses still dominate turnover in the country's financial markets, nearly half of the top 116 analysts and economists included in the rating worked for foreign firms.  And many of those analysts were at the top of their categories.  While Japanese brokerages provide comprehensive analysis of many companies, foreign firms are skipping ahead with research tailored to investors who are doing computer-aided or sector-specific investing.  The firms' claim that research is boosting their business is apparently supported by statistics.  In August, foreign firms accounted for a record 7.5% of all turnover on the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  A few months ago, Kyoko Sarayama's boss was up for a raise.  She felt he deserved a bigger one.  So the 25-year-old ODS Corp. staffer did what any of her co-workers would do under the circumstances: She stood up at ODS's annual salary meeting and treated all 250 of the company's employees to an account of his "high management ability."  After a long dispute, her colleagues granted the boss a substantially larger increase.  At any other business, a companywide debate over salaries (not to mention devotion like Ms. Sarayama's) might seem astonishing, even surreal.  But at Tokyo-based ODS, such corporate encounter groups are an everyday occurrence.  The privately held research, consulting and advertising concern operates the way business mythology says most Japanese companies operate, but few actually do -- by strict consensus.  Indeed, ODS takes the concept to a new extreme.  Workers have a say in everything from office smoking hours and tardiness rules to approval of board members and allocation of profits.  Just about the only thing they don't have a say in is whether to have a say.  "This is a place where people gathered to try to become happy," says Takahiro Yamaguchi, the company's charismatic 53-year-old president.  An avid windsurfer and a former psychology student, Mr. Yamaguchi founded ODS 20 years ago as an importer of English-language technical manuals.  He believes that both happiness and business success stem from letting employees choose for themselves.  "We have to decide everything concerning us by ourselves," he declares, adding that to decide, one must discuss.  Discuss they do.  ODS employees, most of them young job-hoppers who have left posts at mainstream companies to find greater stimulation and fulfillment, regularly crowd into a desk-packed room for marathon talkfests.  Besides the big meetings every April and October, at which broader management issues are hashed out, there are weekly all-employee meetings to discuss company rules.  There are also managers' meetings to plot strategies, section meetings to talk about sales and team meetings to go over special projects.  The typical employee spends as much as seven hours a week hunkered down in these sessions and often (voluntarily) works late into the night to make up the time.  Red eyes aren't the only health risk.  One tired official, who made a sudden move after sitting stiffly through a lengthy meeting, had to be hospitalized with a pulled back muscle.  "The Japanese are amazed that a company like this exists in Japan," says Kimindo Kusaka, head of the Softnomics Center, a Japanese management-research organization.  The heart of Mr. Yamaguchi's philosophy can be glimpsed in what might be called the Rubbish Rule.  "If you see a scrap of paper on the floor," he explains, "the best thing to do is pick it up and tell people that the scrap was there.  The second-best thing is to tell people that it was there but not pick it up.  The worst thing is to pick it up and not tell anyone about it."  Despite this insistence on chatter -- or perhaps because of it -- ODS is a booming success.  Sales for the year ended March 31 reached 5.5 billion yen (about $38 million), up 20% from the previous year and double the amount of three years ago.  Such major companies as Sony Corp. and Shiseido Co. are flocking to ODS for product designs and company logos.  Some clients have even embraced bits and pieces of ODS's management style.  Three years ago Nippon Ham Co. decided to buy into ODS's vision of corporate utopia.  At the morning meeting, workers now chant the Nippon Ham philosophy, which is based on the ODS teaching that "the company is a place where employees seek true happiness and satisfaction."  However, Nippon Ham isn't about to start debating such things as workers' pay.  Says Yoichi Uehara, a spokesman for the big food concern, "It's not something everyone can imitate."  It's easy to see why.  Ms. Sarayama's first annual all-company salary meeting lasted a week.  At such gatherings, workers pore over the salary budget and rankings proposed by top managers.  The dissatisfied try to persuade other workers to give them a higher ranking.  They argue and they vote, and if that doesn't work, they seek the president's advice.  At her meeting, Ms. Sarayama recalls, "I was asked what happiness meant to me."  She says she was so flustered that she now forgets her reply, which spurred hours of debate about the future of workers and the company.  She adds that she remembers thinking, "What a strange company this is."  To enforce the rules set by discussion, workers form monitor groups that, not surprisingly, meet on a regular basis.  The sloppily dressed are policed by the company's "trendy workshop," which tells slobs that they should pull themselves together, and may even recommend new places to shop.  Workers with tardiness problems must report in early for a week to seek "recovery," or forgiveness.  Like sinners at a fundamentalist revival meeting, some transgressors start confessing before their critics even say a word.  At one recent weekly meeting, Tohru Hirose, a marketing-strategies manager, apologized in front of the room.  "I was listening to a client with my legs crossed," he admitted, clutching the microphone.  Others were quick to follow.  One official raised a hand to share his shame over failing to meet a client on time.  At one point, Mr. Yamaguchi himself disclosed that he was getting slack and had been 10 minutes late for a meeting.  As far as most ODS employees are concerned, the discussions are a necessary, if not necessarily fun, part of building confidence and keeping motivation strong.  "We dig up and say things that we could just let go," says Ryoko Yamaoka, a 39-year-old manager in the company's advertising branch.  "But that stimulates initiative."  Ms. Yamaoka, who joined the company four years ago, says she has also been given decision-making responsibility that a woman would never dream of in a conservative Japanese company.  But to many outsiders, all the yakking seems a little much.  "If everyone gathers together for nitty-gritties for even half an hour, that's 500 hours of loss" for a 1,000-worker company, says Koichi Hori, vice president and director of Boston Consulting Group Inc.  "It's a waste of time."  Some employees, too, marvel at the energy thrust into discussion.  "People here seem to have gone numb about the notion of taking up time," says 26-year-old Nobuhiro Tatsui, who joined the company about two years ago.  "I was surprised that they don't get sick of it."  Actually, whether tiring of talk is the reason or not, the turnover rate is high.  Mr. Tatsui, who entered as the 170th employee in the company a year and eight months ago, has advanced to No. 80, meaning that 90 of the people there before him have left.  Mr. Yamaguchi, for his part, is unfazed by the criticism and says it is unfortunate that people who don't understand the ODS philosophy leave the company.  He is convinced that most companies need more discussions to cope with rapidly changing times.  He also hopes to spread ODS's style to other companies in Japan and the U.S.  But perhaps those interested in exploring Mr. Yamaguchi's approach should know something about him that may explain his tolerance for lengthy group chats: He doesn't wear a watch.  Love means nothing in tennis, a sad fact brought home over the weekend to a couple of scarred and honored campaigners at the U.S. Open tennis tournament here.  As she faced Steffi Graf in Saturday's women's final, Martina Navratilova, the 32-year-old ex-Czech, heard calls of "We love you, Martina]" from the Stadium Court fancy.  It was the kind of support denied her when she'd tangled with Chris Evert and Tracy Austin in previous trips to the championship round of her adopted homeland's biggest tennis show.  On Sunday afternoon and evening against Boris Becker, the 29-year-old Ivan Lendl seemed to have the backing of about half the crowd in his record-tying eighth consecutive appearance in an Open men's singles final.  Well, maybe 40%.  Would you believe 33 1/3%?  At least, when voices cried "C'mon Eee-von]" to spur on the bony-faced ex-Czech-to-be (he's filed for U.S. citizenship), others didn't laugh, as they did in one of his bouts against Jimmy Connors here a few years back.  But the affection availed the former tennis sovereigns little against their younger, stronger West German foes, and the proceedings smacked of a permanent change in the tennis hierarchy.  The 20-year-old Steffi beat Martina, 3-6, 7-5 and 6-1, to capture her second straight Open crown and her seventh of the past eight women's "Grand Slam" titles.  It left Martina and the rest of the lady racqueteers with scant hope for a different near-term future.  Becker, who at age 21 has added considerable finesse to the "boom-boom" serve-and-volley game that won for him thrice on Wimbledon's grass, including this year, handled Lendl, 7-6, 1-6, 6-3 and 7-6, for his first non-Wimbledon Slam triumph.  It was the redhead's fourth straight victory over Lendl in a head-to-head series that now stands even at seven wins each, and the latter, a three-time U.S. Open winner, acknowledged that this worm, too, might well stay turned.  "He has more power than I do, and the rest of his game has improved tremendously," Lendl said after the match.  "I've improved, too, but there's only so much you can do.  It's going to be more and more difficult for me."  The championship matches capped two weeks of hard-court and, sometimes, hard-time tennis that raised more questions than usual about the tournament's television-dictated final-days format.  Unlike the Slam's English, French and Australian components, in which each of the singles semifinals and finals are separated by a rest day, the Open schedules those matches on consecutive days to deliver a "Super Saturday" card of the women's final and men's semis for TV.  But last week's very hot, very muggy weather sent Graf fleeing the court with severe leg cramps after her three-set Friday semifinal with Gabriela Sabatini, and placed in doubt her ability to be ready for her next-day date with Martina.  And Lendl faced Becker just 20 hours after out-sweating Andre Agassi in four sets Saturday night.  That both showed up on schedule, and played well, shouldn't validate a bad policy that ought to be changed.  The hot weather affected the Becker-Lendl go even if it didn't determine its outcome.  The two players, tennis's biggest servers, moved in stately fashion under the late-afternoon sun through a one hour, 15 minute first set that was most notable for its long pauses between points.  After falling behind four games to one in set two, Boris admittedly "calmed down" (i.e., quit playing) in the last two games to conserve energy.  Lendl reciprocated, albeit less obviously, by surrendering service games at 30 and love in set three.  The fourth set, in blessedly cooler darkness, gave the raucous Stadium throng the tennis it came for.  Lendl broke Becker in game two on a laser forehand to go up 2-0.  Boris bashed volleys to take the next four games.  Lendl laced passing shots from both sides to rally again to a 5-4 advantage, and the pair held service to the tiebreaker.  Becker won it, and the match, 7-4, scoring a service ace on the penultimate point and finishing with another scorcher that the lunging Lendl barely tipped.  The contest's closeness was reflected in a 134-all total point count, but Becker's points counted for more.  He said that, while serving for the match in the fourth set, he "smiled inside," adding, "When you believe in yourself, you just feel it."  At age 21, this remarkable athlete can expect the internal grin to recur.  Navratilova, appearing in her seventh Open final (she won here in 1983, '84, '86 and '87), gave Graf as stern a test as Lendl gave Becker.  For the first 15 games, she played about as well as she, or any woman, could, capturing the first set, 6-3, and leading the second, 4-2.  Her serve was sharp, her volleys crisp, and her oft-volatile emotions controlled.  But Graf held serve in game seven of the second set and scored her first service break of the match in game eight with the help of two Navratilova double faults.  Graf broke her foe's serve again in game 12 with riflelike passing shots.  Navratilova yelped in frustration after she netted a backhand for set point.  The third set was more-typical Steffi stuff, with Graf outscoring her foe, 27 points to 15.  "She played like a runaway train," said Navratilova of the finish.  Nonetheless, Martina professed to be encouraged with her showing, saying she "handed" Graf the win with her double faults in the key second-set game and on game point in a third-set break, and pledged to do better next time.  Unfortunately for her, the record suggests a different trend.  Steffi has won her past three matches with Martina, taking the third sets by lopsided, 6-1, scores in each.  The other two were on Wimbledon's grass, Navratilova's favorite surface, and this year Martina skipped several tournaments, including the clay French Open, to prepare for the fast-court events she thought she could win.  She'll be 33 next month, and, even for one so dynamic, the tick promises only to be negative.  Time Share, Perhaps?  As hip baby boomers grow older,  One can surely state with impunity  That we'll soon hear a rock jingle used  To sell a retirement community.  -- Edward F. Dempsey.  ---  Wail Street  I know which stocks to buy and sell,  Yet my results are dismal  How come I do not do so well?  My timing is abysmal.  -- Dick Emmons.  ---  Giant Savings  Go on a shopping spree today  For objects of your choice,  And it they're unavailable -- Rejoice]  -- May Richstone.  Thomas S. Monaghan, who rose from a childhood in orphanages to become a multimillionaire fast-food baron, is considering selling his company, Domino's Pizza Inc.  Mr. Monaghan has notified employees and franchise owners that he may sell his 97% stake in the nation's largest pizza delivery company.  Estimates of the price vary widely because the company's profits haven't matched its explosive growth, but guesses run as high as $500 million.  In a letter to employees and franchisees, the 52-year-old Mr. Monaghan said selling Domino's would allow him to devote more time to charity work, as well as simplifying estate planning for his family.  "I am in a position to help various charities that I deeply believe in," Mr. Monaghan wrote.  "I have discovered that this is a very big job and it is not fair to give divided attention to Domino's Pizza and my foundation work."  Mr. Monaghan is an active supporter of several causes including the Roman Catholic Church, C.S. Mott Children's Hospital in Ann Arbor, Mich. and the Domino's Foundation, which backs health-care agencies, as well as arts, educational and cultural groups.  Domino's officials said Mr. Monaghan hasn't received any offers yet for the company and he hasn't hired investment advisers to determine its value.  Domino's 17% share of the U.S. pizza market trails only PepsiCo Inc.'s Pizza Hut subsidiary, which has a 20.7% market share.  Domino's has 5,100 outlets world-wide, two-thirds of which are franchised.  "At this point, he's only letting people know that he's exploring and evaluating the possibility of selling," said Domino's spokesman Ron Hingst.  Industry analysts said the sales price for Domino's could range from about $250 million to $500 million.  They said it is difficult to determine its precise value because profits have been lean in recent years despite the company's strong brand name.  During the 1980s, Domino's revenue grew 20-fold thanks to an explosion in demand for home-delivered foods.  Last year, Domino's topped $1 billion in revenue for the first time.  But earnings have been lackluster the past three years, falling from $7.7 million in 1987 to $6.1 million last year.  In addition, the company last year undertook a $5 million cost-reduction program.  A number of companies are rumored to have an interest in buying Domino's, with speculation focusing on soft-drink giants Coca-Cola Co. and PepsiCo.  Officials of both companies declined to comment, but analysts discounted the value of Domino's to either concern.  PepsiCo's full-service Pizza Hut chain has already geared up to challenge Domino's in the delivery business.  Coca-Cola, meanwhile, has shunned moving into the restaurant business and has shown no real interest in competing against restaurant chains that buy its soft drinks.  "Any buyer is going to have to recognize that Domino's will soon have to decide how to make its next major growth spurt with additional products," said George D. Rice, chairman of GDR Enterprises, a Chicago marketing and research consulting firm.  "It's a good time for Tom Monaghan to take a step like this," Mr. Rice said.  "Domino's hasn't saturated the market yet and he can get out before the company has to reach for a new dimension."  In June, Mr. Monaghan signalled that his involvement with Domino's might wind down when he turned control of daily operations over to Dave Black, the company's first chief operating officer.  But the thought of Domino's without its founder remained difficult to contemplate.  Mr. Monaghan's rags-to-riches story has produced enormous publicity for Domino's, especially after he bought the Detroit Tigers baseball team and wrote an autobiography titled "Pizza Tiger".  Domino's and its founder remain as closely identified as McDonald's Corp. and Ray Kroc.  Many of Mr. Monaghan's outside interests have found expression through the pizza business.  The company's headquarters in Ann Arbor, Mich., for example, is inspired by designs by architect Frank Lloyd Wright, one of Mr. Monaghan's early heroes.  Other interest, though, have produced controversy.  Last year, Mr. Monaghan publicly backed efforts to end state-funded abortions in Michigan, putting him in the center of a storm over that issue.  Kugelfischer Georg Schaefer KGaA said it plans to raise 140 million marks ($70.3 million) through a rights issue to finance its investment program.  The West German ball bearing maker said it will issue 560,000 new preferred shares with a face value of 50 marks ($25.10), and offer them to holders of record in the ratio of one new share for each seven held.  The price will be 250 marks ($125.5).  The company said the new shares, to be introduced in early October, will be eligible for half of the 1989 dividend payout.  Kugelfischer also said rising sales and earnings are making possible a dividend increase, in which the new shares will participate correspondingly.  In 1988, the company paid 8.00 marks on preferred and 7.00 marks on common shares.  The company expects earnings for the year to rise at a rate "comparable" to the 58% recorded in the first half.  Preferred stock closed at 330.00 marks Friday on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange.  Support is shrinking for any further change this year in the production ceiling of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  Proponents of a higher fourth-quarter ceiling, including several big Persian Gulf producers, were dealt a major setback yesterday as Ginandjar Kartasasmita, Indonesia's influential oil minister, voiced his objections to any change unless quota violations ceased.  Mr. Ginandjar is one of eight leading oil ministers who make up OPEC's market-monitoring committee.  The committee will meet in Geneva, beginning Sept. 23, to decide, among other issues, whether the authorized output level for the 13 member countries should be increased from the current 19.5 million barrels a day.  But yesterday, Mr. Ginandjar told a Singapore news conference that he doesn't favor a higher ceiling unless there is clear evidence of compliance with quotas by all the exporters.  "If we could be assured there are significant indications that there will be some kind of adherence, we could accept an increase," said the minister, who was in Singapore to address a petroleum conference.  Until recently, it had been generally assumed that the monitoring committee had a mandate at its Geneva meeting to engineer an increase in OPEC's fourth-quarter ceiling to 20 million barrels a day or, possibly, to 20.5 million barrels.  Any official OPEC action requires a unanimous decision by all 13 ministers, and the remaining five already have been invited to Geneva.  Also, even though the ceiling was raised one million barrels a day, effective July 1, a further increase was believed necessary to keep OPEC's production in line with anticipated demand for its oil in the fourth quarter.  Perhaps more important, an increase was backed by Saudi Arabia and several other OPEC heavyweights.  It was, in fact, the centerpiece of a budding move in OPEC to provide Kuwait, the United Arab Emirates and some other regular quota violators higher output allotments on a permanent basis.  The biggest problem facing OPEC, Mr. Ginandjar said, is the fact that it hasn't been able to reach its reference price of $18 a barrel except for a few weeks in early summer.  Asked why OPEC hadn't been able to hold that price, the minister replied: "There are countries that haven't been faithful to their quotas."  At OPEC's June meeting, Mr. Ginandjar was instrumental in planning the agenda for the September session at which he and others hoped a new and permanent quota basis could be worked out that would eliminate production cheating.  Since, however, cheating has become so widespread that it has pushed OPEC's output to the highest level this year -- 22 million barrels a day -- and raised doubt whether a formal boost in the output ceiling would be prudent.  Although a higher ceiling could eliminate some cheating by making more of the excess output legitimate, it might also lead to even higher total output, some ministers worry.  And Rilwanu Lukman, the Nigerian oil minister who is OPEC's president, now raises the prospect that no major changes will result from the September meeting.  In his comments yesterday about this month's meeting, Mr. Ginandjar said it was the monitoring committee's self-appointed "task to work on a permanent quota {system} at this Geneva meeting."  But, he added: "I don't think we can do that."  Abel G. Aganbegyan has been variously described in print as a "rotund Armenian" and as "the leading maverick among Soviet economists."  He also is said to be one of Mikhail Gorbachev's most trusted economic advisers.  All those descriptions fit, although who Mr. Gorbachev most trusts at any given moment is subject to the usual problems of penetrating the inner thoughts of a Soviet leader.  At any rate, Mr. Aganbegyan is touring the U.S. again and dropped by our offices last week with a progress report on "perestroika," the economic restructuring program he helped design.  How are things going?  Not well.  Shortages of consumer goods, including food, have become severe.  Extensive worker unrest was reflected in the coal-field strikes this summer.  There are too many rubles and not enough goods to buy.  Mr. Aganbegyan estimates inflation at 9%, but it is not easy to measure inflation accurately in a price-controlled economy and he may be underestimating the rate.  He is not underestimating the dangers, however.  "We're in deep crisis, especially a financial crisis and a crisis of the consumer goods market," he says.  "It provokes social unrest.  The strikes of miners were the clang of the first bell.  They were the first sign that we are moving toward economic disaster."  He recalls how in Poland a few years ago as a result of strikes, "the economy was practically destroyed.  The volume of production was halved.  They have not yet reached the previous living standards."  He doesn't mention -- but hardly needs to -- that Poland's problems ultimately led to a massive public rejection of the Communist Party and the installation a few weeks ago of a government led by Solidarity.  He does say that some "non-government" groups tried to politicize the Soviet coal strikes without success.  Yet he thinks that unless the Soviet Union can relieve shortages, there will be more strikes and social unrest will become very serious.  Those in the government who have been resisting reform are finally waking up to the seriousness of the problem, he believes.  "Our government is grasping what is going on in the country, the real crisis.  Half a year ago, they didn't understand the situation and were not ready to accept emergency economic measures."  Will those measures succeed?  It is easy to doubt that what Mr. Aganbegyan describes will in fact put the country on a sounder footing.  The Soviets regard as their fundamental problem the very large and growing gap between the supply of consumer products and the demand for them.  Mr. Aganbegyan estimates the gap at 150 billion rubles, which means that it is more than one third of total annual sales of consumer goods, estimated at 400 billion.  The surplus demand is fed in part by a government budget deficit now running at 120 billion rubles a year or 13% of GNP.  All the classical symptoms of inflation are present.  Consumers are rushing to convert their rubles to goods before prices on items not subject to price controls rise further.  Price-controlled items are scarce, having gone into the black market.  Food shortages are severe, especially in areas outside capital cities and agricultural areas, such as the Baltic states and Byelorussia.  The government will present to the Supreme Soviet, or parliament, this month something resembling an IMF adjustment program.  But it is more like the IMF programs of yesteryear than the IMF programs of today.  It harks back to "austerity," which seldom got beneficial results in the absence of incentives for workers to become more productive and creative.  The Supreme Soviet already has passed a decree calling for a progressive tax on enterprises to soak up some of the surplus rubles.  Apparently, the message of the world-wide supply-side revolution that progressive taxes are a disincentive has not yet penetrated the Soviet government.  Other measures are more promising, but only if implemented.  The new budget will propose to slash the government deficit in half with a 13% cut in military spending, a 30% cut in industrial capital spending by centralized agencies, reduced subsidies to non-profit enterprises and a cut in government employment.  To encourage saving instead of spending, Soviet banks will raise savings account rates.  There are efforts to turn the shortages themselves to state purposes, including what might be called a "pay now-drive later" plan.  Consumers who want to reduce the waiting time for a new car or a private plot will be allowed to put up part of the cost in advance, obtaining something resembling a futures contract.  Since the waiting time to obtain a car still runs some five years and the demand for private plots is 10 times the supply it is assumed that these bonds will have appeal.  Purchasers will be assured that there is in fact a real car or real plot in their futures.  In the case of the plots they will be shown the site and the measures being taken to provide access roads and utilities so as to overcome the skepticism Soviet consumers long ago developed.  Soviet citizens cannot own land and thus can obtain only a lifetime lease on plots, with no rights to sell them.  But many Soviets honor such rules in the breach, taking the view that improvements belong to them and thus can be sold even if the land they are on cannot be.  Mr. Aganbegyan says the government hopes to capture some 100 billion in surplus rubles by selling entitlements to cars and plots.  The government also may further liberalize the rules on private farming, cooperatives and family business in hope of getting more production.  The Soviets are borrowing heavily in the West to buy machinery for producing consumer goods.  Mr. Aganbegyan mentions a $3 billion loan from West Germany, Italy, Japan and others.  They also hope to fill 10% of domestic demand through imports this year to relieve shortages.  As to the much-discussed convertible ruble, Mr. Aganbegyan expects a long process.  Interestingly, the Soviets are conducting an international contest, with a top prize of $25,000, for the best ideas for accomplishing this feat.  One idea, proposed by a Soviet economist, would be to set up a parallel currency for foreign trade that would be valued at real market rates, which would be far below the present official exchange rate.  Another idea is to create an internal market for hard currency by 1995, with the Bank for Foreign Trade auctioning off hard currencies to Soviet enterprises.  The Soviets would like to become part of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), the IMF and the World Bank as part of their efforts at international economic integration, but Mr. Aganbegyan fears the economy will not be strong enough for that purpose until near the turn of the century.  Of course, what the Soviet government cannot accept is the one thing that would begin to solve most of its problems: granting its citizens the right to own private property, make private transactions and engage in truly private enterprise.  U.S. supply-side economist Paul Craig Roberts earlier this year gave a talk to the Soviet Academy of Sciences in which he said economic freedom is the only answer to the Soviet malaise.  Among those applauding, so Mr. Roberts reports, was that rotund Armenian, Abel Aganbegyan.  While takeover-related news boosted shares of Dunkin' Donuts and Connaught BioSciences, the Nasdaq Composite continued to mark time.  The composite, which ended last week about flat, declined 0.89 to 470.42.  The story was the same for the OTC's largest issues.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of nonfinancial stocks rose 0.61 to 445.92.  The Nasdaq Financial Index slipped 0.09 to 468.57.  Trading volume, which usually is meager on Mondays, totaled 113.5 million shares.  That was well off the average daily turnover of 132.6 million for Nasdaq through August.  Despite the Nasdaq composite's lackluster performance of late, some traders aren't troubled.  E.E. "Buzzy" Geduld, president of Herzog, Heine, Geduld, said, "I think the market is doing better than the averages indicate.  There really isn't much stock for sale, which leads me to believe that {the market is undergoing} an orderly consolidation."  Connaught BioSciences surged nearly 21% on news that Ciba-Geigy and Chiron said they intend to make an all-cash bid to acquire the common stock outstanding of Connaught BioSciences they don't already own, for $25.23 a share, or $642.5 million.  The proposed bid amounts to about $764 million Canadian dollars.  Connaught jumped 4 3/8 to 25 5/8 on 620,200 shares.  Chiron, a biotechnology issue, added 7/8 to 27 1/8 on 306,000 shares.  The companies said the offer is conditioned on a minimum of 11 million shares being tendered and rejection by Connaught shareholders of a previously proposed merger with Institut Merieux, a French concern.  The companies said the 11 million shares, together with the two million shares, or 9.4% previously acquired by them, represent about 51% of the shares of Connaught BioSciences on a fully diluted basis.  Dunkin' Donuts rose about 10%, or 4 1/4, to 45 1/4 on 528,000 shares after the company's board rejected the $45-a-share buyout offer by a group including a unit of Unicorp Canada as inadequate.  The Dunkin' Donuts directors instructed management, together with its financial adviser, Goldman Sachs, to explore whether shareholder values would be maximized by remaining independent or by any other alternatives that may come along, including acquisition of the company by a third party.  LIN Broadcasting rose 1 1/4 to 106 3/4 on 1.8 million shares.  The New York broadcasting and cellular communications concern agreed to merge its domestic cellular telephone interests with BellSouth.  The combined company will serve some 500,000 customers in more than 40 markets, the two concerns said.  In exchange for its domestic cellular interests, BellSouth will receive newly issued LIN common shares representing a 50% stake after the merger, the companies said.  In addition, BellSouth might also receive some LIN preferred stock.  The companies said that before the merger, LIN will spin off its television broadcasting subsidiaries to stockholders and intends to pay its pre-merger stockholders a special cash dividend of $20 a share.  BellSouth and LIN said that the merger is subject to approval by LIN's stockholders and various regulatory authorities, as well as other conditions.  Analysts said the merger was meant to thwart McCaw Cellular Communication's $110-a-share cash takeover bid for LIN. McCaw gained 1 to 39 1/2.  The activity pushed the Nasdaq Utility Index, which includes cellular stocks, up 2.25 to 746.44, making it the strongest sector in the OTC market yesterday.  Novell climbed 1 1/8 to 26 1/8 on volume of about 750,000 shares.  The company reported net income for its third quarter, ended July 29, of 35 cents a share, compared with year-earlier earnings of 37 cents a share.  Last month, the company said its net income for the quarter might be below 35 cents a share.  Novell's competitor, 3Com, slipped 3/4 to 14 1/8 on 473,000 shares.  Network General, which makes computer-networking software, added 3/4 to 20 3/8.  ASK Computer Systems dropped 2 1/4 to 8 3/8 after the company announced that its earnings for the first quarter ending Sept. 30 will be "substantially below" the 18 cents a share earned a year earlier.  A soft market and delays in some customer approvals were blamed for the decline in profits.  Among other active stocks, MCI Communications rose 1/8 to 41 3/4; Intel was unchanged at 29 3/4; Apple Computer improved 3/4 to 45 3/4 and MiniScribe dropped 3/16 to 2 1/16.  Nike was up 1 1/2 to 56 7/8.  Scores for the two major college entrance tests fell last academic year, adding to concerns that educational changes and spending increases are failing to revive schools.  A decline of one point, to an average of 903 on a 1600 scale, on the Scholastic Aptitude Test, came despite a 4% drop in the number of students taking the test.  A drop in test takers usually boosts scores because it indicates that fewer lower-ranking students are taking the test.  The composite score on the American College Test, second to the SAT in popularity, dropped to 18.6 from 18.8 on a scale of 32.  It was the fourth year without gains on the SAT, widely followed as a barometer of high-school achievement.  The Bush and Reagan administrations' criticisms of U.S. schools, which rankled many educators, have relied heavily on SAT results.  U.S. Education Secretary Lauro Cavazos called the scores "grim."  In a statement, he said the results were "especially disheartening at the end of a decade marked by substantial education reform efforts."  These efforts, which have included higher standards and salaries for teachers and some changes in school governance, have resulted in a 29% spending increase on public education to grade 12 in the last nine years, after adjusting for inflation.  The results are also likely to stir further controversy about education policies.  President Bush has called an "education summit" with state governors later this month, at which he is expected to push his agenda of wider parental choice of schools, along with private-sector and volunteer cooperation.  Yet many educators are already dubious that the event will accomplish much in the absence of added federal spending on education.  E.D. Hirsch Jr., the author of "Cultural Literacy," and a critic of grade-school and high-school curriculums, said the college test results were "not surprising" in light of "what's wrong with all the reforms," most of which have been on the state and local level.  Rather than try to bolster content, Mr. Hirsch said the efforts have focused too much on school governance issues and trying to teach students "learning skills" rather than subjects.  Although SAT mathematics scores stayed flat at 476 and remain at their highest level since 1974, verbal scores fell one point to 427 and are at the lowest mark since 1984's 426.  ACT scores fell in each of the test's four categories -- English, mathematics, social studies and natural sciences.  Robert Cameron, research director at the College Board, in New York, said he was "keenly disappointed " in the decline in SAT verbal scores.  The College Board coordinates admissions activities and sponsors the SAT.  "I think too many high schools assume that students come to them knowing how to read and how to read with comprehension," said Mr. Cameron.  "Rather than leave it to colleges to provide remedial attention in reading, high schools should pay more attention to these skills."  But William Honig, California's school superintendent, said he sees little in the score results to get worried about.  In California, Mr. Honig said, all ethnic and racial groups raised their average scores, but overall averages were down by two points because a higher percentage of students from low-scoring groups, such as blacks and Hispanics, took the test.  "The scores look flat, but they are masking continued growth," Mr. Honig said.  Nationally, the pattern was similar.  Non-Hispanic white students raised their scores by two points to 937, blacks' scores were flat at 737, Asian-Americans were up four to 934; Mexican-Americans were up one to 811, and Puerto Ricans gained nine to 766.  But overall results fell because the entire test-taking population included a higher proportion of minorities.  The number of high schoolers taking the tests also appeared to fall, a sign that fewer students are aspiring to college.  Mr. Cameron said the decline may indicate that concerns about rising costs are beginning to scare some parents away from sending their children to college.  The number of SAT takers dropped by 4% to 1,088,223, while the total high-school graduating class fell by less than 1% to 2,781,000.  ACT takers rose by 1.5% to 855,171.  The numbers can't be combined for a total test group, since some students take both tests.  Robert I. Toussie L.P., a New York-based investment partnership with a 9.9% stake in Lionel Corp., said it offered to acquire the rest of the specialty toy retailer for about $100 million.  The partnership, whose general partner is investor Robert I. Toussie, said it would withdraw the $8.25-a-share offer at the close of business next Monday if Lionel doesn't respond, although the date may be extended.  Payment would be 90% in cash and 10% in payable-in-kind preferred stock.  The partnership currently holds more than 1.3 million of Lionel's 13.5 million common shares outstanding.  The remaining shares would cost about $100 million.  Lionel also has $40 million of convertible bonds outstanding.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Lionel's shares fell 12.5 cents to $7.25.  According to a letter attached to its filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the partnership has made several attempts to discuss with Lionel management its interest in acquiring the company.  In response to a February request, Lionel announced that favorable short-term and long-term prospects made it desirable for the company to remain independent, the letter stated.  Mr. Toussie declined to comment on whether he would go directly to shareholders with a tender offer if Lionel executives refused to meet with him.  In the SEC filing, the partnership said it reserved the right to pursue alternatives stated in a previous filing, including selling a portion or all of the partnership's holdings in the open market or in privately negotiated transactions to one or more purchasers.  Mr. Toussie said that the partnership had retained PaineWebber Inc. as its financial adviser and was confident the necessary financing for the transaction would be made available.  Mr. Toussie said that the partnership had hired Ronald Tuchman, a former Toys "R" Us, Inc. executive, to serve as chief operating officer of the company following the completion of the transaction.  He said that he wanted to work with Lionel's current management team and would seek to keep Lionel chairman Michael J. Vastola at the company.  A spokeswoman for Lionel said the company was still studying the proposal and could not comment further.  According to the company's 1989 annual report, two actions have been filed by shareholders in New York state court alleging that the company has refused to meet with the partnership concerning possible acquisition proposals.  Robert J. Schweich, a managing director at Wertheim Schroder & Co., said Lionel still lags behind its two larger competitors in toy retailing, Toys "R" Us and Child World Inc., in part because of poor locations of stores.  Nonetheless, Mr. Schweich said, Lionel reported $409 million in sales for fiscal 1989, a solid nucleus from which the partnership could seek to build the retailer.  Mr. Toussie's limited partners include Milton Petrie, chairman and chief executive of Petrie Stores Corp.; Elliot Jaffe, founder and chief executive of Dress Barn Inc.; Leon Atkind, founder and former chief executive of NBO Stores; and Barrie Damson, founder and chairman of Damson Oil Corp.  {Second of a Series}  All entrepreneurs have their troubles.  But in the garages, storefronts and dusty industrial parks of rural America, they have some woes peculiar to their setting.  Gary Kruse, of Lake View, Iowa, has encountered a few of those problems: rural banks having to call loans suddenly, technical workers unwilling to move to western Iowa, difficulties in finding expertise in exporting.  And one other thing: Ever since he started his first business 23 years ago out of the back of a 1959 Chevy, many of his neighbors in Lake View, a community of 1,300, have found his entrepreneurial enthusiasm a little strange.  "I've got the reputation of being the guy with the crazy ideas," says Mr. Kruse, who nevertheless says he loves living in Lake View.  Across the country, the conservatism of rural communities is one of a raft of problems faced by entrepreneurs.  Small-town banks inexperienced in commercial and industrial lending may shy away from new enterprises that aren't involved in agriculture.  Venture capital is scarce.  Government small-business programs are often a tangle of red tape.  And the dependence of most rural regions on a single cyclical industry, such as lumbering or agriculture, can pull entrepreneurs under in the same boom-and-bust patterns.  Moreover, rural American culture is "very, very hard on business failures," says Robert Bernier, director of the Nebraska Business Development Center.  "If you fail in business, you are an outcast."  The causes of failure often are impossible for the small-business owner to avert or even plan for.  When the farm or mining economy crashes or a town's biggest plant moves away, a small business's market can be wiped out overnight.  In the Lewiston, Idaho, region, for instance, officials managed to foster creation of 225 jobs, many of them in new ventures, in the early 1980s.  But in 1985, hundreds of workers at Potlatch Corp., a big lumber operation, were laid off.  The aftereffects of the layoff came quickly: An automotive service center soon failed and an entrepreneur's plans for a truck-maintenance business stalled for two years.  "A unidimensional economy can be tough on entrepreneurs," says John Block, an Oregon City, Ore., official who was Lewiston's community-development director at the time.  The farm crisis, of course, affected more than just farmers.  It forced Mr. Kruse's bank to call a loan, leaving his business at the time, a maker of alternative-fuel burners, a half-million dollars short.  He hadn't any alternative but foreclosure.  The crisis stung many rural lenders so badly that they still shun new ventures.  Larry Nauss, a former construction contractor and water-treatment franchise owner, says he used to be able to borrow $10,000 on his signature alone from his hometown bank in Emmetsburg, Iowa.  But when he opened a lumberyard last year, "our banks in this town didn't help much.  I couldn't borrow penny one from them," he says.  "Bankers have turned more conservative.  They got their toes stepped on by some of the farmers."  Rural lenders often don't compete very hard to make small-business loans.  When Mr. Nauss sought financing for an $8,000 forklift, one bank official turned him down because he had a business loan from a competing lender.  But rural start-ups may not get a warm reception from lenders outside their area, either.  Sherri Bollwitt's children's clothing store in Broken Bow, Neb., was too small to get much attention from big city banks, whose cooperation she needed to buy brand-name clothing on credit from suppliers.  Despite her low debt and rapid growth, she says, a New York lender told her, "Lady, you've got to put more money into your store."  She ended up paying cash for her shipments.  Despite these difficulties, few small-town entrepreneurs cash in on government help.  Although more than 1,000 business development programs are available in rural areas, according to a Council of State Governments survey, rural entrepreneurs are less likely to take advantage of them than other small businesses.  In a rural area, "when you have problems, you're an island unto yourself," says Adrian Sween, founder of Apollo Corp., a Somerset, Wis., maker of bathing equipment for nursing homes.  Rural entrepreneurs often don't have access to the products and services their urban counterparts take for granted.  These difficulties take a number of forms.  Mr. Kruse, whose company, Krudico Inc., sells water-treatment products in 47 states, can't find the help he needs to respond to overseas inquiries.  "I don't have the resources to help with exporting, as I would in a city.  You need brokers, people with expertise" to do international currency transactions, shipping and credit arrangements, he says.  Mr. Sween says he sometimes has to drive to Chicago or Minneapolis to place orders for fixtures, valves and other supplies.  "We're not a high-volume sale to make it worth a salesman's time to pop over," he says.  Just getting to the cities raises obstacles, too.  When Christopher Banus, founder and chief executive of Granitech Corp., a Fairfield, Iowa, maker of specialized flooring and other construction materials, wants to go to New York, he has to drive an hour and 20 minutes to the Cedar Rapids airport, then change planes at a larger city in the region.  That remoteness can make it tough to recruit managers.  In Campton, Ky., "the people who finish high school and college look back and see no opportunity, and they're gone," says Tom Musbach, president of Campton Electronics, a $10-million-a-year maker of computer peripherals.  He is advertising in Midwestern cities for a purchasing manager.  So far, the response to ads, which identify the company and the location, "is less than overwhelming," Mr. Musbach says.  The tightly woven social fabric of small towns can block new ventures.  A funeral-home owner in a small Southeastern town had to travel to a neighboring town to get financing because a prominent banker in his own community was a partner in a competing funeral home.  Studies in several small towns in North Carolina and Alabama found that when a few entrenched and powerful families dominate a community, they tend to squelch change and entrepreneurship.  Ray Brown, founder and chief executive of Brown & Denisia Inc., a Broken Bow nursing-home developer that has worked in hundreds of small towns, says that in most rural communities, "there are about five families who decide what will happen."  Considering the pluck and hard work that so many rural entrepreneurs show, one might expect towns and even whole states to line up behind their products.  But that isn't necessarily the case.  Ileene Nodland, a founder of C&I Jerky, a struggling beef-jerky producer in tiny Dunn Center, N.D., found that labeling her product "made with North Dakota beef" didn't interest her fellow North Dakotans.  The company is changing its labels and trying to move to out-of-state markets.  Despite the obstacles, rural entrepreneurs cling to their way of life.  Granitech's Mr. Banus hated the pollution, high costs, stress and congestion of Boston, where he lived and ran a construction business for many years.  When he started Granitech in 1986, neighbors in Fairfield offered forklifts and moving help for free, he says.  And his commute is 3 1/2 minutes.  The personal benefits eclipse business problems, Mr. Banus says.  "If you want to go skiing, go skiing.  If you want to buy $75 ties, go to New York," he says.  "But if you want to live a stress-free life, move here."  National Intergroup Inc., in an effort to rejuvenate its sleepy Ben Franklin Stores Inc. unit, said it will begin experimenting with company-owned craft stores instead of relying solely on franchises.  The foray, while initially modest, indicates that National Intergroup is committed to the division, which has lost money in recent years.  Investors and analysts have urged the sale of the 112-year-old chain and last year National Intergroup indicated Ben Franklin may be put on the block.  "This certainly doesn't sound like they're ready to sell that unit," said Gregory Drahuschak, an analyst with Butcher & Singer Inc.  "I wish they'd get their house in order before trying something new."  He said the unprofitable Ben Franklin unit has suffered management turnover, as well as inventory control and shipping problems.  New management at the unit has been trying to address those concerns in the last year, having reduced inventory levels by 42% since, and expects an operating profit in the current fiscal year.  Ben Franklin President Dale D. Ward said company-owned stores will focus on the growing craft market, and won't carry other variety-type products, as do the typical Ben Franklin stores.  Ben Franklin has 1,300 retail franchise stores, including 200 specializing in craft merchandise.  The stores are concentrated in rural areas in 49 states.  Initially, the company will open two, 20,000-square-feet craft stores in the New England area.  While additional stores will depend on site location and the success of initial stores, Mr. Ward said he hopes to have 20 to 30 company-owned stores within the next few years.  Still, the backbone of the unit will be franchises.  "We still plan to add 60 franchises a year," he said, most of which will be craft units.  By actually owning stores, Ben Franklin can more easily experiment with marketing and inventory programs and offer results to its franchise owners.  Moreover, company-owned stores can act as training grounds for perspective franchise owners.  Mr. Ward also noted that competitors involved in franchising typically own up to 15% of their stores.  Until eight years ago, Ben Franklin stores sold only variety goods, competing with stores such as G.C. Murphy.  But franchise owners in small rural towns looked for other merchandise to give them an edge on encroaching department stores.  Now, Mr. Ward said, Ben Franklin has the country's largest inventory of warehouse crafts, from paints and models to knitting and fabric goods.  Franchisee annual retail sales are estimated to be more than $800 million.  My, my, my.  You were unusually cranky on Aug. 17 in your "Bad Acid" editorial -- perhaps you were having a flashback from some bad stuff.  Well, I guess it's time we owned up.  We Woodstock "radicals" and "veterans" really were responsible for damaging the social fabric: We did cause racial, ethnic and sexual discrimination, poverty, affordable-housing shortages and hopelessness, environmental degradation, and, probably as well, insider trading, stock-price manipulation and S&L fraud.  We did kill Janis, Jimi, Keith, et al.  We did cause, if not invent, promiscuity and divorce, and men's irresponsibility toward the children they helped create.  And we are responsible for those in the ghetto who use crack to figuratively escape by getting high or literally escape by getting rich.  And, as I recall, we also instigated the Newark and Watts riots (although I was in Boston at the time).  Wow] That's an awful lot of power, particularly for a group that by any measure was statistically nominal.  The Woodstock generation was a minority, even of the solidly middle-class kids who populated it.  Rather than feel a hint of shame, we should be embarrassed that we failed.  Nobody followed us.  You're darn tootin' its "impossible to link definitively the counterculture to today's social pathologies."  But how about the following as candidates for the causes of the pathologies that afflict us: serious environmental problems and real health risks; no substantive improvement in the dead-end futures of the poor; the moderately dead-end futures for people in our robust service economy (all those great job opportunities at McDonald's and Wendy's); housing costs that have destroyed the American dream through the next generation; eight years of a callous federal government; and a middle class that works a substantial part of each year just to pay taxes.  The causes of the pathologies you site are frustration and dashed expectations.  David Mackenzie  East Davenport, N.Y.  ---  "Bad Acid" was on target in its characterization of the hedonism of Woodstock, but it failed to acknowledge that the counterculture had its root causes in some of the most heinous sins of our society: the war in Vietnam, the racism of our society that was evident during the civil-rights movement, the pollution of our environment by industry, and the threat of nuclear war hanging over everyone.  All that certainly contributed to the desire of youth to find an escape -- paradise.  That in this quest young people become hedonistic might be regrettable, but the sins of Woodstock still pale in comparison to the sins that gave the counterculture its genesis.  In retrospect, the important question is: Have we learned anything?  As long as our society is plagued with racism, pollution, greed, warmongering attitudes and, ultimately, apathy about these problems, young people will continue to become disillusioned, rebel, commit suicide, do drugs and look for other ways to escape or make revolutionary statements.  What young people needed then and still need today is unhypocritical leadership, not lectures about morals from those who tolerate the scourges mentioned above.  James O'Shea  Norwich, Conn.  ---  There certainly was a big crowd at Woodstock.  But we should remember that Woodstock represented only a very small portion of those particular age groups.  Most members of those groups were otherwise occupied.  Some were working, some were in school or preparing to return to fall studies and, lest we forget, a goodly number could not make the commute from Southeast Asia.  J.W. Middleton  Bartlesville, Okla.  Deposit outflows from the nation's savings and loans narrowed to $183 million in July, a nine-month low, while thrifts continued selling assets at a rapid clip in order to meet new capital standards.  It was the smallest outflow of savings-and-loan deposits since last October and a sharp drop from June, when withdrawals exceeded new deposits by $4 billion.  If the interest credited to accounts is included, thrifts actually experienced a $2.8 billion deposit increase in July, during a period when Congress was racing to complete the massive S&L bailout legislation.  Falling rates at competing money-market funds helped slow the S&L deposit outflows that reached records last winter, said James Barth, chief economist at the Office of Thrift Supervision.  The spread between rates paid by money-market funds and S&Ls exceeded one percentage point in May and fell a quarter point by July, he said.  But some aggressive banks were also seeking to increase their market share by increasing their rates as the thrift industry contracts.  "At the rate the numbers are closing, banks and thrifts could be even-steven at the end of the year" (on rates), said Robert Heady, publisher of Bank Rate Monitor, North Palm Beach, Fla.  Small investors contributed notably to the thrift deposit base.  Accounts with less than $100,000 accounted for a $228 million inflow of deposits in July, compared with a $2.1 billion outflow in June.  Outflows of jumbo accounts -- those over $100,000 -- shrank to $411 million in July from $1.8 billion in June.  The rates thrifts pay are expected to continue falling, as sick S&Ls are closed and the government pumps $12 billion of liquidity to sick thrifts before the end of the month.  Two years ago, for example, 73 ailing Texas thrifts paid rates among the highest 100 in the nation, Mr. Heady says; now only three are in the top 100.  During July, thrifts reduced their assets -- chiefly mortgage-backed securities -- by $7 billion, compared with $7.5 billion a month earlier, in preparation for the bailout law's increased capital requirements.  Ten large thrifts accounted for about two-thirds of the asset reduction, Mr. Barth said.  A reduction in assets helps thrifts meet new, higher capital standards, because it increases their capital relative to their assets.  Meanwhile, the Securities and Exchange Commission exempted from registration bonds to be issued by the Resolution Funding Corp., which was established to raise funds to merge or close sick thrifts.  The exemption came at the request of Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady.  Last month, in a last-minute compromise as the S&L law was being approved, a provision was included at the request of Chairman John Dingell (D., Mich.) of the House Energy and Commerce Committee to require that the securities be registered with the SEC.  The compromise resulted in the committee's securing a role in overseeing the Refcorp.  Exempting the bonds, however, is likely to lower the interest payments, Mr. Brady said, because it would allow a market to develop for repurchase transactions in the bonds.  Rep. Dingell, meanwhile, will retain some jurisdiction over the Refcorp bonds.  Gabelli Group lowered its stake in Hopper Soliday Corp. to 20.33% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Gabelli said it sold a net of 64,600 Hopper Soliday common shares from July 13 through last Wednesday at $8.38 to $11.09 a share.  As a result of the sale, Gabelli currently holds 407,700 Hopper Soliday common.  New York-based Gabelli didn't give a reason in the filing for reducing its Hopper Soliday holdings.  Officials at Hopper Soliday, a Philadelphia-based financial services holding company, could not be reached for comment.  In your continuing crusade against the U.S. sugar program ("Uncle's Sugar," Review & Outlook, Aug. 15) you rely on preconceived notions of proper sugar policy to excuse playing loose with the facts.  Your contention that the corn-sweetener industry is competitive only because of U.S. sugar quotas is simply wrong.  High fructose corn syrup is the lowest-cost sweetener in the world.  It is competitive with sugar in any market where sugar prices are not driven below production costs by government subsidy.  If jobs have been lost in the soft-drink industry it has nothing to do with the U.S. sugar program.  Domestic consumption and production of soft drinks has boomed in the past eight years.  That's because the TV ads are right -- natural sweeteners are a good deal for consumers.  If they were as expensive as you make it sound, consumption would be declining, not rising.  Robert C. Liebenow  President  Corn Refiners Association  Washington  ---  The assertion that this country's sugar-quota program "fleece{s} the average family of four to the tune of $100 per year" is wrong.  The U.S. retail price is commensurate with the global production cost.  There are no figures to support your ludicrous claim to the contrary.  The average family of four pays less than $100 a year for all the refined sugar it consumes.  The General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade did not rule that U.S. quotas were illegal per se.  It claimed the administration used the wrong legal authority to apply import constraints, which, not incidentally, are similar to those in many other countries.  Also, more than 13% of the sugar consumed in the U.S. last year was from foreign sources, not 8% as you claim.  You maintain U.S. sugar growers "get a support price of 24 cents per pound -- twice the world price," but the fact is the government loan rate for raw sugar is 18 cents and the current New York # 11 spot price for world sugar is in excess of 13 cents.  David C. Carter  President  U.S. Beet Sugar Association  Washington  American Diversified Enterprises Inc., a New York investment firm, said it holds a 5.03% stake in Keptel Inc.'s common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, American Diversified said it acquired the stock to obtain as an investment a "significant equity position" in Keptel, a network interface systems concern.  It said it reserves the right to buy more shares, to sell shares or "to formulate other purposes or plans" regarding the Tinton Falls, N.J., company, depending on market conditions and other factors.  American Diversified said it holds 220,000 Keptel common shares, which it bought for about $1.4 million.  Reliance Financial Services Corp., a unit of Reliance Group Holdings Inc., reduced its stake in Lomas Financial Corp. to 4.6% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Reliance Financial said it sold 510,400 Lomas common shares between Aug. 9 and Sept. 8 for $3.75 to $8 a share, reducing its holdings to 1,365,000 shares.  Lomas Financial is based in Dallas, and Reliance Financial and Reliance Group Holdings are based in New York.  Halsey Drug Co. lowered its stake in Moore Medical Corp. to 2.4% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Halsey said it sold 83,700 Moore Medical common shares from Aug. 23 through Sept. 7 at $14 to $14.50 a share.  As a result of the sale, Halsey holds 67,000 Moore Medical common shares.  Halsey didn't give a reason in the filing for reducing its stake.  Moore Medical Corp. is based in New Britain, Conn., and Halsey is based in New York.  Hilton Kramer's Aug. 7 review of Paul Fussell's book "Wartime: Understanding and Behavior in the Second World War" criticizes the author for not giving a better understanding of what World War II was really about.  That statement makes me doubt Mr. Kramer ever served in a combat zone.  Enlisted men and lower-grade officers were meat thrown into a grinder.  They were seldom privy to the whys and wherefores of dying.  My combat-engineer battalion went from Normandy and Brittany through the Ardennes to the Czech border.  The man who took my place as squad leader was the first of our outfit killed in the hedgerows of Normandy.  We lost more in the Battle of the Bulge.  While others had it worse, I believe we spent enough time in combat to know what it was like.  In combat, most enlisted men in infantry, armor and engineering units have no idea where they are, where they have been or where they are going, let alone why.  Attention is centered on survival, food, sleep and, in winter, keeping warm -- somebody will always show up to tell you which way to go.  We ended up near the Czech border, then were ordered to ride back the other way, giving the land to the Russians.  Does Mr. Kramer expect an enlisted man on that day to know why that was done?  Mr. Fussell says he was an infantryman -- having been there myself, I find it hard to fault him for not always knowing the big picture instead of mud, blood, K and C rations, inadequate clothing, sleeping on the ground, watching out for Tellers, Bouncing Betties, Schu mines, potato mashers and pineapples.  Ex-Cpl.  D.F. Jewett  168 Engineer Combat Battalion  Saco, Maine  Heritage Media Corp. said it asked the board of POP Radio Corp. to increase in size and give Heritage a majority of the seats.  Heritage, an owner of television and radio stations, increased its stake in POP to about 52% earlier this year.  Heritage currently has one seat on POP's six-member board.  David N. Walthall, Heritage president, said the company wants its board representation to reflect its stock ownership in POP.  Heritage said that POP's board is calling a special meeting for tomorrow to consider its request.  POP, based in New York, sells advertising to packaged goods companies that is piped into grocery stores, drugstores and mass merchandise outlets.  The defendants convicted last month of racketeering in a case involving unlawful trading by Princeton/Newport L.P. moved to have their verdict overturned.  Attorneys for the six defendants argued in a memorandum submitted to U.S. District Court Judge Robert L. Carter yesterday that the tax trades for which they were convicted were legal and that the racketeering statute under which they were charged is "unconstitutionally vague."  Meanwhile, prosecutors in the case filed a separate memorandum seeking to force the convicted defendants to forfeit assets totaling $19.2 million.  A federal jury last month decided that the six defendants must forfeit assets totaling $3.8 million, far less than the government had sought.  The defendants in the first-ever racketeering case involving officials of a securities firm were convicted on all but one of 64 felony counts involving a variety of acts of conspiracy, racketeering, and securities, wire and mail fraud.  Two of those counts related to charges stemming from the potent Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, or RICO. RICO requires convicted defendants to forfeit their profits from the alleged wrongdoing, plus interest, as well as their salaries during the period of wrongdoing and their stake in what the law calls a "racketeering enterprise."  The defendants in the case are James Sutton Regan, Jack Z. Rabinowitz, Charles M. Zarzecki, Paul A. Berkman and Steven B. Smotrich, all of whom are former officials of Princeton/Newport, and Bruce Lee Newberg, a former trader for Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. Princeton/Newport, which has announced its liquidation, is an investment firm based in Princeton, N.J., and Newport Beach, Calif.  Lawyers for all six defendants asked the judge to order an acquittal or, alternatively, a new trial.  The government had alleged that Princeton/Newport arranged to sell securities at a loss and then repurchase them later at the same or higher prices; such a practice is known as stock parking.  In this case, the government said, the aim was to claim unlawful tax losses.  Defense lawyers argued in their 43-page memorandum that there was a long line of cases allowing tax losses in cases that were almost the same as the one against the Princeton/Newport defendants.  The lawyers also argued that, contrary to the government's allegation that the deductions Princeton/Newport claimed as losses were "false, ficticious and bogus," they were legal under provisions of the Internal Revenue Service code.  The lawyers also said that even if the tax trades can be construed as unlawful, the defendants were entitled to "fair notice" in advance that the law forbade such trades.  Since they received no such warning, the attorneys said, the defendants should be acquitted.  In an argument that defense lawyers say may be attempted in a number of upcoming cases, the Princeton/Newport attorneys contended that the RICO statute itself was vague and thus engendered "uncertainty and confusion."  The lawyers cited a recent U.S. Supreme Court case in which four justices, in a concurring opinion written by Justice Antonin Scalia, invited a constitutional challenge to the RICO statute on the grounds of vagueness.  In that opinion, issued earlier this year in H.J. Inc. v.  Northwestern Bell Telephone Co., Justice Scalia wrote that the statute was vague and, perhaps, poorly drafted.  Defense lawyers have said that the Supreme Court is likely soon to accept a challenge to the RICO statute.  But many defense lawyers say that the Supreme Court is more likely to agree to hear such a challenge in a civil case, rather than a criminal matter such as the case against the Princeton/Newport defendants.  The government's memorandum, seeking to enforce the forfeitures, alleged that despite the jury's $3.8 million verdict, the Princeton/Newport officials should be required to forfeit all interests and salary derived from Princeton/Newport during the period of the alleged crimes.  This, the government said, amounted to $19.2 million.  The U.S. Justice Department approved the government's forfeiture motion.  Prosecutors said jurors were wrong when they required the defendants to forfeit only a portion of their interests in Princeton/Newport and hadn't followed Judge Carter's instructions.  The government's forfeiture motion applied to all of the defendants except for Mr. Newberg.  Mr. Newberg, the government said, received no salary from and had no partnership interest in the Princeton/Newport enterprise.  Jurors imposed $200,000 in forfeitures on Mr. Newberg.  Judge Carter has already indicated that he was inclined to overrule the jury and award the government the full amount it has requested in forfeitures.  Monday, September 11, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10.5%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.775% 30 to 44 days; 8.75% 45 to 59 days; 8.625% 60 to 89 days; 8.375% 90 to 119 days; 8.25% 120 to 149 days; 8.125% 150 to 179 days; 7.75% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000:8.80% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.29% one month; 8.30% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.28% six months; 8.28% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market:8.80% one month; 8.75% three months; 8.75% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.63% 60 days; 8.53% 90 days; 8.48% 120 days; 8.40% 150 days; 8.32% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% two months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% three months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% four months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% five months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 8 15/16% three months; 8 15/16% six months; 8 7/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, September 11, 1989 , auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.64%, 13 weeks; 7.64%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.06%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.08%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Turbo Resources Ltd. said it expects an unusual charge against third-quarter earnings of about 2.5 million Canadian dollars (US$2.1 million), resulting from the planned shutdown of its oil refinery.  Turbo said most of the 30,000-barrel-a-day refinery will be closed for maintenance reasons for 30 days, and part of the plant will be down for as much as 45 days.  The refinery, which is near here, had its last scheduled maintenance shutdown in 1986.  Separately, the oil refining and marketing concern said it plans modifications to the refinery, at a total cost of C$15 million, that are expected to result in improved earnings.  The U.S. Supreme Court has demonstrated its support for free speech by declaring that flag-burning is a legal form of protest.  But where does the high court stand on commercial speech?  Two recent Supreme Court decisions have put greater restrictions on commercial speech.  A third case pending before the Court is fanning ad industry fears that the court will strike again.  "We clearly have two negative signs from the Supreme Court, which means that . . . legislators may well feel they have a better shot at outlawing or regulating {commercial} speech," says Richard Kurnit, a lawyer specializing in advertising at the firm of Frankfurt, Garvis, Klein & Selz.  The latest case "could be another sign in terms of that direction."  Marketers are particularly concerned because several congressional efforts are under way to restrict advertising.  Most worrisome are attempts by Rep. Tom Luken (D., Ohio) to limit tobacco advertising.  Advertisers fear that there might even be enough congressional support to attempt to ban tobacco advertising altogether.  "I would have told you three years ago I wouldn't think a ban on cigarette advertising would withstand a constitutional challenge," says Douglas Wood, an advertising specialist at the New York law firm of Hall, Dickler, Lawler, Kent & Friedman.  "Today, I'm not sure.  In fact, it probably could withstand a constitutional challenge if properly drafted based on recent decisions by the Supreme Court."  The latest case involves alleged advertising by a lawyer.  The case, Gary E. Peel vs.  Attorney Registration and Disciplinary Commission of Illinois, concerns a lawyer who at the top of his stationery listed his certification by a trial lawyers' group.  The Review Board censured the lawyer, Mr. Peel, for violating its rules forbidding lawyers to call themselves "certified" or "specialists."  The American Advertising Federation, in an amicus curiae brief to the court, insisted that the certification mention isn't advertising at all.  And even if it is advertising, "the restriction is far too broad," contends Alan Madans, a partner with the Chicago law firm of Rothschild, Barry & Myers who co-wrote the brief.  "Our position is, unless you can demonstrate that the speech is misleading . . . then you can't place restrictions on it at all."  But it is far from clear whether the Supreme Court will agree with that view.  In 1986, it struck what advertisers say was its first recent blow, with Posadas de Puerto Rico Association vs.  Tourism Co.  In that case, it upheld Puerto Rico's ban on advertising gambling to local citizens -- even though gambling is legal and the advertising wasn't false or misleading.  Then, in June, came a case involving college students who attempted to throw a Tupperware party at the State University of New York.  They were forbidden by university officials who cited rules prohibiting commercial enterprises on campus.  The students sued the school, but the Supreme Court held in favor of the university ban.  In both of these cases, advertising lawyers say, the court allowed greater restrictions on commercial speech than were previously allowed as defined by the 1980 Central Hudson Gas & Electric vs.  Public Service Commission of New York decision.  That decision established a test the government must meet before regulating truthful advertising: the restriction must directly advance a substantial government interest, and it must be the least restrictive regulation.  In the SUNY case, the Supreme Court in fact modified the Central Hudson test so that advertising restrictions must be "reasonable," rather than the "least restrictive."  Several advertising advocates say that change opens the way for a relatively widespread crackdown on commercial speech.  The court "has retreated materially," says Hall Dickler's Mr. Wood.  "We dread when the Supreme Court gets another case now, because it isn't a court receptive to extending the kind of First Amendment freedoms that had been extended in the past."  Still, despite the Court's recent rulings, and the chance that it may put further restrictions on commercial speech, some lawyers say its moves so far won't have any widespread repercussions.  They note that even in the SUNY case, the court said any "reasonable" ad restrictions must also be "narrowly tailored," which "does have some bite to it," Mr. Madans says.  Neither Mr. Madans nor Mr. Kurnit believe that a tobacco ad ban would withstand a Supreme Court challenge.  Still, Mr. Madans says, "I don't think there's any question that this court is going to be more likely than some of the courts of the past 10 or 15 years to uphold restrictions on commercial speech."  ---  Tambrands' Consolidation  Tambrands Inc. split with Campbell-Mithun-Esty, consolidating its $15 million domestic feminine-protection division's ad account at Ally & Gargano, New York.  The loss is the latest in a string of client defections at Saatchi & Saatchi Co.'s Campbell-Mithun-Esty, including the $25 million American Home Products Corp. account earlier this year.  In a statement, Campbell-Mithun-Esty said it was "surprised," adding that the Tambrands "decision does not reflect any failure on our part, but is a result in a change in Tambrands top management."  Tambrands appointed a new chairman, Martin F.C. Emmett, this past April.  However, a Tambrands spokesman said the Lake Success, N.Y., company felt Ally & Gargano's strategic and creative plans were superior to the other presentations.  For Ally & Gargano, meanwhile, the win is a major one.  It already handles advertising for Tambrands' Maxithins, a relatively inactive account recently, as well as for a new product currently being test marketed.  Ally & Gargano now assumes the $12 million Tampax assignment, plus advertising for three other new products that have been at Campbell-Mithun-Esty.  McCann-Erickson, which also sought the account, continues to handle Tampax advertising in 12 European countries.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   SHUTTLE WARS: Trump Shuttle isn't the only East Coast shuttle service with a famous business tycoon.  Today, Pan Am introduces a spokesman to tout the executive types its airline attracts: He's Milburne Pennybags, the character in Parker Brothers' Monopoly game.  "It seems anyone who's anyone in business is going directly to the Pan Am Shuttle," the ads boast.  TV and print ads, created by Grey Advertising, New York, break today.  WHO'S NEWS: Ted Colangelo, 54, will retire as chairman of Clarion Marketing & Communications, Greenwich, Conn., at the end of the year.  Clarion Marketing & Communications is a unit of D'Arcy Masius Benton & Bowles.  A.M.E. Inc. said shareholders holding 80% of the company's shares approved the company's acquisition by A.M.E. Holding Co., a concern formed by Lawrence J. Berkowitz.  The transaction is scheduled to close Sept. 20.  A.M.E. provides videotape post-production services.  Mr. Berkowitz is former chairman of a payroll company for the entertainment industry.  Carol Graham's Aug. 11 Americas column "A Peruvian Death Squad's Links to the Government" is misleading.  By focusing on one small group, known as the Comando Rodrigo Franco, Ms. Graham has missed the story of the several death squads linked to the Peruvian government, including the Maoist Sendero Luminoso -- Shining Path -- rsponsible for 15,000 deaths since 1980.  The ruling APRA party is a mishmash of leftists, from the moderate variety to Shining Path supporters.  Peru's President Alan Garcia revealed his own sympathies last year when he professed admiration for the "idealism" of the Shining Path guerrillas.  The APRA government is rent with ideological squabbles, policy differences and power struggles that increasingly are settled by fratricidal violence.  While the government dissolves into murderous factions, the country continues to sink.  Karen LaFollette  Research Associate  The Institute for Political Economy  Washington  Ending several months of relatively warm U.S.-European trade relations, U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills says she is worried again that the European Community is heading toward a protectionist "Fortress Europe."  During a lunch with reporters, she said she is worried about regulations and proposed regulations to require heavy local content in television programming, autos and electronic office equipment.  In criticizing European auto quotas, Mrs. Hills also called "voluntary" auto-export restraints the U.S. once set up with Japan a "mistake."  She said they drove up the price of Japanese cars and helped the Japanese move into the higher end of the market.  Until now, it has been unusual for a senior U.S. official to openly criticize the restraint program.  Mrs. Hills said the Bush administration is committed to avoiding new protectionist measures of its own.  U.S. officials stopped asking for the auto-import restraints several years ago, but the Japanese continued them unilaterally to avoid political backlash in the U.S.  The fear of a Fortress Europe has been expressed off and on by non-European officials and businessmen as the EC prepares for its unified, barrier-free market set for 1992.  But yesterday Mrs. Hills said that in recent weeks, more and more businessmen have phoned her to complain of unfair European trade practices.  In the coming seven days Mrs. Hills is to visit Bern, Switzerland; Geneva; Bonn; Brussels; Rome; Paris and (twice) London.  She is also pushing Europeans to accept a U.S. plan for a "substantial progressive reduction" in agricultural subsidies.  She also is talking about services, telecommunications, patents and copyrights and a broadening of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade to include investment, services and textiles.  But the three areas that have most sparked Mrs. Hills's ire are television, autos and circuit boards.  She said a proposed EC directive calling for television broadcasts to include a majority of EC-made programs has overtones of censorship and is a violation of the GATT agreement.  What's more, she said, television shows "happen to be a premier export of the U.S."  The EC directive, proposed largely at French urging, reflects existing French rules aimed at supporting France's heavily subsidized but ailing television and movie industry.  But other European countries, notably Britain, oppose the directive, and its adoption is an open question.  One area in which U.S. producers are being hurt is circuit boards for electronic office equipment.  To fight alleged Japanese dumping of typewriters and printers, Europe enacted what Mrs. Hills called an "ambiguous" rule on the origin of circuit boards -- assemblages of semiconductors -- that make the machines work.  To avoid dumping charges, Mrs. Hills says, Japanese companies simply use European circuit boards.  U.S. semiconductor makers are howling.  "We are finding American circuit boards being designed out of this product, and we are told they are being designed out because they aren't made in Europe," she said.  She said this kind of rule could force Americans to build unneeded plants in Europe.  Similarly, she said "the auto industry in the U.S. was profoundly affected by" French efforts to keep out British-made Nissan Motor Co. Bluebird sedans because they didn't have 80% European content.  The French dropped their effort this year.  But they restrict true Japanese-made cars to 3% of the French market.  Several other countries also have quotas.  Although some EC officials said they intend to eliminate all quotas after 1992, the French are pressing for a temporary Europewide continuation.  U.S. officials fear that Japanese cars made in the U.S., or U.S. parts for those cars, could be affected.  Mrs. Hills said she hopes to solve the various problems through negotiation.  A few years ago, my wife and I took a trip through the Western states.  When we entered our first National Park, the park ranger told us admission was $2.50.  Then she bent down, looked in the car (my wife was driving), and asked, "Anyone in the car over 62?"  When I told her I was, she waved us through.  As soon as we pulled through the gate, I asked my wife to stop so I could run back to the ranger's booth.  "Don't you want proof of my age?"  I asked, a little shocked that she had taken my word so willingly.  I had only recently turned 62.  "No, that's OK," she answered smiling.  Time was that I had to show proof of age to order an alcoholic drink or even enter a place that served them.  Even when I wore a Navy uniform, with gold braid and a chest full of ribbons, I was "carded."  Time has marched on and there have been some changes.  Any time a store advertises "Senior Citizen Discount," I ask for it.  I am now 66, a senior citizen.  Each time I claim my discount, the clerk takes my word for it.  Do I have such an honest face that everyone takes me at my word?  I recently went to the movies: $3.50 for senior citizens and $5 for all others.  I asked for a senior citizen ticket.  "Don't you want proof that I'm an old timer?"  I asked.  "Oh no, that's perfectly all right," said the ticket dispenser.  It may have been perfectly all right with her, but it damn well wasn't perfectly all right with me.  Friends, even enemies, tell me I don't look my age.  My hair, although thinner, is still brown.  I still stand six feet, although I don't have the ramrod posture I had when I was in the Navy.  I'm still straight up and down; tall and lean is how I'm described.  There are no pouches under my eyes, and if I do have any facial wrinkles, my brown beard hides them.  I am, if I may say so myself, a pretty good specimen of a 66-year-old man.  The only hints of my true age are a few medical problems that only my internist knows about, and she isn't talking.  Carding young people ordering liquor has to do with losing a liquor license.  But when older people claim a senior citizen discount, money is involved.  In many of the stores where I shop, there is a 10% discount for us "old folks."  And that movie house I went to gave me a 30% discount without ever asking for proof of my age.  Do these businesses really want to lose money?  Young people are foolishly upset because they look so young but have the burning desire to look older.  In time, they will feel flattered if others think they are younger.  Isn't it natural that senior citizens, at least those like me, just over the age limit, should be upset not to be carded?  I have a soft spot in my heart for a ticket agent at the Cleveland airport.  When I purchased a senior discount ticket, he asked for proof of age.  Bless that man.  He had me smiling all the way to Phoenix.  When I get to be 75 or more, my age might be obvious.  But now, having just crossed the age barrier, would it upset some eternal scheme if someone questioned my age?  Will someone out there please card me?  ---  Mr. Gittler, of Oberlin, Ohio, writes and lectures on management issues and doesn't look a day over 64 1/2.  Time Warner Inc.'s magazine group is set to unveil a new advertising twist: personalized advertising in its three major weekly magazines.  Company officials said Time Warner will announce in the next two weeks a plan allowing advertisers to target specific readers of its Time, People, and Sports Illustrated magazines.  The plan, called Target Select, will use a high-technology binding process, known as selective binding, to place ads only in those magazines going to certain subscribers.  The plan initially will allow marketers to advertise specifically to three groups: catalogue shoppers, people who have recently moved, and affluent readers of at least 50 years of age, the officials said.  As previously reported, Time has been gearing up for selective binding for more than a year.  Other smaller magazines, including Farm Journal and American Baby magazine, already use the special binding process.  When Wieslaw Kielar, one of the first inmate-slaves in Auschwitz-Birkenau, a Catholic, and later a Polish journalist, saw the crematoria begin to operate, he later wrote: "Although we had experienced a great deal during our more than three years in the camp, it was still a shock so great that one lost one's belief in everything, even in God."  Kielar and two friends watched crowds of newly arrived innocents, while silent smoke arose above the crematoria.  "Bathed in cold sweat, I watched these Dantesque scenes, holding tightly the damp hand of Edek or Waldeck who, like me, were convinced that there was no God.  At least not here on this small plot of earth, which apparently was outside his control."  Kielar arrived at the camp in June 1940, on one of the first trains.  The number issued him -- 290 -- was to be his identity for five years.  Most prisoners died in their first three months.  I saw the first newsreels of the camps and their gaunt survivors as a boy of 11, and ever since I have felt that all ethical and religious reflection henceforward had to absorb what happened there.  For at Auschwitz-Birkenau, where in the spring flowers blew in the breeze under the smoke from human bodies, ruthless leaders of a highly educated people made a supreme effort to eradicate an entire race of people.  Yet the most crushing aspect of Auschwitz was not so much the terrifying scale of its ambitions, nor even its mad efficiency in burning 9,000 bodies per day but the daily suffocation of the human soul.  The place, everything about it, was meant to extinguish every ember of the will to live.  Memoirs of Auschwitz stress most the hunger that made every cell of the body ache, the grinding weariness of muscles, and the misery of working in cold rain and knee-high mud, with no hope.  "Work or up the chimney," inmates were told, in word and crushing deed, "the choice is yours."  In those accounts, one hears the buzz of flies over blood-drenched earth near the death wall at Block 11; one sees the handfuls of lice festering in the open wound between the legs of a bedmate.  I shall never forget Kielar's first of 21 nights freezing in the "standing cells," unable to lie down or to hold up those dying against him.  Most of the millions who perished at Auschwitz never even slept there for a night.  They went straight from trains to "showers" under Zyklon B, which killed in minutes, to the open burial pyres (in earlier days) or the crematoria (in later).  Only the "fit" were enslaved as subhuman "workers," until they dropped dead or were "selected out" for weaknesses, or even at someone's whim, in order to make room for newcomers.  Most decisions in the camps had little reason.  "Here there is no why," one guard explained.  In his reminiscences of the camp, S.S. Officer Perry Broad describes an execution: The victims were brought naked into a crematorium where 200 persons had been murdered just moments before.  The feet of the second group splashed in blood of those who had fallen before them, as one by one the executioner put a pistol within centimeters of their heads and they, too, fell heavily.  Close up, individual by individual, the horrors of Auschwitz are even more gruesome than the mind-numbing vastness of the scale of terror.  Auschwitz meant the killing of the human spirit; of hope; of mercy; of every civilizing convention of decency.  To call it "brutal" does injustice to animals.  In trying to extinguish humanity, it put God in lengthy eclipse.  To be sure, many were the humane tears, griefs, and moments of supreme nobility in Auschwitz.  Some gave their lives so others might live longer.  There are tales of saints (a few), and also of simple decencies, loyalties, generosities.  Clandestinely, Catholic Mass was celebrated there.  Ten thousand men celebrated the praises of Rosh Hashanah, 1944, in grief-stricken assembly.  The very witnesses to the death of God at Auschwitz sometimes, despite themselves, write at moments of Providence and faith.  Still, I sympathize with those who believe that Auschwitz-Birkenau should not be marked visibly with signs of religious faith, of God's presence, of hope.  It is fitting that the place be desolate, empty, visibly unredeemed.  I do not believe that God for even a single instant ignored the immensity of Auschwitz.  But human beings must evermore see the horror that human beings wrought at Auschwitz-Birkenau, see it straight, see it true, and see it desolate.  Let me add one more thing.  In my early teens I used to make an annual pilgrimage by bicycle to a monastery of Carmelite nuns some 30 miles away in Loretto, Pa.  I felt a certain power from their prayers and their totally self-consuming lives.  They lived in silence, penance, prayer and pure love of God.  Their witness was important to me.  Indeed, St. Therese of Lisieux, a Carmelite nun who died in France in 1897, is the most widely acclaimed saint of this century; a statue reminding us of her is found in virtually every Catholic church I have ever visited.  The Carmelite ideal is dear to Catholics, their strict cloisters perhaps the most deeply respected of any homes of worship. (It is a grave violation for men to enter behind their walls without ecclesiastical permission.)  Nonetheless, the hope the Carmelites bring to Godforsaken humankind, while dear to Catholic faith, is -- I can see -- discordant with the desolation proper to Auschwitz-Birkenau, as many Jews remember its reality.  Symbolic expressions of Catholic and Jewish faith, so alike in their essentials, may yet be discordant in circumstances such as these.  But Catholics have also been instructed, when someone asks to go a mile with them, "to go the second mile."  Let us move the convent, then, for the sake of the peace and healing that these sisters represent.  God will hear their prayers from anywhere; an invisible filament connects all parts of earth to every other.  St. Therese taught us that signs of God's absence are no less signs of Him: in the night, in the dark, when we seem to be entirely abandoned.  Let Auschwitz-Birkenau remind us of the desolation proper to a place where God was hidden, His absence (and that of human civilization) so grievously felt, amid immeasurable human suffering.  Such desolation will not really make it far from Him.  On the contrary.  ---  Mr. Novak, director of social and political studies at the American Enterprise Institute, is publisher of Crisis, a lay Catholic journal.  From Paul Berman's obituary for Michael Harrington in the Village Voice, Aug. 15:  The leader of American Socialism was no enemy of patriotic symbols.  In this respect Harrington resembled the French Socialists, who are natural patriots, and not some of his foolish critics on the nether reaches of the American left.  In last year's ridiculous controversy over the Pledge of Allegiance, it was Harrington who pointed out that the pledge was originally devised by a Socialist, not by a jingo.  Harrington's life was devoted to the affirmation that campaigning for social justice is the proper, unrealized expression of the American idea.  London's stock exchange said it and the British Merchant Banking and Securities Houses Association have agreed, in consultation with the Bank of England, to establish "informal arrangements for exchanging information about new sterling issues."  The exchange said the new arrangements will apply to all capital markets in sterling, both debt and equities.  The guidelines will apply to exchange and association members, effective Sept. 25, to issues amounting to #20 million ($30.6 million) or more.  Until March 14, companies selling sterling issues had to obtain timing consent from the Bank of England, but that requirement was dropped, along with other regulations, at the time of the British government's budget.  The new guidelines provide for advisers to notify the Bank of England in advance of the proposed timing and main features of a forthcoming new issue.  The central bank will indicate whether there is likely to be a clash with a competing issue.  The advisers then will be able to consider whether they wish the issue to proceed on the specified date, or whether they wish to consider an alternative timing, and tell the bank accordingly.  If a clash is likely to remain, the central bank will inform the sponsors of the competing issues.  The Commodity Futures Trading Commission, in a major enforcement action, accused two options-brokerage firms of using fraudulent, high-pressure sales tactics to bilk customers out of hundreds of millions of dollars.  The firms, International Trading Group Ltd., San Mateo, Calif., and Siegel Trading Co., Chicago, promised large profits in commodity futures options without indicating any risks, the CFTC contended.  But 85% of their clients lost money, in part because the firm charged commissions of 40% or more, the agency said.  ITG customers had losses of $428 million, while ITG made $283 million in commissions between January 1984 and May 1989, according to the suit.  During the same period, Siegel made about $40 million in commissions, while its customers lost $33.6 million.  Securities lawyers said that while this type of suit wasn't unusual, the complaint against ITG is the largest sales-solicitation action in CFTC history.  "The graphic illustration of the allegations is the amount of money lost by their customers," said Dennis Klejna, the CFTC's director of enforcement.  The CFTC alleged, in separate suits filed in U.S. district court in Los Angeles, that the firms misrepresented the potential for realizing profits, the firms' track records and the expertise of staff members.  The agency asked for the firms' profits -- which include the commissions -- to be disgorged from both firms and for injunctions against the firms to stop the actions.  The suits describe in detail high-pressure sales tactics used by both firms to get customers to commit.  For example, in the ITG suit, the CFTC described this sales pitch: "It's important to understand the urgency of moving now.  Why would you want to wait when you can get an excellent buy today?  Let's pick five positions up now . . .  Let's move now . . .  I never saw anyone make money who waited . . .  You will hate yourself for waiting."  In Chicago, a lawyer for Siegel said he hadn't seen the full complaint and declined to comment.  In a statement, ITG denied engaging in fraudulent sales practices.  The company also said it will defend the suit "vigorously" and will continue offering commodity investments.  The actions come at a time when the CFTC is under fire for its handling of the Ferruzzi Finanzaria S.p.A. soybean problem in July and the Justice Department's allegations of rampant illegal trading at the Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  But Mr. Klejna said the timing of the suits wasn't designed to blunt any of the recent criticism of the agency.  ITG, which advertises regularly on such cable networks as Financial News Network, is probably the largest player in the high-commission business of options on futures contracts.  A Wall Street Journal article earlier this month on the hazards of buying options by telephone described ITG, its sales pitches and its heavy 40% commissions.  ITG says its commission rate is always fully disclosed.  In one customer's case against ITG earlier this year, Administrative Law Judge William Spruill said: "It is almost a mathematical impossibility to make a profit in the long term with a markup of 40%."  The CFTC's reparations division received 139 customer complaints against ITG from October 1983 to August 1989.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  First Chicago Corp. -- $100 million of 8 7/8% notes due Sept. 15, 1994, priced at 99.825 to yield 8.92%.  The non-callable notes were priced at a yield spread of 80 basis points above the Treasury's five-year note.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-A-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Salomon Brothers Inc.  Safety-Kleen Corp. -- $100 million of 9 1/4% senior securities, due Sept. 15, 1999, priced at 99.675 to yield 9.30%.  The non-callable securities were priced at 118 basis points over the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated Baa-3 by Moody's and triple-B-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by William Blair & Co.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $400 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in 14 classes by Bear Stearns & Co.  For classes on which details were available from the underwriter, yields ranged from 9.07%, or 80 basis points over two-year Treasury securities, to 9.99%, or 185 basis points over 10-year Treasurys.  The offering, Series 1989-64, brings Fannie Mae's 1989 Remic issuance to $23.2 billion and its total volume to $35.3 billion since the program began in April 1987.  Collateral consists of Fannie Mae 9 1/2% securities with a weighted average remaining term to maturity of 29.2 years.  @ EUROBONDS  Societe Generale Finance Luxembourg (French parent) -- $100 million of 9 1/8% Eurobonds due Sept. 26, 1993, priced at 100.15 to yield 9.09% at issue price via Societe Generale.  Guaranteed by Societe Generale.  Fees 0.35.  Mitsui & Co. International Europe B.V. (Japanese parent) -- 20 billion yen of 8.05% Eurobonds due Oct. 12, 1993, priced at 101 1/2 via Yamaichi International Europe Ltd. Redemption linked to Nikkei stock average.  Guaranteed by Mistui & Co. Fees 1 5/8 points.  Federal Business Development Bank (Canada) -- 50 million Australian dollars of 19% Eurobonds due Oct. 11, 1990, priced at 101 7/8, via Bankers Trust International.  Redemption, at borrower's option, in U.S. dollars at a fixed rate of 0.74 cents for each Australian dollar.  Fees 1.  Sakata Corp. (Japan) -- 85 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due March 31, 1994, with an indicated 0.5% coupon at par via Union Bank of Switzerland.  Put option Sept. 30, 1991, at indicated 107 1/8 to yield 3.98%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note is convertible from Oct. 18, 1989, to March 22, 1991, at a 5% premium over the closing share price when terms are fixed tomorrow.  Fees 1 3/4.  Chancellor Helmut Kohl, whose political future has looked iffy for most of this year, won an important vote of confidence as party delegates re-elected him to serve two more years at the helm of the Christian Democratic Union.  Mr. Kohl's re-election as party chairman by a vote of 571-147, with 20 abstentions, was expected.  Nevertheless, the chancellor's comfortable victory margin -- and the generally positive atmosphere toward him at the convention -- showed his ability to bounce back from adversity.  Winning 77% of the votes cast, he nearly matched his 80.8% tally in 1987.  Mr. Kohl has been elected CDU chairman nine times since 1973.  Whether he can lead his party to re-election a third time in the national elections scheduled 15 months from now hangs chiefly on the party's ability to combat the recent popularity of the right-wing Republican Party.  But Mr. Kohl emerges from the party convention in far better shape than a few months ago.  Thus, many political forecasts caution it is too early to count out the politically crafty chancellor.  Novell Inc., one of the largest makers of computerized-networking equipment, said net income for its fiscal third quarter declined 2.5% to $11.8 million, or 35 cents a share.  Net was $12.1 million, or 37 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  Revenue for the quarter ended July 29 increased 13% to $101.8 million from $90.4 million for the comparable 1988 period.  The company attributed the net decline to several factors, including its continuing transition to software products from certain hardware products.  For the nine months, Novell had net of $34.3 million, or $1.03 cents a share, up 20% from $28.6 million, or 87 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 29% to $310.8 million from $241.2 million.  By comparison, 3Com Corp., Novell's biggest rival, said last week that it expects to report a profit for its fiscal-first quarter, rather than the loss it had expected.  The Santa Clara, Calif., maker of computer-networking products estimated "positive earnings per share" with sales projected at $89 million for the quarter ended Aug. 31.  The company attributed its turnaround to good sales last month and a good response by customers to new products.  In national over-the-counter trading, Novell closed at $26.125 a share, up $1.125.  Last month, Novell had said quarter net might be below 35 cents a share.  NATIONAL LOAN BANK, Houston, said it will pay a liquidating distribution of 30 cents for each common share Nov. 8 to stock of record Sept. 25.  The bank was created to acquire the troubled loans of  Texas Commerce Bancshares Inc. when Chemical New York Corp., now Chemical Banking Corp., purchased Texas Commerce in 1987.  National Loan has been trying to resolve the loans, liquidate its portfolio and distribute the proceeds to holders of its 34.7 million shares.  Sources at Eurocom S.A. confirmed they are talking to Britain's WCRS Group PLC about buying a majority stake in WCRS's world-wide advertising unit, in which Eurocom is a minority investor.  Officially, Eurocom continued to decline to comment on reports that it is negotiating to buy 50% or more of WCRS's ad unit, providing WCRS with the capital to invest more heavily in its media-buying business.  But unofficially, sources said that ever since Alain de Pouzilhac, a former HDM chairman, took over the chairmanship of Eurocom in April, he has been seeking majority control of a world-wide ad network.  WCRS's ad unit includes Della Femina McNamee WCRS in the U.S.  The Eurocom sources also say they are talking about buying majority control of one of the two other world-wide advertising groups with which they are allied.  Those two are HDM, a joint venture of Eurocom, DentsuInc. and Young & Rubicam Inc., and Bozell, a U.S.-based agency with which Eurocom has a small joint investment called Synergy.  However, a Bozell spokesman dismissed that possibility as "improbable" and "most unlikely."  Tim Pollak, HDM's chief executive officer, called the report "categorically false."  Nervous investors bid bond prices a little higher and forced stocks a little lower in lackluster trading.  The dollar, which rose in early European trading, fell victim to profit-taking during the U.S. trading session.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average lost 5.13 points to close at 2704.41 in light trading.  Long-term Treasury bonds posted modest gains while the dollar dropped against the mark and the yen.  The prospect of economic news to come Friday hobbled financial markets, which have been trading without much sense of the economy's direction for the past week.  Although there will be data on international trade, inflation and factory usage Friday, early estimates are that the statistics will be about in line with previous months' figures and won't settle any debates about the economy's course.  That leaves investors to their own devices.  In the stock market, money managers continued to exercise the caution that marked last week's price declines.  Not only are equity investors awaiting all that economic news, but they are also reluctant to take positions now in advance of the "triple witching hour" Friday in which futures and options expire.  Although selling pressure was modest overall, the slack pace of trading left stock prices vulnerable to computer-assisted program selling.  Several waves of program selling swept through the market, knocking the industrial average as much as 25 points lower before it recovered.  Bond traders said they expect little action prior to Friday's release of economic statistics.  Even then, they said, there is little chance the data will be enough to prompt the Federal Reserve to take any immediate action.  Most regard the Fed as being in a "wait and see" mode that will carry current monetary policy well into the fourth quarter.  In major market activity:  Stock prices slid in thin trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 126 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board led gainers 936 to 530.  Bond prices rose.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose a little more than one eighth of a point, or more than $1.25 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The dollar fell.  In late afternoon New York trading the U.S. currency was at 1.9866 marks and 146.70 yen compared with 1.9950 marks and 147.20 yen Friday.  A federal judge here denied an attempt by Sir James Goldsmith and his Hoylake Investments Ltd. to block the California Department of Insurance from reviewing his proposed #13.4 billion ($21.1 billion) bid for B.A.T Industries PLC, parent of Los Angeles-based insurer Farmers Group Inc.  Federal Judge Edward Rafeedie also denied a motion by Farmers to have the Hoylake lawsuit dismissed.  The California federal court is the third, behind Washington state and Texas, to deny Sir James's request for a preliminary injunction.  Sir James has filed suit in nine states in which Farmers has insurance operations seeking to block regulators there from reviewing his bid for B.A.T, a London-based tobacco, retailing, paper and financial services concern.  A Hoylake adviser said Hoylake intends to appeal Judge Rafeedie's decision.  He pointed out that the decision was without prejudice as to Hoylake's ability to seek an injunction at a later date, and that the judge made note of effects that delays in the regulatory process are having on Sir James's bid.  Hoylake yesterday said it filed an appeal to the Texas decision in the fifth U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals.  Sir James is rushing in London to get an extension of the Oct. 7 deadline by which he must complete the acquisition of B.A.T under British takeover rules.  He has blamed the U.S. insurance regulatory process for the delays, and has said that without the extension, his takeover bid will fail.  Britain's Takeover Panel is expected to rule this week on his request for an extension.  In a move designed to win the favor of the regulators, Sir James has reached an agreement to sell Farmers, if Hoylake acquires B.A.T, to France's Axa Midi Assurances for $4.5 billion.  Kenneth A. Goldman, 40 years old, was named chief financial officer, vice president of finance and administration, of this computer-chip manufacturer.  Mr. Goldman succeeds Stan Meresman, who resigned to accept a position at another Silicon Valley company.  David Thomson, heir to one of the world's wealthiest families, liquidated about 113.1 million Canadian dollars (US$95.2 million) of shares in the family's flagship companies by selling them to his father, Kenneth Thomson.  According to their separate holding companies, David Thomson and his closely held Kluin Inc. sold large stakes in Thomson Corp. and Hudson's Bay Co. to concerns controlled by his 66-year-old father.  The Thomsons couldn't be reached to comment.  David Thomson, 32, is the only one of the elder Thomson's children who has been active in the family businesses.  In the past few years he was named a director of both Thomson Corp. and Hudson's Bay.  A spokesman for Hudson's Bay said David Thomson continues as chairman of its Simpson's Ltd. unit.  Judging from recent company documents, David Thomson appears to have sold all or most of his individual holdings in Thomson Corp., a publishing and leisure travel company, and Hudson's Bay, a retailer.  The Thomson Corp. shares that David Thomson sold to his father, who is Thomson Corp. chairman and a Hudson's Bay director, are about 0.5% of those outstanding.  The Hudson's Bay common David Thomson sold represents about 4.2% of stock outstanding, while the Series H preferred accounts for about 5% of the shares outstanding.  After the transactions, Kenneth Thomson will control 68.38% of Thomson Corp., and Woodbridge Co., which he controls through trusts, will own 77.29% of Hudson's Bay's common and 26.1% of the retailer's Series H preferred.  In the latest foray by Hollywood producer Burt Sugarman outside his company's core cement-making operations, Giant Group Ltd. agreed to buy the Denver-based regional airline that operates United Express.  The price wasn't disclosed for the proposed purchase of Aspen Airways Inc., and final terms are being negotiated by Mr. Sugarman and Aspen Airways Chairman Don Ringsby.  The sale is subject to regulatory and other approval, the companies said.  Aspen owns and operates four BAe 146 jetliners and 10 Convair 580 aircraft, a fleet that Paul A. Turk, an analyst with the Arlington, Va., aircraft consulting firm of Avmark Inc. valued at about $46 million.  Closely held Aspen, owned by the Ringsby family for 21 years, has operated United Express under a marketing agreement with the United Airlines unit of Chicago-based UAL Corp. since 1986.  It now serves 16 cities in Colorado, Wyoming, North Dakota, South Dakota, New Mexico and the Canadian province of Manitoba, and offers seasonal nonstop service to the ski-resort town of Aspen, Colo., from Los Angeles, Chicago and Dallas.  United Express will provide nonstop flights to Aspen from the three cities beginning Dec. 14, it said.  Mr. Sugarman, who holds about 31.8% of Giant's stock including certain options, wasn't immediately available for comment on the agreement.  Giant's stock closed yesterday at $19.50, down 25 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  A United Airlines spokesman said the transaction shouldn't affect its United Express marketing contract with Aspen, which expires in 1991.  "We anticipate business as usual," the spokesman said.  Giant Group, which has interests in cement, newsprint recycling and fast food, has engaged in several attempts at industry-hopping in recent years.  The company, which recently sold off its stake in Barris Industries Inc., a film and television show producer, was thwarted last year in a bid to acquire Media General Inc., a Richmond, Va., publishing and communications company.  Mr. Sugarman, 49 years old, known for his dealmaking both in and out of the motion picture industry, also had sought to sell its cement manufacturing business last year and told investors in May that any of the company's businesses could be sold if the price were right.  In May, Giant sold its 24.4% stake in Barris Industries for $34.5 million to an Australian joint venture owned by Westfield Capital Corp. and Northern Star Holdings Ltd. of Sydney.  Mr. Sugarman has said that his main interests in identifying companies to acquire are a low cost of operation and a reliance on mass markets that would allow the companies to capitalize on the sharp population growth he expects in the 1990s.  Takeover fears grounded another $50 million Dutch auction for AMR Corp.'s preferred stock.  For the third time in two weeks, an issue of AMR Dutch auction preferred failed because there weren't enough buyers of the stock to accommodate investors who wanted to sell.  The collapse also was embarrassing for Bankers Trust New York Corp., which arranged the offering, just as banks are entering the securities business.  While banks can't yet underwrite stock offerings publicly, they can sell securities such as AMR's preferred in the so-called private placement market.  Auction-rate preferred is a type of floating-rate preferred stock whose rate is set by auction every 49 days.  An auction fails when there aren't enough buyers for the amount of stock that holders want to sell.  Underwriters usually make sure this doesn't happen by participating in auctions when buyers seem scarce.  Corporations have found preferred stock a good investment because 70% of the dividends they receive are tax free.  Market sources say the AMR auction failed because of concerns that the company, parent of American Airlines, may be a takeover target.  Takeovers often result in credit downgradings, which in turn drive up debt costs.  The issue's dividend was set at 10.706%, which is 120% of the Federal Reserve 60-day Double-A commercial paper index, a Bankers Trust spokesman said.  He added existing holders will hold their shares for a 49-day period until the next auction is held.  Despite increases in sales, profits of U.S. manufacturers fell to 4.8% of sales in the second quarter from 5.9% in the first quarter, the Commerce Department said.  Profits also fell from the year-earlier quarter, when they were 5.9% of sales, the department said.  Manufacturing, mining and trade corporations posted $33.61 billion in profits for April, May and June, down from $40.19 billion in the first three months of the year.  Sales climbed to $693.55 billion in the second quarter from $682.52 billion in the first quarter.  Declining profits in the face of rising sales suggests that U.S. manufacturers are absorbing higher production costs rather than passing them on to consumers.  But if manufacturers' profit margins become too squeezed they could eventually be forced to raise prices or cut back on workers.  Profits from the sale of durable goods, products such as cars, machinery and home appliances which are expected to last at least three years, fell to $14.64 billion in the second quarter from $17.85 billion in the first quarter.  Profits on sales of nondurable goods fell to $18.97 billion in the second quarter from $22.34 billion in the first quarter.  All figures are adjusted for seasonal variations.  The annual rate of return on shareholders' equity fell to 14.5% in the second quarter from 15.5% in the first quarter and 17.5% in the second quarter of 1988.  Those figures aren't seasonally adjusted.  A dissident group of Connecticut Bancorp Inc. holders filed suit to delay the Sept. 21 stockholders meeting, stepping up efforts to wrest control of the holding company for its Norwalk Bank unit.  The group, led by Peter V. Lathouris, also released proxy materials for mailing to stockholders.  It controls about 84,000, or 6%, of the company's about 1.4 million shares.  Last week, the group nominated a slate of nine directors, including Mr. Lathouris and three current board members whom the company didn't renominate.  The group added that its $800,000 original investment in the stock had dropped to about $421,000 at current prices.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Connecticut Bancorp shares were quoted at $4.25 bid, down 25 cents.  Mr. Lathouris's group said that late Thursday night, the two sides worked out "a compromise solution" that would have given the group more representation within the bank.  The proposal was voted down when the directors reconvened Friday.  "At this point, the company doesn't have comment on these matters," said Thomas J. Mitchell, corporate secretary.  The suit, filed yesterday in U.S. District Court in Bridgeport, Conn., charges the Norwalk, Conn.-based company and directors with use of false and misleading proxy materials, a false and misleading prospectus in connection with the company's June 1989 rights offering, fraud and breach of contract.  It seeks unspecified damages and postponement of the annual meeting.  One director named on both slates, Harriet Haffner, withdrew from both in protest over the matter, the dissident group said.  At the same time, two current directors, H. Carroll Brooke III and Jerome L. Klein, also nominated by both sides, said they would throw their support to the dissidents and remove themselves from the company's ballot.  Poland devalued the zloty 18.5% against the dollar and other Western currencies, the state news agency PAP said.  The devaluation applies to the official rate, used for currency conversions by tourists, for some transactions by Western business and for certain other exchanges.  But it doesn't affect the commercial rate of the zloty, which previously was used for black-market conversions but which was legalized in March for most individuals and for certain business transactions.  The National Bank of Poland said the new rate of exchange is 1,350 zlotys to the dollar, compared with 1,100 zlotys previously.  After two slow years, Hong Kong's garment-making industry is perking up as U.S. retail sales improve and some nervous foreign buyers shift business away from China.  However, the benefit to Hong Kong from the concern about China, which followed the Beijing massacre June 4, is viewed as only a temporary fillip.  Garment makers in Hong Kong, one of the world's biggest suppliers of garments, expect China's industry to recover soon.  After a boom in 1987, exports of garments from Hong Kong slumped, mainly because of softness in the U.S. market, which currently takes 46% of the British colony's garment exports.  Now, however, garment makers and their U.S. buyers say retail garment sales in the U.S. have begun to improve, causing an increase in orders to Hong Kong.  "The garment business had been very flat until the past six months, when things really picked up at retail," says a Hong Kong-based executive of a large U.S. department-store chain that is increasing orders from the colony.  Hong Kong garment makers tinge their optimism for a better year with caution about the outlook for the U.S. economy.  But there is growing evidence that American consumers are putting aside worries about a recession and are refurbishing their wardrobes.  Total sales by the major American retailers grew 5% in August from a year earlier, with apparel specialists and department stores posting the biggest gains.  Hong Kong export figures also reflect the improving U.S. garment sales.  In 1988, according to Hong Kong government statistics, domestic exports of garments to the U.S. fell 3% from 1987, to 30.99 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$3.97 billion).  But in the first half of 1989, exports to the U.S. rose 7% from a year earlier, to HK$13.66 billion.  In June alone, garment shipments to the U.S. rose 13.5% from a year earlier, to HK$3.11 billion.  Total domestic exports of garments, meanwhile, rose 11% in June from a year earlier, to HK$6.33 billion.  In the first half, such exports rose 7% from the year-earlier period, to HK$30.04 billion.  That was faster than 3% growth in all of 1988, to HK$67.31 billion.  While some orders that normally would have gone to China have been switched to Hong Kong, garment makers in the colony say the shift is likely to be short-lived, with most foreign orders returning to Chinese factories by next year.  "The buyers are already going back," says Kee Chan, managing director of Yangtzekiang Garment Manufacturing Co., one of Hong Kong's biggest apparel makers.  In the long term, Hong Kong isn't likely to be a major beneficiary if garment and textile investments shift out of China.  Because of quota restrictions, a tight labor market and rising wages, the colony's manufacturers now make garments and textiles that are mainly in the middle portion or high end of the price range. {Garments are the finished products; textiles are fabrics.}  With abundant, cheap labor, China produces large amounts of high-volume, low-priced garments and textiles.  Most of the world's garment trade is regulated by quotas, usually reached through bilateral negotiations, that are aimed at protecting domestic manufacturers from unfair foreign competition.  Exporting nations use a variety of methods to parcel out quotas to traders and manufacturers.  In Hong Kong, annual quota allocation is based on an exporter's past performance.  However, a quota holder can trade to others his right to export.  The price of the quota is determined by the market.  Even if the American market continues to improve, manufacturers worry about being able to find enough workers to process orders.  Although Hong Kong's economic growth is slowing, garment makers and other manufacturers continue to say they need to import workers to ease the colony's chronic labor shortage.  Protectionism also is a continuing worry for the industry.  Garment makers say an anti-dumping battle is looming in the U.S., where the National Knitwear and Sportswear Association is accusing Hong Kong and other Asian exporting nations of "dumping" acrylic yarn and garments made with acrylic.  The trade group is expected to ask the U.S. International Trade Commission to investigate.  Dumping occurs when goods are sold in an export market at prices below the cost of production or below the domestic-market price.  If the trade commission determines that dumping is taking place, it can place countervailing duties on the dumped products.  Local manufacturers deny they are dumping textiles and garments and accuse the U.S. and other world trade groups of protectionism.  Fifty years ago, Paul Mueller, a scientist working for J.R. Geigy S.S. in Switzerland, discovered that dichloro-diphenyl-trichloroethane -- DDT for short -- was a potent insecticide.  Mueller had been engaged in a systematic search for a new insecticide with very specific properties.  It must be very toxic to insects, long lasting in its effects, non-toxic to man and to plants, and cheap and easy to produce.  He decided that by combining chlorals with hydrocarbons and phenols he might succeed, and he worked for several years through a whole series of new compounds.  Several proved to be promising insecticides, but DDT was the best.  Mueller was a loner; he did not head a team of scientists.  Although trained as a chemist, he himself carried out the biological tests on insects.  He found that tiny amounts of DDT killed flies, aphids, cockchafers, Colorado beetles and many others.  He then brought in other Geigy workers to test further its effect on insects in the field, and its toxicity to mammals.  The results proved satisfactory, and by August 1941 DDT preparations were marketed in Switzerland, and by March 1942 received the trade name of Gesarol.  At this time Geigy representatives in Britain, the U.S. and Germany were informed of the discovery and sent samples of the product.  The speed with which DDT was marketed is interesting today, when, mainly as a result of the stringent tests on which environmentalists have insisted, it generally takes up to 10 years before a new insecticide is available for use.  Those who now decry any use of DDT would probably consider this speed a bad thing.  But had there been such a delay with the insecticide, many millions more people would have died during World War II.  In Britain and the U.S. the potentialities of DDT for wartime use were quickly realized.  During the World War I, millions of soldiers and civilians died in Europe from louse-borne typhus, and repetition of this was feared.  Also troops in tropical areas were in danger from malaria and other insect-borne diseases.  Existing insecticides, such as pyrethrum and derris, were in short supply.  DDT, possibly available in unlimited amounts, was a godsend.  The most spectacular use of DDT was the control of the incipient typhus epidemic in Naples, Italy.  In late 1943 typhus appeared among the civilian population.  The Allied medical authorities got to work with their limited supplies of pyrethrum and derris with some success, though those deloused were soon reinfested.  In January 1944 DDT dust became available.  During that month 1.3 million civilians were dusted, 72,000 on the peak day.  The great advantage of this method was that the patients did not have to undress, and their garments did not need to be sterilized.  About half an ounce of powder containing 5% of active ingredient was puffed down the collar and via other suitable openings to get under the clothes.  Those treated were "louse-proof" for several weeks.  No side effects other than some very minor cases of skin irritation were detected.  Within weeks typhus virtually disappeared; the Allied forces were protected.  DDT had many other wartime uses.  It stopped a plague epidemic in Dakar, in West Africa -- its first prophylactic use against the fleas that carry plague.  It was widely used against malarial mosquitoes in the Pacific, in Southeast Asia and in Africa.  The Germans used it against malaria in Greece, but otherwise did not appear to recognize its value.  During the war Switzerland was virtually isolated, and food could not be imported, so crop protection was vital.  DDT was used against many agricultural pests, particularly the Colorado beetle, which can destroy potato crops.  DDT was also used against flies in cattle sheds, and to protect fabrics from insect attack.  Immediately after the war ended, DDT became widely available for agricultural use.  Millions of tons were used throughout the world.  The largest amounts were used against the pests of cotton, with spectacular increases in yield.  For a time it seemed that we had the perfect chemical insecticide, and some entomologists though they would soon be unemployed.  Notwithstanding its virtues, however, experience soon showed that DDT had its faults.  As early as 1947 houseflies in Sweden, where the insecticide had been lavishly used, were found to have become resistant to it.  This was not because of a mutation, but because populations of flies usually contain a few individuals resistant to DDT. When the chemical is liberally used, in an attempt to eradicate the insects, the resistant individuals survive.  They quickly reproduce to give a largely resistant population.  As time went on the same thing happened with pests of cotton, and with malaria-carrying mosquitoes.  The immediate reaction was to increase the dose, and environmental contamination resulted.  DDT then ceased to be useful.  Fortunately, resistance occurred in only a minority of areas.  We found that if we used only enough insecticide to reduce the number of pests so damage was restricted, resistance was less likely, as non-resistant individuals swamped the resistant and control was still possible.  But the use of DDT clearly needed to be controlled.  The most serious complaint regarding DDT and other insecticides is that they pollute the environment and damage wildlife.  It is commonly believed that the dangers began to be realized only when Rachel Carson produced her book "Silent Spring" in 1962.  But this is untrue.  Scientists had long been aware of them.  I am recorded in the Transactions of the Royal Society of Tropical Medicine as saying on Feb. 15, 1945, "that-much more work should be done on its {DDT's} effects, in the field, on all manner of apparently unimportant insects and other forms of life, to ensure that there was not a serious effect on the 'balance of nature' with subsequent disastrous effects."  Much research on DDT's effects on wild birds and fish was done long before 1962 (some in my laboratory), and Britain's most effective controls of pesticides were introduced six months before "Silent Spring" appeared.  Nevertheless Rachel Carson did affect public opinion, and encouraged an anti-pesticide lobby whose success sometimes had unfortunate results in countries where insects were important carriers of serious diseases.  Damage to wildlife was apparent in Britain in the late 1950s, when seed-eating birds were found dead in the fields in large numbers.  Over the years research has shown that DDT may reduce bird populations by its effect on egg shells, which are made so fragile that they break in the nest and fewer chicks survive.  Conservationists complain that DDT is so persistent that it goes on damaging wildlife long after it is applied.  This is ironic, as the greatest value of DDT was its long lasting property, illustrated by its success with lice, and by the way mosquitoes are killed for months when the chemical is applied to the inner walls of houses.  DDT has the great advantage of being relatively non-toxic to man.  No one has ever died when using DDT as an insecticide.  The only fatal poisoning reported was when it was mistaken for flour and used, neat, in pancakes.  Mainly as a result of damage to wildlife, but also because of inaccurate reports of toxicity and carcinogenicity, an active campaign against DDT was organized in the U.S. and Western Europe.  As a result it has been banned, in my opinion prematurely, in many developed countries.  The first result was that extremely poisonous insecticides such as parathion were used, and these caused hundreds of human deaths.  Fortunately there are other less toxic and non-persistent chemicals available, but these are expensive.  Many Third World countries still use DDT, particularly for indoor spraying (against mosquitoes) -- which causes little pollution outside the house.  DDT should be restricted mainly when pest populations become resistant.  Unfortunately, some Third World countries have followed the example of the richer nations and banned DDT prematurely.  This happened in Sri Lanka, where malaria had been efficiently controlled by DDT, but where the disease recurred in epidemic proportions when the government stopped using the insecticide.  This has also happened in parts of India and Africa.  DDT should still be used, with appropriate safeguards, wherever pests can be well controlled, and particularly when more expensive chemicals cannot be afforded.  If it is used in minimum amounts, attempting only to reduce pests sufficiently to prevent serious damage rather than to eradicate them completely, resistant populations will not be quickly developed, the environment will not be seriously polluted, and DDT should continue to be useful for many years to come.  ---  Mr. Mellanby, a entomologist living in Cambridge, England, has studied pesticides' effects on wildlife for 50 years.  Three years ago, a pair of E.F. Hutton salesmen went to the Housing Authority of Fulton County, Ga., and urged it to sell $125 million in tax-exempt bonds for low-income housing.  The tax-overhaul bill in Congress was about to clamp down on such bonds, the salesmen said, and this was the last chance to cash in under the old rules.  The transaction was sealed with an all-expenses-paid trip to New York and a plush dinner at Windows on the World.  Last month, the program collapsed.  The bonds were redeemed without a single low-income housing unit ever being built.  But E.F. Hutton, now part of Shearson Lehman Hutton, collected $1.4 million in fees, and Sumitomo Bank, which provided credit for the program, raked in more than $1 million.  "Hutton sold us a can of worms," says Sherman Golden, a former member of the housing authority.  Fulton County isn't the only place stuck with worms.  In recent months, dozens of similar projects financed by bond issues floated in the rush before the 1986 Tax Reform Act have collapsed, with the money unspent.  A government official says such "build-nothing" bonds could total $50 billion or more.  Moreover, the taxpayer has had to pick up a multibillion-dollar tab for the bonds.  As tax-exempts, intended to finance public projects, the bonds paid relatively low rates, but the proceeds from selling them could be reinvested at higher rates and earn huge arbitrage profits.  The result: investment bankers, banks, bond lawyers and local governments made billions from taxpayer-subsidized projects that were never built.  Whether it was legal to tap the taxpayer this way is murky.  Pre-1986 tax law required bond issuers to have "reasonable expectations" that the money would actually be used as intended.  That's a difficult point to prove.  In Fulton County, Mr. Golden argues that E.F. Hutton designed its program not to build housing but to earn arbitrage profits.  For instance, there was little incentive for developers to participate in the program, he says, because they wouldn't own the projects themselves.  Attorney Raymond Sales of Chapman & Cutler in Atlanta, who reviewed the program in 1986, says he "didn't see why any developer would take so much risk for so little reward."  Mr. Golden raised such concerns when the bond issue was being considered in 1986 but ultimately signed off on the sale.  Steven McCoy, the Hutton vice president who sold the housing authority on the program, insists there was nothing wrong with its design.  He blames a weak real-estate market for the program's failure.  "The real estate market deteriorated throughout the three-year period," Mr. McCoy says.  "Existing projects suffered, and it was not prudent to finance new projects."  Whether or not the expectations were "reasonable," only about $1.6 million has been used from $1 billion of similar housing bonds Hutton underwrote for other agencies in Atlanta and elsewhere.  To date, the Internal Revenue Service has done little to deal with the epidemic of build-nothing bonds.  That's partly because of a practical problem: If the IRS declares that the bonds aren't tax-exempt, then it must collect money from the thousands of investors who unwittingly bought them.  "The sanction is out of proportion to the crime," says an IRS official.  "You hammer the wrong people."  Instead, the IRS has in a few cases attempted to recover some of the arbitrage profits by negotiating settlements with the bond issuers.  Such accords have recovered some $80 million since 1982, much of it coming from abuses that occurred before the 1986 tax law was passed.  Current efforts focus on the most egregious violations, such as bonds underwritten by the Wall Street firm of Matthews & Wright Group Inc., which was charged with fraud by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Matthews & Wright settled with the SEC, turning in its broker-dealer license while neither admitting nor denying the charges.  IRS Commissioner Fred Goldberg says his agency is stepping up its enforcement efforts against the build-nothing bonds.  The IRS held a bond training program for tax examiners earlier this year and has targeted 50 bond issues, totaling $3.6 billion, for closer investigation.  "People are likely to go to jail, and municipalities will have to disgorge large amounts of money," Mr. Goldberg says.  But even the $3.6 billion targeted by the tax-collection agency may be only a small part of the total.  Nearly every firm on Wall Street seems to have been involved in issues of build-nothing bonds.  Democratic Rep. Brian Donnelly of Massachusetts has written Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady saying he is "appalled and outraged" by the extent of the problem.  Rep. Donnelly calls on the Treasury to "aggressively investigate the potential for fraud" in such deals.  Some people even blame IRS inaction for encouraging the epidemic of build-nothing bonds.  The more aggressive securities firms "put a foot over the chalk line and looked around, and nobody said anything," says Austin Koenen, vice chairman of the Public Securities Association, "so everyone else moved over the line."  Even Commissioner Goldberg acknowledges that the IRS needs to get tough with the bad bonds.  "We damn well better follow up, and my expectation is that we will," he says.  "If we don't deal with this, we'll lose our credibility."  Jeffrey Esser, executive director of the Government Finance Officers Association, says blame also has to be shared by congressional tax writers who wrote the laws, the local governments that issued the bonds, and especially the Wall Street "salesmen who hustled communities and scared them" into rushing bonds to market.  "There's lots of blame to be passed around," he says.  Build-nothing bonds were sold nationwide for a variety of purposes, ranging from ski slopes to solid waste disposal plants to "pool" programs, where a town or agency borrowed money to lend to other jurisdictions for capital improvements and the like.  Many of them were rushed to market before three key dates in the 1984-86 period, when tax rules were slated to change.  In many cases, the bonds were structured so that they could be redeemed in three years if the money wasn't used.  A small sampling of the failed bond issues:  -- The Texas Small Business Industrial Development Corp. issued $750 million in bonds, underwritten by Shearson Lehman, to raise a pool of money for financing development.  Only two loans totaling $25 million were ever made; most of the rest of the bonds were redeemed this summer, after earning enough arbitrage profits to pay $14.7 million in costs.  -- Woodridge, Ill., sold $585 million of "pooled loan" bonds, underwritten by First Boston Corp., to make loans to other Illinois towns for capital projects and equipment purchases.  A partial, $250 million remarketing was led by John Nuveen & Co. No loans were made, and all the bonds were redeemed this summer.  A bond lawyer who is involved said the SEC has made inquiries but insisted no investigation is in progress.  The SEC had no comment.  -- An Irwindale, Calif., authority sold $395 million in bonds in late 1984 for a solid waste recovery plant.  The project wasn't built, and the bonds, underwritten by Ehrlich Bober & Co., were redeemed -- but not before earning $18 million in arbitrage profits, according to a Los Angeles County grand jury report.  -- Industrial development authorities in three small Arizona towns sold $368.4 million of multifamily housing bonds in early 1985.  This spring, the IRS said the bonds, underwritten by Birr Wilson & Co., shouldn't be tax exempt because the projects weren't realistic in the first place.  The money raised by the bonds earned $20 million in arbitrage profits.  -- The Kings River Conservation District in California sold $450 million of bonds in late 1985 after being told that it couldn't sell the bonds on a tax-exempt basis after 1985, according to Jeff Taylor, district general manager.  The bonds were redeemed without funding the project.  First Boston was the lead underwriter.  In a few cases, such as a collapsed $88 million issue underwritten by PaineWebber for Collier County, Fla., the project underwriters had to forfeit their fees.  But in most, the fees were paid out of arbitrage profits earned from reinvesting the money.  If any of the arbitrage profits were left over, they generally went to the issuer.  Gregory Artis, who became chairman of the Housing Authority of Fulton County after the bonds were sold, says his authority's leftover arbitrage profits will come to a thin $141,000 -- a small part of the $1.4 million earned by Hutton.  Asked if Hutton misled the housing authority, Mr. Artis responds: "I don't believe so."  @ ---  @ Build-Nothing Bonds  @ Here are some of the many tax-exempt bond issues from 1984-1986 that have been redeemed, without building anything:  @ STATED AMOUNT  @ ISSUER PURPOSE (In millions) UNDERWRITER  @ Los Angeles Incinerator $235.0 Smith Barney  @ Woodridge, Ill.  Capital needs  @ (pool) 585.0 First Boston  @ Sumner County, Prudential-  @ Tenn.  Housing 155.0 Bache  @ Virgin Islands Waste treatment/  @ Public Works Desalination  @ Authority 64.9 Goldman Sachs  @ Irwindale, Calif.,  @ Resource Recovery  @ Authority Waste treatment 395.0 Erlich Bober  @ Lancaster, Calif., Donaldson,  @ Redevelopment Lufkin &  @ Authority Housing 21.0 Jenrette  @ Washington  @ County, Pa., Capital needs Russell, Rea  @ Authority (pool) 350.0 & Zapalla  @ Matthews &  @ Provo, Utah Ski Resort 150.5 Wright  @ Kings River,  @ Calif.,  @ Conservation  @ District Hydroelectric 450.0 First Boston  @ Dauphin County,  @ Pa., Capital needs  @ General Authority (pool) 335.0 Paine Webber  @ Source: Data provided by underwriters, issuers or trustees  We see that the "scientific" definition of doomsday now includes not only nuclear war but environmental threats and poverty and maybe some other things.  In case you're not into survivalism or ark-building, since 1947 the "doomsday clock" has been the particular conceit of The Bulletin of Atomic Scientists.  Based on the reading of international political humors by an international board trained in physics and metallurgy, the clock affected to tell us how many minutes we have until the midnight of nuclear destruction.  The clock read 11:57 in 1951 and again in 1983 and 11:54 currently, for example.  The scientists, we take it, can recognize that some adjustment is needed after 42 years of failed predictions.  So they did the scientific thing, wrapping in some subjects that, unlike nuclear war, are not subject to stark empirical verification.  Noel Group Inc., a New York investment firm, and Noel's chairman, Louis Marx Jr., said they hold a combined 22.7% stake in Garnet Resources Corp.'s common shares outstanding and may increase their holdings further.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Noel and Mr. Marx together hold 1,340,000 Garnet common shares, including 200,000 shares Noel bought Sept. 1 in a private transaction for $1 million.  Noel acquired the shares to increase its investment position in the company, the filing said.  Noel added that it may in the future seek to increase its stake in Garnet "to in excess of 25%" of the stock outstanding through private transactions.  Questar Development Corp. is considering acquiring a "significant minority ownership interest" in Larson-Davis Inc., or as much as 11.7% of Larson-Davis's common shares outstanding.  According to a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Larson-Davis has offered to Questar the option of forgoing its ownership interest in the technology and product improvements in exchange for restricted shares of common stock.  In addition, if Questar exercises its contractual right to purchase the shares, they will acquire and own such shares for investment and will in no way affect the contract.  Larson-Davis is based in Provo, Utah, and Questar is based in Salt Lake City.  In the wonderland of Wall Street, "highly confident" isn't always what it seems.  Take the battle going on between Morgan Stanley & Co. and a one-time client, hotel investor John B. Coleman & Co.  After the big investment bank withdrew a "highly confident" letter pledging to raise $95 million for Coleman, which has stakes in Ritz-Carlton hotels in New York and Washington, D.C., as well as in Chicago's Tremont and Whitehall hotels, the two sides have filed lawsuits in federal bankruptcy court over $3.5 million in fees Morgan says it's still owed.  And Morgan isn't getting much sympathy from a judge who says Morgan seems to have taken actions that appear "without precedent" on Wall Street.  Burton J. Lifland, the chief U.S. bankruptcy judge in Manhattan, told Morgan's lawyers in court they were pursuing "a very interesting course where the entire investment banking community and {its} involvement in bankruptcy proceedings are going to be brought into question."  Judge Lifland presided over the Coleman company's emergence from proceedings under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code in August and is scheduled to hear the Morgan suit later this month.  The legal tiff marks one of the rare occasions when a major investment bank has withdrawn a "highly confident" letter, which in financial circles has become accepted as a virtual guarantee of a financing.  These letters, pioneered by Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., state that an investment bank is "highly confident" it can raise funds for a client, although the pledge isn't legally binding.  "In principle, the receipt of a highly-confident letter gives the person who gets it a great deal of confidence; it's highly unusual when one is withdrawn," said Roderick Hills, former chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, a board member at Drexel and a partner at the Washington-based law firm of Donovan Leisure Newton & Irving.  Mr. Hills stressed that he isn't familiar with the facts of the Coleman case.  Both Morgan Stanley and the Coleman company declined to comment publicly on the suit.  But a person familiar with Morgan Stanley's position said its battle with Coleman "is nothing more than a routine legal dispute that isn't going to reveal a lot about Morgan Stanley."  Friends of John B. Coleman, head of the firm bearing his name, say he is so incensed by what he considers shabby treatment that he's determined to get even.  The 54-year-old Mr. Coleman's closely held company has been sued on numerous occasions by construction concerns alleging unpaid debts.  At the time of the company's bankruptcy-law filing in 1986, the Coleman company owed back taxes on its hotels in Chicago, the District of Columbia and New York.  Most of the suits have been settled out of court, and Coleman says it is now current on its tax bills.  Mr. Coleman also has admirers.  "I've known John Coleman for more than 20 years as a friend and businessman and he's a fine gentleman," said Alfred Taubman, a Detroit-based industrialist.  Mr. Coleman "doesn't have many friends and sometimes he's wrong," said Joseph Grosz, chief executive officer of Property Investors Corp., a mortgage banker and developer who worked with the Coleman company.  "But John is right this time.  I don't know what Morgan's game was.  It came very close to jeopardizing his empire.  I've never heard of a firm withdrawing a highly confident letter."  Mr. Coleman's problems started in mid-1986 when his company was hit with a potentially devastating lawsuit by Integrated Resources Inc. Federal tax-law changes had wiped out many of the benefits of limited partnerships, adversely affecting partnerships tied to Coleman's hotels in Chicago.  Integrated and PaineWebber Inc. had sold interests in the partnerships to their customers.  Integrated sued the Coleman company in state court in Cook County, Ill., claiming it actually owned Coleman's properties instead of a portion of their revenues.  The Coleman company filed for protection under Chapter 11, saying this was the only way to get the dispute into federal court, where Coleman wanted it decided.  The Coleman company hired Morgan Stanley to help settle the Integrated suit and to prepare a plan to take the Coleman company out of Chapter 11 through financings and restructurings.  Morgan's retainer fee for being Coleman's investment banker from June 1987 through December 1988 was $500,000, not including fees for any resulting financings or sales.  Within a year, the Coleman company worked out a settlement with Integrated that preserved Coleman's control over its properties.  None of Morgan's proposed financings panned out, however.  Last November, a month before its contract with Coleman expired, Morgan said in a letter to Coleman that it was "confident" it could arrange a first-mortgage note financing totaling between $90 million and $95 million.  A similar letter was sent in January, in which Morgan altered some of the terms and said that it was now "highly confident" it could place the first-mortgage notes, which are debt securities secured by the property of the issuer.  Coleman had received financing offers from other concerns, including Southmark and a unit of Salomon Inc., but it accepted the Morgan proposal because it was the most attractive financially, according to court testimony and investment bankers familiar with the financing proposals.  A committee of creditors formed by the bankruptcy court also approved the Morgan Stanley financing, as did Judge Lifland.  Then the bottom fell out.  In a meeting with Mr. Coleman in late February -- a month after it sent its highly confident letter -- Morgan Stanley said it couldn't arrange the financing, according to people who attended the meeting.  In a March 2 letter, Morgan then formally withdrew its offer and instead proposed a financing totaling between $60 million to $70 million "subject to further review and analysis."  The letters are among documents submitted to the court.  By suddenly backing out of the financing, Morgan threw the Coleman company's reorganization plan into confusion and prompted the court to consider appointing a replacement for Mr. Coleman as the custodian for the company.  Mr. Coleman scrambled.  "When the Morgan Stanley highly confident letter was withdrawn, {Mr.} Coleman felt he had lost it all," said Mr. Grosz of Property Investors.  "He had dropped other financing offers.  So at that point, he was faced with real problems."  Mr. Coleman persuaded Mohammed Hadid, a Washington, D.C., real estate developer who says he had been introduced by Mr. Grosz last November, to assume a much larger role in financing the Coleman company's reorganization.  But Morgan Stanley thought it was entitled to a fee for the financing agreement between Hadid Corp. and the Coleman company.  In a March 27 letter to Mr. Coleman, Morgan said it expected to be paid, "since it was through our sole efforts that you were introduced to Hadid."  The next day, Morgan sent Mr. Coleman a bill for $3,166,825 -- $3 million of which was a 2% commission for a $150 million proposed financing arranged by Hadid and the Coleman company.  Mr. Coleman dismissed the bill.  Morgan sued and Coleman countersued.  Mr. Hadid said "Morgan Stanley played no role" in his introduction to Mr. Coleman last fall or in any subsequent meetings.  Morgan "did not introduce the {financing} plan to John Coleman or me, and I and my representatives had no dealings with Morgan Stanley regarding this proposed transaction."  Mr. Grosz agrees.  "Morgan Stanley never picked up the phone to introduce Coleman to Hadid by phone or in person," he says.  "I'm the one who introduced them.  In fact, Mohammed Hadid didn't have any interest in Coleman" while the Coleman company employed Morgan Stanley.  "But it took me a quite a while to convince him to have lunch {with Mr. Coleman}, and it went from there," Mr. Grosz added.  In court, Morgan's claim also surprised Judge Lifland.  "You are asking for commissions on a deal that is not a done deal," he told Morgan's lawyers.  "I suggest that you are marching down the wrong avenue here."  Among other things, the judge said, "the confidence of all parties with respect to Morgan Stanley has been somewhat eroded with respect to Morgan's withdrawal of its 'highly confident letter' which has thrown this estate into somewhat of a tailspin and tizzy."  The Coleman company's emergence from Chapter 11, made possible by financing from the Hadid concern, was approved by the court last month.  What particularly upset Judge Lifland was Morgan's insistence in court that its highly confident letter was created by the Coleman company.  In an apparently sarcastic question, Judge Lifland asked one of Morgan's attorneys if the letter is "an invention of the investment banking community?"  Morgan Stanley attorney: "No, this is an investment, frankly, in this context this --"  Judge Lifland: "Not investment.  Invention."  Morgan Stanley: "This was an invention, I believe you will find, of Mr. Coleman and his drafters and not of Morgan Stanley."  Judge Lifland: "You mean Coleman writes 'highly confident' in the draft and Morgan adopts it?"  Morgan Stanley: "In this context --"  Judge Lifland: "So that this is Coleman's highly confident letter and not Morgan Stanley's?"  Morgan Stanley: "The language, in fact, came from {Coleman} based upon the information then available to Morgan Stanley --"  Judge Lifland: "I feel like Alice in Wonderland.  I have never been to the tea party before.  This is a walk through the mirror.  I am learning.  I thank you for it, counselor."  In 1987, the U.S. and Massachusetts sued RTE Corp. to recover some of the costs of cleaning up a river and harbor contaminated with PCBs allegedly linked in part to the company's Aerovox Inc. subsidiary.  But the federal district court in Massachusetts ruled that RTE, like many other corporate parents before and after, didn't have to pay a dime.  The court declined to pierce the "corporate veil" that long has shielded parent corporations from the liabilities of their subsidiaries.  That protection, however, may be starting to unravel.  Three federal courts in the past five months have declined to dismiss out of hand arguments by the government that the parents should be held responsible in certain environmental cases.  The courts ignored entreaties by the corporations that decades of state law and court precedents were being undermined in the process.  Such cases are pending against Kayser Roth Corp., an apparel maker in Providence, R.I., and W.R. Case & Sons Cutlery Co., a cutlery maker in New York.  An agreement in principle to settle has been reached in the third case, against T&N PLC, a holding company based in Manchester, England.  The catalyst for the challenge is the staggering cost of toxic-waste cleanups under the Superfund law, which the Environmental Protection Agency has estimated will approach $100 billion.  The EPA and the Justice Department have proposed a legal test that would allow courts to routinely pierce the "corporate veil" for Superfund cleanups when a subsidiary can't pay.  And some legal specialists say the ramifications could extend beyond Superfund.  Congress didn't specifically address the liability of parent corporations when it passed the Superfund law, which holds those who generated, transported or stored hazardous waste responsible for its cleanup, regardless of whether their actions were legal when they took place.  But the Justice Department and the EPA maintain Congress intended that liability for Superfund cleanups be extended broadly and that the courts must determine the boundaries.  If courts apply a traditional legal test for piercing the corporate veil, efforts to clean up the environment will be frustrated, the government has argued.  Under that traditional test, the government would have to show the subsidiary didn't maintain an independent identity or was so thinly capitalized that it couldn't pay for continuing costs of the enterprise, according to Harvey J. Goldschmid, a corporate law professor at Columbia's law school.  Many states add a further requirement before the principle of corporate separateness can be violated: that some fraud or improper purpose must have been the basis for the subsidiary's incorporation.  The idea of maintaining a "veil" between the companies was designed precisely to limit corporate liability.  Corporate lawyers argue that such protection is crucial for promoting investment because it allows parent companies, and their shareholders, to participate in new ventures without fear of losing all their assets.  Now that doctrine has run up against government efforts to finance a massive cleanup of the nation's hazardous waste sites.  The separateness of corporate identities is considered sacrosanct by many corporate lawyers, who have greeted the government's theory with alarm.  This "new standard will potentially expose every parent corporation to liability for the acts of its subsidiaries in Superfund cases," says Jon Schuyler Brooks of the New York law firm Richards & O'Neil, who defended T&N in one such case.  T&N had been the sole stockholder in the one-time owner of a waste site in Ambler, Pa.  Legal precedents in Pennsylvania wouldn't allow the parent to be held responsible unless it was shown that T&N set up the subsidiary to avoid environmental liability.  So the government urged the court to adopt a new standard based on federal case law that wouldn't include this requirement.  T&N's familiarity with the subsidiary's disposal practices and the economic benefits the company derived from the subsidiary justified extending liability to the parent, the government contended.  The court ruled in May to allow the government to proceed with its case.  In July, T&N and the government agreed in principle to settle the case; they haven't reached a final agreement.  David Buente, chief of the environmental enforcement section in the Land and Natural Resources division of the Justice Department, says federal law -- not state law precedents -- should govern the issue to ensure uniformity in environmental cases.  Robert E. Holden of Liskow & Lewis, who represents Joslyn Manufacturing Co., Chicago, an electrical manufacturer, in its efforts to hold its parent company, the construction concern T.L. James & Co., liable for a share of the subsidiary's Superfund bill, says: "Does the public policy of remediating the environment counterbalance the need for maintaining a rigid corporate veil?  The answer is yes."  The Joslyn case, in federal court in Louisiana, is being closely watched because it is the first "corporate veil" case under the Superfund law to reach a federal appeals court.  The district court refused to hold Ruston, La.-based James liable, stating that even evidence of 100% ownership by the parent, common directors and officers, and loans between the entities was insufficient to justify disregarding their corporate separateness.  In a friend-of-the-court brief to the federal appeals court in New Orleans, which hasn't yet ruled, the Justice Department argued that the corporate veil may be pierced if two conditions are met: if the subsidiary lacks sufficient funds to pay for a Superfund cleanup, and if the subsidiary performed a function of economic importance to the parent or if the parent participated directly in the unit's management.  Earlier this year, Budget Director Richard Darman made a speech in which he chided many Americans for engaging in "now-nowism," a fixation with short-term outcomes at the expense of future generations.  Maybe Mr. Darman should heed his own advice and join the taxpayer revolt that wants to kill the catastrophic-health surtax.  Instead, to avoid a short-term $5 billion revenue loss, Mr. Darman and the Bush administration want to keep alive a federal program that threatens to consume an ever-larger portion of the income of future generations while it simultaneously restricts the health-care choices they enjoy.  Sure sounds like shortsighted "now-nowism" to us.  Zeroing out the extremely unpopular catastrophic program would indeed temporarily increase the budget deficit because Congress "frontloaded" the program: It collects revenues first to pay for benefits later.  Needless to say, official Washington quickly agreed at the time to fold this revenue surge into the budget numbers to get itself off the deficit hook.  Mr. Darman now says the revenue loss would push the budget over the Gramm-Rudman deficit targets and trigger automatic, across-the-board budget cuts.  In the long run, however, killing the catastrophic program actually would reduce the deficit, because it is clear the program is dangerously underfunded.  The Congressional Budget Office estimates the prescription drug benefit alone will cost $5.1 billion more in the first four years than originally thought.  By 1993, the entire program easily could be $20 billion in the red.  None of this will surprise anyone outside of the Beltway.  Any entitlement program carries with it incentives to grow out of control.  Take Medicare.  It took up only 2.6% of the federal budget in 1968.  By 1993, CBO estimates it will consume 10.6% of the budget and cost more than the entire projected 1990 budget deficit.  Medicare now is expected to go bankrupt by the year 2000.  Advocates of the catastrophic program, such as the American Association of Retired Persons, claimed it would avoid such problems because it was "self-financing"; the benefits would be paid for by higher premiums levied on all old people and by a special surtax on upper-income groups.  The elderly quickly saw the surtax applies to anyone over 65 with more than $1,000 a year in taxable income, and socks many of them with the nation's highest tax rates.  Even with that, the program's costs are expected to outstrip revenues.  What also galls many of the elderly is that the program requires almost all of them to pay for benefits they already had.  Some 75% of seniors have private coverage that pays for catastrophic illness, and an additional 10% are covered by Medicaid for the poor.  But all of the elderly will have to pay the full cost of Congress's catastrophe, though fewer than a third of them will receive any benefits in any given year.  All this has led to a full-scale taxpayers' revolt.  A Richard Wirthlin poll found only 19% of the elderly were happy with Congress's handiwork.  Members returned from the August recess after being badgered and bruised by angry seniors.  House Ways and Means Chairman Dan Rostenkowski was booed and had his car blocked by a pack of screaming senior citizens in his Chicago district.  They were upset at his committee's attempt to pacify the program critics by cutting the surtax paid by the more affluent elderly and making up the loss by shifting more of the burden to the elderly poor and by delaying some benefits by a year.  The elderly suspect that such familiar shell games only make matters worse.  The Ways and Means plan also supposedly allows people to opt out of the catastrophic program -- but only until Dec. 31 and only if they also agree to drop Medicare's Part B coverage that they've already been paying for.  If they want to rejoin later they'd pay a stiff penalty.  "It's no more voluntary than a prison sentence," says Rep. Brian Donnelly, a Massachusetts Democrat, who notes that only 300,000 of 33 million seniors probably will leave the program.  He and several elderly lobbies want to kill it outright.  Catastrophic health is the classic example of Washington's politicians losing touch with the real needs of their constituents and allowing their staffs and lobbies such as AARP run the legislative agenda.  Now President Bush and Mr. Darman, their eyes on the arcana of Washington's budget politics, are holding their fingers in the dike, trying to stave off this floodtide of taxpayer protest.  We can't imagine why these two sensible men would want to be standing there when the catastrophic dike breaks and washes untold numbers of Congressmen out to sea.  Coast Savings Financial Inc. announced a major restructuring that would include removing $242 million in good will from its books, issuing $150 million in preferred stock and commencing an exchange offer for $52 million in convertible bonds.  The holding company said the moves primarily were in response to new regulatory developments, including the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, enacted last month.  The new law mandates higher capital requirements for thrifts.  The restructuring helps prepare the company to be in compliance with the new law when it takes effect at the beginning of 1991.  Coast Savings has eliminated $196 million in goodwill by means of an accounting change, the company said.  The company is writing off an additional $46 million in goodwill which had been carried as part of its investment in real estate properties and previous acquisitions.  The company will add $20 million to its general loan loss reserve for the fourth quarter ending Dec. 31.  The company also will offer to exchange common stock for $52 million in 7% convertible subordinated debentures due 2011, beginning yesterday.  Each $1,000 will convert to 45.98 shares of common.  Coast Savings also plans to issue $150 million of non-cumulative convertible preferred stock with an anticipated offering price of $50 a share.  The offering is pending with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The restructuring is intended to increase the company's tangible capital ratio and fully diluted tangible book value, the thrift said.  News travels slowly around the halls of the National Labor Relations Board.  Many of its staffers apparently hadn't heard that the landmark case of Beck v.  Communications Workers of America had been decided.  The Supreme Court last year used this case to announce that workers don't have to pay the share of dues that go for political activities or any other nonbargaining purpose.  Despite this clear ruling, most NLRB officials have been telling workers they must pay full dues.  This surprising disinformation by a federal agency was uncovered by the National Right to Work Committee, which suspected that news of the unions' loss in the courts hadn't reached the supposedly neutral NLRB. Three-quarters of the NLRB offices queried by an investigator for the committee incorrectly said he'd have to pay full dues, not just those that go for bargaining.  The bargaining share can be as low as 20% of the total for politically active unions such as the teachers' unions.  Also, more than half incorrectly told him he could be forced to join a union, contrary to Supreme Court cases, which say that so long as bargaining-related dues are paid, no worker must belong.  The correct answer is that in states without right-to-work laws, unions can negotiate "security clauses" with employers: While workers needn't join the union, after 30 days they must become "financial core members," paying dues covering only bargaining costs.  An NLRB spokesman commented that it was "improbable that our field offices would not provide accurate information to an employee about what rights he has."  But the day after the workers' rights group report came out, William G. Stack, NLRB's acting associate general counsel, sent a memo to all of NLRB's regional offices, suggesting there was indeed some cause for concern.  The memo ordered all NLRB offices to "schedule additional training for all staff professionals who serve as information officers, and ensure that only those professionals who possess a sufficient level of experience are assigned to serve as information officers."  The memo also exhorted NLRB officials to "thoroughly familiarize" themselves with a previous memo that outlined the impact of Beck v.  CWA.  There's more to be said about Mr. Stack's memo, however, than that it headed off public embarrassment for the agency.  As with several other "independent" agencies, we detect separation-of-powers problems with the NLRB. Though the President appoints the general counsel and the board of the NLRB, the agency's bureaucrats essentially are untouchable.  They are largely unresponsive to any political accountability except to their paymasters in Congress.  It's no surprise that these anonymous agencies should drift so far from view as to become oblivious or impervious to Supreme Court decisions.  We have long believed that unions serve a useful function for both workers and for management seeking to speak to one representative voice.  But in the long run, NLRB staffers do unions no favors when they forget that their job is to protect the rights of individual workers.  The NLRB needs to understand that its job includes protecting workers not just against management, but also against the excessive politicization of their work.  Stock prices drifted lower in the lightest trading since the Independence Day holiday as investors began setting their sights on a barrage of economic reports due at the end of the week.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average dropped 5.13 to 2704.41, and its loss would have been even greater if not for a rally in Du Pont and solid gains in American Telephone & Telegraph, Merck and International Paper.  New York Stock Exchange volume amounted to just 126,020,000 shares, well below the 154,090,000 traded Friday and the lowest total since July 3, a pre-holiday session, when 68,870,000 changed hands.  "It doesn't seem to me like there's a great urge to sell this market," said John D. Connolly, chairman of the investment committee at Dean Witter Reynolds.  "Everything seems to be Friday-oriented."  Five economic reports, including the August producer price index and the July trade deficit, are scheduled for release Friday.  The quarterly expiration of stock-index futures and options -- the so-called triple witching hour -- takes place on that day as well.  With all that on the horizon, traders said, investors were generally reluctant to step off the sidelines.  "Everybody really is on hold," said Ron Doran, head of institutional trading at First Albany Corp., Albany, N.Y.  Amid the sluggish activity, futures-related program trading sent the market moving in both directions.  Flurries of sell programs resulting from stock-index arbitrage helped depress prices through midsession, then arbitrage-related buy programs fueled a late comeback.  The rebound was largely confined to blue-chip stocks, however, as 936 Big Board issues declined in price while only about 530 advanced.  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index fell 1.10 to 347.66, the Dow Jones Equity Market Index lost 0.92 to 326.48, and the Big Board's Composite Index dropped 0.65 to 193.30.  Prices could prove to be volatile as the week progresses and the triple witching hour leads to more futures-related activity, Mr. Connolly said, "particularly in the absence of a good, fundamental flow of buying and selling."  But despite the market's fall from its recent record highs, he said, such fundamental factors as continued moderate growth in the economy, low inflation and a strong dollar are working in its favor.  "The issue is the market itself.  We had a great run during the summertime, and it's hard to say any fundamental concerns have surfaced recently," Mr. Connolly said.  "There's plenty left in this market."  Du Pont climbed 2 to 118 1/4, Merck advanced 1 to 71 7/8, and International Paper rose 3/8 to 55 3/8.  AT&T, the most active Big Board issue, gained 7/8 to 40 on 1.9 million shares; Marriott awarded a multi-year contract to the company to provide long-distance service at all its hotel and restaurant operations.  On the other hand, Woolworth fell 3/4 to 71 after rising 3 Friday on takeover speculation.  Other blue-chip stocks weighing down the industrial average included Boeing, which went down 1 1/2 to 54 1/8, General Motors, down 5/8 to 49 1/4, United Technologies, down 5/8 to 55 1/2, and Allied-Signal, down 5/8 to 37 7/8.  Manufacturers Hanover jumped 2 7/8 to 42 1/2 on news of discussions of the possible sale of a stake in its CIT Group unit to Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank of Japan.  The company didn't give details about the size of the stake or the proposed price.  BellSouth rose 3/4 to 51 1/4 after agreeing to merge its cellular telephone operations with those of LIN Broadcasting.  LIN, which will spin off its television stations to shareholders and pay a special dividend of $20 a share under the agreement, advanced 1 1/4 to 106 3/4 on the over-the-counter market.  AMR, which owns American Airlines, climbed 2 3/4 to 83 3/4 after a report that New York developer Donald Trump, owner of the Trump Shuttle, owns a stake in the company and might seek federal clearance to buy more than $15 million of its stock.  Depending on when he bought his stake, Mr. Trump could be showing a loss on the investment at present, as AMR traded as high as 96 on Aug. 30 amid speculation it might become a takeover target.  Mr. Trump wouldn't comment, but traders said they believed the report to be accurate.  UAL dropped 3 7/8 to 276 3/8.  Investor Marvin Davis, who has bid $275 a share for the parent of United Airlines, agreed conditionally not to make any hostile moves for one year in exchange for access to confidential UAL data.  Digital Equipment lost 7/8 to 97 1/4.  Kidder Peabody lowered its earnings estimates on the company for fiscal 1990, ending next June, and for the following fiscal year, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Analyst William D. Easterbrook said he believes the company's U.S. business will remain flat and that its foreign business could be hurt by a weakening European economy and the recent strength of the dollar.  Paramount Communications dropped 1 1/8 to 55 3/8 in advance of its fiscal thirdquarter earnings, due today.  The company declined to comment on the expected results.  Among other media and entertainment issues, Time Warner fell 2 1/4 to 133 3/4, MCA lost 3/4 to 61 1/4, and Walt Disney dropped 3/4 to 118.  Par Pharmaceutical skidded 1 1/8 to 5 7/8.  In congressional testimony, an official of the Food and Drug Administration named Par and its Quad Pharmaceuticals unit as one of 10 generic-drug companies at which inspectors found manufacturing and record-keeping irregularities.  Another of those, Bolar Pharmaceutical, fell 7/8 to 18 7/8 on the American Stock Exchange.  Universal Foods fell 5/8 to 34 1/8 after High Voltage Engineering ended its battle to take over the company.  High Voltage, which had offered as much as $42 a share, attributed the withdrawal to regulatory barriers.  Armstrong World Industries lost 7/8 to 45 3/4.  USA Today reported that the Belzberg family of Canada is having trouble arranging financing for a takeover bid.  Coast Savings Financial dropped 1 1/4 to 18 3/8.  The thrift holding company unveiled plans for a debt-for-stock swap and an issue of convertible preferred as part of a plan to bring its capital into compliance with federal regulatory requirements.  The American Stock Exchange index fell 1.67 to 382.43.  Volume totaled 11,080,000 shares, compared with 12,710,000 Friday.  There were 204 issues advancing, 354 declining and 286 unchanged.  B.A.T Industries eased 1/4 to 12 1/2.  A U.S. federal judge rejected investor Sir James Goldsmith's attempt to bar Washington state insurance regulators from reviewing his group's $21 billion offer for the company.  Washington is one of nine states in which B.A.T's Farmers Group insurance unit operates.  Lionel fell 1/8 to 7 1/4 despite receiving a cash-and-stock takeover offer valued at $8.25 a share from Robert I. Toussie L.P., which owns a 9.9% stake.  The London International Financial Futures Exchange will launch the world's first interest-rate-futures contract for the European currency unit on Oct. 26.  Three European banks agreed to act as market makers.  They are Generale de Banque and Kredietbank, both of Belgium, and Istituto Bancario San Paolo di Torino, of Italy.  Liffe said the involvement of the three banks will ensure that the market for the contract is liquid.  The banks will make a market in the contracts for a six-month trial period, "after which we hope that the market will be buoyant enough to survive without such support," said Anne Vleminckx of Generale de Banque's strategic department.  She said that because of the contract's uniqueness there is "some concern about liquidity."  The contract's main aim is to provide a hedging instrument for participants in the growing ECU money market.  The British and Italian governments are active issuers of ECU-denominated paper.  ECU paper accounted for about $12 billion of the more than $200 billion in international bonds issued last year.  Ms. Vleminckx also pointed to arbitrage possibilities with interest-rate-futures contracts in ECU currencies.  There is a pound and a mark contract on the Liffe and a French-franc contract trades on the Matif -- or Marche a Terme des Instruments Financiers -- in Paris.  These three currencies carry the most weight in the ECU, which is a basket of the European Community's 11 currencies.  The ECU's interest risk isn't negligible, Generale de Banque said, and a hedging instrument should help make ECU-denominated securities more attractive as an investment.  For the year ended in April, the daily interest-rate fluctuation for the ECU was 22%, compared with 13% for the dollar, 25% for the mark and 21% for the pound, the Belgian bank said.  Liffe's ECU contract will be a three-month deposit of one million ECUs.  The delivery dates will be March, June, September and December.  The three market makers will offer narrow bid/offer spreads on the contract.  WHO'S NEWS: New Republic named Hendrick Hertzberg editor of the monthly magazine owned by its publisher, Martin Peretz.  He was a contributing editor.  He succeeds Michael Kinsley, who is becoming a co-anchor of the "Crossfire" program on Turner Broadcasting System Inc.'s Cable News Network. . . .  Walt Disney Co. named Linda Warren director of corporate special projects and executive assistant to the chairman and president, succeeding Art Levitt who was named vice president, resorts and special projects at Walt Disney World.  Ms. Warren had been director of marketing for Walt Disney World.  Chairman Dan Rostenkowski of the House Ways and Means Committee is expected to offer a new proposal on cutting the capital-gains tax that he hopes will draw votes away from a measure that has a majority on his committee.  The counterproposal would extend the benefit to currently held assets, including real estate and timber.  Rep. Edgar Jenkins (D., Ga.) is the author of the plan that has majority support on the Ways and Means Committee.  His plan would reduce the capital-gains rate for 2 1/2 years to 19.6% and then raise it to 28%, indexed for inflation.  The Illinois Democrat already has proposed an alternative to the Jenkins plan, the heart of which is to exempt from taxation the gains attributable to inflation on newly acquired assets.  A major flaw of the Rostenkowski plan, according to the Jenkins forces, is that most currently held assets wouldn't qualify.  Bush administration officials, at least so far, insist that they won't endorse any new Rostenkowski plan unless Rep. Jenkins and Rep. Bill Archer (R., Texas), senior Republican on the committee, go along.  One official suggested that a compromise could emerge as early as today or tomorrow.  Before he begins talks with Rep. Jenkins and the Republican members of his committee, Rep. Rostenkowski is expected to review options for including currently held assets in the plan.  Rep. Jenkins and the five other Democrats who support the Jenkins proposal have said they are open to compromise.  The 13 Republicans, however, haven't been as flexible.  Mr. Rostenkowski's plan would remove from taxation that part of a gain that is attributable to inflation.  As an alternative, it offers a special tax break on assets held for five years, and a more generous break on assets held for 10 years.  It would allow investors who have held an asset for five years to choose -- instead of inflation indexing -- to pay tax on 75% of the sales price of the investment.  For assets held 10 years or longer, the investor could choose to pay tax on 50% of the sales price.  The chairman isn't yet considering shortening the lengthy holding periods in his proposal -- a change sought privately by the Bush administration.  Instead, he is likely to focus on altering the plan to include the assets currently held by two politically popular interest groups: timber and real estate.  The chairman is expected to maintain his position of allowing stockholders to elect to pay for any paper appreciation at current capital-gains rates in order to qualify for the new preferential treatment on future appreciation, a provision called mark-to-market.  It remains unclear how well a revised Rostenkowski plan will fare.  But if it fails to win enough support, committee drafting sessions this week might be thrown into confusion.  One tax option that is sure to arise is the imposition of a new nominal top tax rate of 33% for individuals -- a plan that is palatable to many Democrats, particularly as a counterpoint to a capital-gains tax cut.  That provision, however, is anathema to President Bush and congressional Republicans.  Meanwhile, opponents of a capital-gains rate cut staged two events to battle the burgeoning effort to reduce the tax.  Rep. Byron Dorgan (D., N.D.) said he intended to offer an amendment that would target the tax benefit to the middle class, rather than to upper-income Americans.  And Democratic Reps.  Don Pease of Ohio and Sander Levin of Michigan hosted a panel of economists who cast doubt on the benefits of a cut in the capital-gains tax.  A Georgia Superior Court ordered National Heritage Inc. to reconvene its annual meeting in early October and ordered both National Heritage and Southmark Corp. to postpone other actions until the meeting.  Southmark, a troubled Dallas-based real estate and thrift concern, and National Heritage, a 62.2%-owned unit, have been locked in a months-long battle over control of the manager of nursing homes and retirement centers.  Southmark, which voted to adjourn National Heritage's annual meeting last week, has been soliciting proxies and consents to change National Heritage's bylaws and replace its board.  National Heritage, meanwhile, has been trying to retructure by spinning off its two main business units into separate companies, in an effort to lessen Southmark's control.  Separately, two Pratt Hotel Corp. officers said in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing that their option to acquire Southmark's 36.7% stake in Pratt for $13.9 million had expired.  Southmark has been trying to sell assets to reduce its $1.2 billion in debt.  Pratt is a Dallas-based hotel concern.  LIN BROADCASTING and BellSouth agreed to merge their cellular phone operations, creating the second-biggest firm in the industry.  The accord, which includes the spinoff of LIN's TV broadcast units and a special $20-a-share dividend for LIN holders, may force McCaw Cellular to raise its $110-a-share offer for LIN.  The pact also shows the Baby Bells will aggressively participate in the cellular industry's consolidation.  ---  Manufacturers Hanover is near an accord to sell a majority stake in its asset-based lending unit, CIT Group, to Japan's largest bank, Dai-Ichi Kangyo, for an estimated $1.2 billion.  Manufacturers badly needs capital to shore itself up against a heavy load of troubled Third World loans.  ---  Two options-brokerage firms were accused by the CFTC of using fraudulent, high-pressure sales tactics to bilk customers out of hundreds of millions of dollars.  It is the biggest such case in the CFTC's history.  ---  The generic-drug scandal continued to widen.  FDA officials reported finding manufacturing and record-keeping problems at all but two of the first 12 firms to be investigated.  ---  MiniScribe said an internal investigation shows senior management apparently "perpetrated a massive fraud" that resulted in inflated financial results as far back as 1985.  ---  Thrift deposit outflows narrowed to $183 million in July, a nine-month low.  Meanwhile, S&Ls continued selling off assets at a rapid pace in order to meet new capital standards.  ---  Drexel formally pleaded guilty to six felony counts and paid the government over $500 million, capping a three-year federal investigation stemming from the Ivan Boesky scandal.  ---  The Princeton/Newport defendants moved to have last month's racketeering convictions overturned.  Prosecutors sought to force them to forfeit $19.2 million in assets.  ---  OPEC appears less likely to boost its oil-production ceiling soon.  Indonesia's oil minister opposed changes in fourth-quarter output unless members stopped cheating on their quotas.  ---  Ciba-Geigy and Chiron launched a joint $591 million offer for Connaught BioSciences of Toronto, continuing a consolidation of the drug industry.  ---  Burt Sugarman's Giant Group has agreed to acquire the Denver-based regional airline that operates United Express.  Terms weren't disclosed.  ---  Nissan Motor is cutting prices on a key compact car line in a bid to boost its U.S. market share at the expense of the Big Three and other rivals.  ---  Domino's Pizza owner Thomas Monaghan may sell his 97% stake in the chain, which is the nation's largest pizza delivery company.  ---  Iraq said it signed financing agreements with BNL's Atlanta branch as long ago as 1982, and expressed "surprise" at reports the branch wasn't authorized to grant the credits.  ---  Jaguar plans to unveil today a "stripped down" version of its flagship XJ6 sedan, hoping to revive sales in the U.S., its biggest market.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 126,020,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2704.41, off 5.13; transportation 1469.59, off 4.09; utilities 215.61, off 0.37.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3336.13, up 7.30.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.25, off 0.27; spot index 129.15, off 0.30.  Dollar: 146.70 yen, off 0.50; 1.9866 marks, off 0.0084.  A telecommunications contract being negotiated by Alcatel N.V. with the Soviet Union is being held up by Western restrictions on technology transfer to the East bloc, a spokesman for the French telecommunication group's Belgian unit said.  The proposed deal, which could generate more than $1 billion in sales over 10 years, would initially involve direct supply by the Belgian company, Alcatel Bell Telephone, of 250,000 lines of its System 12 digital telephone exchanges.  In a second stage, Bell Telephone would form a joint venture with Krasnaya Zarya, a Leningrad company, to assemble the exchanges with a capacity of as many as 1.5 million lines a year.  The spokesman said the contract couldn't be concluded yet because of curbs by Paris-based Coordinating Committee for Multilateral Export Controls on technology transfer to the East bloc.  Alcatel is "continuing to negotiate in order to be 100% ready when Cocom agrees to the technology transfer," he said.  Alcatel has been negotiating the contract for almost two years.  Ciba-Geigy Ltd. and Chiron Corp., continuing a pharmaceutical industry pattern of consolidation, launched a $591 million, or $25.23-a-share, tender offer for the Connaught BioSciences Inc. shares they don't already own.  The offer for the Canadian vaccine and pharmaceutical company, is contingent on at least 11 million Connaught shares being tendered and the rejection by Connaught shareholders of a rival stock-swap offer from Institut Merieux S.A. of France.  A Connaught spokesman said in about a week the Toronto-based company would either recommend one of the offers or decide against making any recommendations to holders.  The latest offer, he said, was "quite a surprise," even though the three companies talked last year about an acquisition of Connaught.  Those talks fell through because the parties couldn't agree on terms, a Ciba-Geigy spokesman said.  The competing offers could heat up into a bidding battle for Connaught although they face Canadian legal hurdles, analysts said.  Both bidders have the wherewithal to engage in such a battle, analysts said, but Ciba-Geigy, the Basel, Switzerland-based pharmaceutical concern, and Chiron, an Emeryville, Calif., biotechnology firm, already own 8%, or 2,045,640 shares, of Connaught's 25.5 million common shares on a fully diluted basis.  The companies declined to disclose how much they paid for the stake, acquired in a privately negotiated transaction.  But if the minimum 11 million Connaught shares are tendered, Ciba-Geigy and Chiron, through a unit created for the acquisition, would control 51% of the Canadian firm.  Analysts praised the proposed acquisition, saying it would give a two-year-old vaccine research and development venture between Ciba-Geigy and Chiron the marketing component it doesn't now possess.  "The threesome will probably become one of the most powerful vaccine companies in the world," said Denise M. Gilbert, a health care analyst with Montgomery Securities.  At the heart of many recent pharmaceutical acquisitions has been the burgeoning cost of research and development.  Between $100 million to $200 million is spent bringing a new vaccine or drug to market, industry analysts said, although they added that the Ciba-Geigy/Chiron offer for Connaught would probably have been made anyway given the synergies between the three companies.  In national over-the-counter trading, Connaught jumped $4.375 to $25.625, and Chiron rose 87.5 cents to $27.125.  Connaught and Institut Merieux agreed in March to combine their human-health business into a new company, Merieux Connaught N.V.  Under terms of that offer, Connaught holders would receive one share in the new company for every Connaught share held as well as one share in Connaught's Bio-Research Laboratories Ltd. unit, a contract research organization that would be excluded from the merger.  Connaught shareholders will meet Sept. 28 to consider the proposal, which the company and analysts said was difficult to value.  The Ciba-Geigy/Chiron offer expires Oct. 13, unless extended.  Connaught said it was advised that the Ciba-Geigy/Chiron offer would be increased to $26.51 a share from $25.23 a share if the company adopted a shareholder-rights plan that facilitated the Swiss and U.S. firms' offer.  That offer was rejected by Connaught, which cited its existing pact with Institut Merieux.  The offers by Ciba-Geigy/Chiron and the French concern face some difficulties.  The University of Toronto filed suit against Connaught to block a merger with Institut Merieux.  The university claimed such a merger violated terms of a 1972 pact prohibiting Connaught's sale to foreign interests.  Connaught has said it will oppose the suit, maintaining that there aren't any legal agreements with the university that would block the deal.  Ciba-Geigy and Chiron said the newly created unit formed to acquire Connaught would be based in Canada.  James Keffer, vice president, research, with the University of Toronto, said the new bid "doesn't change anything with the direction of the court action.  It's still full steam ahead."  He said the university is likely to be opposed to the new offer.  "It's a similar type of takeover with foreign ownership, so we have similar concerns," but it's too early to say what action the university will take, he said.  The court date for the Institut Merieux hearing is scheduled for Sept. 28.  Investors and bond dealers bought up short-term debt securities yesterday on expectations of slower economic growth and a flight to "safe" investments by credit-conscious buyers.  Yields on some Treasury bills tumbled more than 1/10 of a percentage point.  Prices of some short-term Treasury securities rose 1/4 of a point, or $2.50 per $1,000 face amount.  The 30-year Treasury bond lagged, rising about 1/8 of a point.  A variety of rumors, economic expectations and trading strategies drove participants to short-term maturities.  Recent concerns about defaults on less-developed country debt and junk bonds are causing some investors to buy short-term Treasury securities.  Restructurings at Resorts International Inc. and Campeau Corp. have made many high-yield investors skittish.  Meanwhile, the municipal market today will be fixed on the Washington Public Power Supply System attempt to sell over $600 million in refunding revenue bonds.  On the economic front, this week's reports are expected to show softer economic growth.  Specifically, bond dealers are expecting the August producer price index to show a decline in the rate of inflation, and retail sales data for the same month to be flat and perhaps even negative, subtracting automobile sales.  Slower inflation and consumption, combined with a rising dollar, might prompt the Federal Reserve to ease interest rates a bit.  Or so traders hope.  Dozens of bond-market arbitragers bought two-, three-, four-, and five-year notes against short positions in the long-term sector of the yield curve.  In a short sale, an investor or trader sells a security he or she doesn't own with the intent of buying it back at a cheaper price later.  This arbitrage strategy suggests that traders expect short-term rates to fall at a faster pace than long-term rates.  Douglas McAllister, vice president at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., said, "People want to be invested in the two-year and three-year area because there is less volatility and higher yield."  Ongoing selling of mortgage-backed securities by savings and loan associations has made some investors wary of long-term securities.  Typically, when bond dealers can't find immediate buyers for securities, they offset the risk by selling long-term Treasurys as a hedge.  Traders also said that a number of nervous money managers are slowing down the purchases of stocks and putting fresh funds to work in Treasury coupons.  Wall Street pundits are widely divided over whether the economy is slowing or heating up again.  The uncertainty is causing many investors to play it safe and to stick to short-term Treasury securities.  Treasury, Agency Securities  Due to the thrift bailout bill and reduced borrowing demands from thrifts, the financing needs of the Federal Home Loan Banks continue to drop.  The Home Loan Banks said they will tap the debt market for $885 million of new bonds today, down from August's $2.9 billion package.  Just five months ago, in April, the agency sold a record $7.5 billion package.  The result of the sharply reduced financing requirements is a marked narrowing of yield spreads between Home Loan Bank debt and comparable U.S. Treasurys.  The $550 million of new one-year bonds are expected to carry a yield premium of 0.05 to 0.10 of a percentage point above Treasurys, compared with a peak spread of 0.30 during the spring.  And the $335 million of new three-year bonds are expected to carry a premium of 0.18 to 0.20 of a percentage point above the three-year T-note, compared with a spread of 0.40 in the spring.  As part of the thrift rescue bill enacted last month, Congress authorized Treasury to sell $20 billion of debt by Sept. 30 and the Resolution Funding Corp. was created to issue $30 billion of debt in a two-year period that begins Oct. 1.  Not only is the government pumping money into the thrift bailout agency, but the financing needs of thrifts continue to shrink as they shed assets.  Back in the spring, thrifts had huge financing needs because they faced record deposit outflows.  Thrift borrowings from the Home Loan Banks, called advances, rose by an average of more than $4 billion in February, March and April, before declining in May and June.  In the Treasury market, noncompetitive buyers bought about $1.25 billion of both the three- and six-month Treasury bills in yesterday's weekly auction.  That's about average, but primary dealers had large orders from some institutional accounts.  Here are details of yesterday's auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @ Applications ......... $27,158,480,000 $30,535,195,000  @ Accepted bids ........ $7,220,110,000 $7,213,860,000  @ Accepted at low price. 13% 28%  @ Accepted noncompet'ly. $1,242,825,000 $1,233,455,000  @ Average price (Rate).. 98.069 (7.64%) 96.138 (7.64%)  @ High price (Rate) .... 98.074 (7.62%) 96.143 (7.63%)  @ Low price (Rate) ..... 98.066 (7.65%) 96.138 (7.64%)  @ Coupon equivalent .... 7.90% 8.06%  Both issues are dated Sept. 14.  The 13-week bills mature Dec. 14, and the 26-week bills mature March 15, 1990.  Municipals  The Washington Public Power Supply System plans to sell between $610 million and $620 million of refunding revenue bonds today, up from the $450 million it had recently planned to sell.  This sale will mark the first time WPPSS has tapped the capital markets since its default in 1983 on $2.25 billion of nuclear projects four and five bonds -- the largest municipal default ever.  Three weeks ago, the WPPSS offering was halted when Chemical Bank, trustee of the defaulted bonds, made a grab for some of the proceeds.  Traders and analysts expect the bonds to yield about 0.25% above similarly rated bonds.  That puts the long-term bonds at about a 7.75% yield.  Bradford Higgins, manager of First Boston Corp.'s public power group, said the total amount of bonds to be sold will be decided by WPPSS officials and lead underwriters Goldman Sachs & Co. and Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  First Boston Corp. is acting as financial adviser to WPPSS.  Mr. Higgins said the bonds will include serial bonds, zero coupon bonds and insured bonds.  Maturities will range from 1990 to 2018, he said.  The amounts of each type and maturity have yet to be determined.  The bonds to be priced today will refund debt incurred for nuclear projects one and three.  The defaulted securities involved projects four and five.  Elsewhere in the municipal market, actively traded issues closed flat to slightly higher.  Foreign Bonds  British government bonds bounced higher after an August retail sales report showed less strength than expected.  Forecasts centered around a 0.6% rise in retail sales, but sales in August advanced at a 0.4% pace.  The Treasury 11 3/4% bonds due 2003/2007 closed at 113 26/32 to yield 9.85%, a 1/4 point gain.  The Treasury 11 3/4% of 1991 closed at 99 14/32 to yield 12.15%, a gain of about 1/32.  Elsewhere:  -- West German government bonds closed slightly lower after a session of listless trading.  Bonn's 7% securities of June 1999 are ending about 1/4 point lower at 99.00 to yield 6.89%, up about 0.05% from a week ago.  The 6 3/4% notes of 1994 are down 1/8 point at 98.90 to yield 7.02%.  In London, the Bund bond futures contract closed at 93.87, the lowest level in about a month.  Debt securities are adjusting to expectations that the West German Bundesbank will raise interest rates soon to boost its currency and slow economic growth.  -- Japanese government bond prices ended sharply lower.  The benchmark issue ended on brokers' screens at a price of 95.32, down 0.51 to yield 5.385%.  The trading range was 5.34% to 5.395%.  Corporate Issues  Safety-Kleen Corp. made its debut in the corporate bond market this session with an offering of $100 million of 10-year senior notes.  The noncallable securities were priced to yield 9.30%, which represents a yield spread of 1.18 percentage points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  William Blair & Co. was the lead underwriter.  The issue included so-called event-risk language designed to protect bondholders if the company were to become a takeover target.  By including the language, Treasurer Laurence Rudnick said the company was able to save about .25 percentage point in coming to market.  Corporates finished the session little changed to up 1/8 point in light trading.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities rose 6/32 to 10/32, outpacing gains in intermediate Treasuries, despite another round of thrift liquidations.  The continued strong showing for mortgage issues reflects growing optimism among an increasing number of institutional investors.  The view is that mortgage securities have been depressed by heavy sales by thrifts and now are attractive.  The yield premium of mortgage issues above Treasuries, which widened sharply earlier this year, isn't seen to be widening much further.  Alden Toevs, head of mortgage-backed research at Morgan Stanley & Co., thinks the worst is over for the mortgage sector.  "The smart money is coming back into mortgages," he said.  He believes tougher federally mandated capital standards for thrifts and the shutdown of insolvent institutions will lead to a "a maximum of $50 billion" of mortgage securities being liquidated.  Meanwhile, there was market talk that New West Federal Savings & Loan Association, the so-called bad bank formed with assets of failed American Savings & Loan Association, continued its huge mortgage-backed liquidation program by selling $800 million of Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 8 1/2% securities.  But that rumored sale, as well as other reported thrift liquidations, was more than offset by heavy purchases from a variety of institutional investors, traders said.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery ended at 97 18/32, up 9/32; Freddie Mac 9% securities at 96 21/32, up 7/32.  International Business Machines Corp. said it agreed to pay $2.5 million to acquire a 5% interest in Index Technology Corp., a computer-aided software engineering company based in Cambridge, Mass.  IBM said it would receive newly issued voting convertible preferred shares representing a 5% interest in Index Technology in exchange for its investment.  The agreement allows IBM to increase its investment through open-market purchases, to a total of 20%.  Index Technology had 1988 revenue of $29.6 million.  IBM also said it would work with Index Technology to develop computer-aided software engineering products based on IBM's PS/2 and OS/2 systems.  Since the beginning of the year, IBM, the Armonk, N.Y.-based computer giant, has made 15 separate investments in various software companies in its strategy to match up appropriate software systems with hardware for its customers.  In July, IBM purchased a 19.8% interest in Policy Management Systems Corp. for $116.5 million.  An IBM spokesman said he expects this type of activity to continue.  {Second of Two Parts}  WASHINGTON -- A few weeks after taking office, President Bush had a private lunch with Attorney General Dick Thornburgh, White House Chief of Staff John Sununu and presidential counsel C. Boyden Gray.  The single topic on the agenda: guarding the president's power.  By lunch's end, Mr. Bush had ordered Mr. Thornburgh to watch for any congressional intrusions on presidential authority and to sound an alert whenever he spotted one.  Yet a few weeks later, Mr. Bush himself announced that he had struck a deal with Congress that some of his own supporters consider one of the biggest giveaways of presidential power in recent history.  He gave up trying to persuade Congress to send military aid to the Contra rebels fighting Nicaragua's government.  Moreover, he agreed to stop sending even nonlethal aid after November unless four congressional committees give him approval to continue -- a concession that may return to haunt his administration in coming weeks as it tries to keep aid flowing.  The contrast between Mr. Bush's philosophical concerns and his pragmatic style has produced a schizophrenia in the way his administration handles the fundamental issue of presidential prerogatives.  Mr. Bush has declared that he feels strongly about protecting and expanding a president's power, and has challenged Congress on some particular issues.  But at heart he is a conciliator, often trying to draw lawmakers into his decisions rather than confronting them over his authority.  The president has sent "awfully mixed signals so far," says Edwin Feulner, president of the conservative Heritage Foundation, which has been one of the leaders of a campaign to cut congressional power and strengthen presidential authority.  The conciliatory approach seems wise to some analysts, who argue Congress is less likely to try to pre-empt a president's powers when it is consulted and cajoled.  But such a tack dismays conservatives, who are counting on Mr. Bush to take advantage of Democrats' recent ethical woes to cut the Democratic-controlled Congress down to size.  "I have urged the president to look for a challenge, to find a way to challenge" Congress, particularly in foreign policy, says Paul Weyrich, a prominent conservative activist.  On some individual issues, Mr. Bush and his aides have signaled that they will confront Congress to enhance presidential authority.  Mr. Bush a few weeks ago vetoed a bill that would have toughened the provisions of a deal the administration negotiated with Japan to co-produce the new FSX jet fighter.  The president said the bill's provisions "unconstitutionally infringe on the powers of the executive."  Lawmakers may try to override his veto, setting up another showdown.  The White House also has refused to release Federal Bureau of Investigation background reports on administration job nominees to the staffs of congressional committees holding confirmation hearings.  A spat over the FBI reports has held up some appointees, but Mr. Gray, the presidential counsel, asserts that the reports are prepared to help the president decide on a nominee and not "to allow congressional staff to go roaming about very confidential material."  Similarly, Mr. Bush pointedly named Anne Brunsdale, a staunch free-trade advocate, to chair the International Trade Commission, ignoring language lawmakers last year inserted into a trade bill with the aim of discouraging the White House from picking her.  Currently, administration aides are contemplating proposing legislation to give a president enhanced "recision authority," which would make it easier for him to refuse to finance congressionally approved spending projects.  But on many broader issues, Mr. Bush seems to drift away from his philosophical views on presidential power and stress presidential-congressional cooperation and compromise.  Thus, though he proclaimed during his presidential campaign that Congress has intruded too far into foreign-policy matters, he has consulted extensively with lawmakers on a wide spectrum of foreign affairs.  He even has instituted regular meetings at the White House with the lawmakers most deeply involved with national-security issues.  And when Congress recently adopted stronger sanctions than he had selected to punish China for its crackdown on pro-democracy demonstrators, the administration's response was muted.  In domestic policy, rather than brusquely confront Congress for failing to close the budget deficit, Mr. Bush is trying to narrow the gap through virtually nonstop negotiations with lawmakers.  He has proclaimed his support for a line-item veto, which would give presidents clear power to strike down individual projects in big congressional spending bills -- but his only public drive for a constitutional amendment so far has been for one to ban flag-burning.  In part, the Bush approach reflects the personality of the president.  He loves the give-and-take of daily politics, and his natural inclination is to win over outsiders by pulling them into his deliberations.  In addition, Mr. Bush himself is a former congressman, and the son of a former senator.  He still values his friendships on Capitol Hill, and even pops up there occasionally.  "He has a very realistic view of Congress," says Democratic Rep. Lee Hamilton of Indiana, a senior member of the Foreign Affairs Committee.  The Bush approach of mixing confrontation with conciliation strikes some people as sensible, perhaps even inevitable, because Mr. Bush faces a Congress firmly in the hands of the opposition.  "Bush, it seems to me, is playing a very smart game," says Charles Jones, a scholar at the Brookings Institution who is doing a study on presidential power.  Rep. Hamilton maintains that a president actually loses power by "thumbing his nose at Congress" because his policies tend to get shot down in anger on Capitol Hill.  The congressman, who was a co-chairman of the panel that investigated the Iran-Contra scandal in the Reagan administration, says the lesson of that affair "is that you enhance presidential power when you follow the process."  Similarly, former President Jimmy Carter notes that in a report he helped prepare for Mr. Bush after last fall's election, Mr. Bush was urged "to initiate a cooperation with Congress, to share with them on important ventures."  Mr. Carter says that Mr. Bush has "followed fairly well" that prescription.  In fact, Mr. Bush's consultative approach has succeeded in heading off at least one important congressional effort to rein in presidential authority.  Influential lawmakers from both parties have put off reintroducing a bill they floated last year that would require the president to notify top lawmakers of all covert actions within 48 hours.  Maine Republican Sen. William Cohen, an architect of the bill, says he and other lawmakers are negotiating with the Bush administration toward reaching an informal understanding on notification that would make a new law unnecessary.  Sen. Cohen says he is trying to avoid pushing through a law on stricter reporting requirements that President Bush would feel compelled to veto.  Still, others see the Bush tendency toward consultation as too wishy-washy to force the institutional changes in Washington's power structure that they desire.  By consulting and compromising rather than confronting, many conservatives argue, Mr. Bush runs the risk of giving up on both his principles and his power.  "By pre-emptive concessions, he has sort of avoided any hard tests," says Frank Gaffney, a former Pentagon official who now is head of the Center for Security Policy.  "I don't think that's the same thing as protecting your position.  I think it's eroding it."  Conservatives would like, for instance, a bigger push by the administration to rewrite the War Powers Act, which requires congressional approval for any prolonged stationing of troops in hostile areas abroad.  Bills to make the act more flexible have been introduced, but they are bogged down.  Nowhere has the split personality of the Bush administration on presidential power been more apparent than in Mr. Bush's deal with lawmakers on Contra aid.  Mr. Bush campaigned as a Contra supporter, and he and his secretary of state, James Baker, took office determined to obtain as much Contra aid from Congress as possible.  But they also wanted an agreement that would end constant wrangling with lawmakers.  The question of whether to send military aid to the Contras was the most bitter issue dividing Mr. Reagan and Congress, led to the Iran-Contra scandal and clouded cooperation on all Central American policies.  Mr. Baker began intensive negotiations with influential members of Congress, and concluded there wasn't any hope of winning military aid.  He and Mr. Bush decided to cut a deal to win as much nonlethal aid as they could.  They accepted a package in which Congress would provide the Contras roughly $4.5 million a month in such aid through next February.  But Mr. Baker also agreed to send Congress a "side letter" pledging to end the aid in November unless the president receives letters of approval to continue from four congressional committees.  Messrs.  Bush and Baker argued that the deal actually enhanced presidential power by squeezing out more Contra aid -- and thereby meeting a top Bush priority -- than otherwise would have been possible.  The administration also avoided giving Congress a formal veto, by putting the agreement in the side letter rather than in legislation, says Louis Fisher, a specialist on executive and legislative powers at the Congressional Research Service.  Moreover, Mr. Fisher contends that rather than being forced into the arrangement, "it was obviously what Baker wanted" because he thought it gave the president an advantage.  But conservatives were aghast.  Mr. Bush's own counsel, Mr. Gray, distributed an internal memo trying to block the deal.  Former President Gerald Ford, who generally praises Mr. Bush's handling of questions of power, says: "In some respects, I think he gave up some of his presidential prerogatives."  Elliott Abrams, the former assistant secretary of state who was at the heart of the Reagan administration's fight over the Contras, says: "The question is what price do you pay to avoid fights on the Hill."  Mr. Bush may yet pay a higher price than he expected.  His maneuvers on Contra aid could leave him looking too weak to counter a handful of congressional committee chairmen.  Some Democrats argue that continued aid of any kind to the Contras will undermine the spirit of the regional peace plan crafted by Central American presidents this summer, which calls for the voluntary disbanding of the Contras and their reintegration into Nicaragua.  So the administration will have to fight a public-relations battle this fall to keep the Democratic-controlled committees from cutting off aid in November without a vote in Congress. 